<BODY DOCID=221>
Average interest rates on yen certificates
of deposit, CD, fell to 4.27 pct in the week ended February 25
from 4.32 pct the previous week, the Bank of Japan said.
    New rates (previous in brackets), were -
    Average CD rates all banks 4.27 pct (4.32)
    Money Market Certificate, MMC, ceiling rates for the week
starting from March 2          3.52 pct (3.57)
    Average CD rates of city, trust and long-term banks
    Less than 60 days          4.33 pct (4.32)
    60-90 days                 4.13 pct (4.37)
    Average CD rates of city, trust and long-term banks
    90-120 days             4.35 pct (4.30)
    120-150 days            4.38 pct (4.29)
    150-180 days            unquoted (unquoted)
    180-270 days            3.67 pct (unquoted)
    Over 270 days           4.01 pct (unquoted)
    Average yen bankers' acceptance rates of city, trust and
long-term banks
    30 to less than 60 days unquoted (4.13)
    60-90 days              unquoted (unquoted)
    90-120 days             unquoted (unquoted)
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=225>
Japan is expected to cut the base lending
rate for state financial institutions to 5.5 pct from 6.2 as
part of the recent pact by major industrial nations in Paris,
Finance Ministry sources said.
    They said the cut is based on a revision of the Trust Fund
Bureau Law, which should be approved by parliament on March 3,
abolishing the 6.05 pct minimum interest rate on deposits with
the bureau.
    The bureau channels funds to government financial
institutions for public works and other official uses, they
said.
    The base lending rate for state bodies such as the Japan
Development Bank, People's Finance Corp and the finance
corporations of local public enterprises usually moves in
tandem with long-term prime rates, the sources said.
    However, it was impossible for them to follow the last cut,
to 5.8 pct from 6.2 pct on January 28, because the Trust Fund
Bureau rate was legally set at 6.05 pct.
    The ministry will abolish the minimum rate and introduce a
market-related one to resolve the problem and stimulate the
domestic economy, they said.
    On Tuesday, the ministry allowed long-term bankers to cut
their prime to a record low of 5.5 pct, effective February 28.
The move suggested it had reached agreement with depositors
using the bureau, the postal savings system of the Posts and
Telecommunications Ministry and the Japan welfare annuity of
the Ministry of Health and Welfare, the sources said.
    These ministries are trying to determine which market rates
should be considered when setting the bureau's deposit rate,
the ministry sources said.
    Coupon rates on new 10-year government bonds, minus 0.1
percentage points, is the likeliest choice, they added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=233>
The Italian treasury said annual coupon
rates payable March 1988 on two issues of long-term treasury
certificates (CCTs) would be cut by about four percentage
points compared with rates this March.
    Coupon rates on 10-year certificates maturing March 1995
will fall to 9.80 pct from 13.65 pct and rates on 10-year
issues maturing in March 1996 would fall to 10.05 pct from
14.30 pct.
    The Treasury also cut by 0.60 point six-monthly coupons
payable this September on six issues maturing between September
1988 and September 1991.
    The issues carry terms of between five and seven years and
will have coupon rates of between 4.85 and 5.65 pct in
September compared with 5.45 and 6.25 pct this March.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=296>
The Dutch Central Bank said it has
accepted bids totalling 4.8 billion guilders at tender for new
seven-day special advances at 5.3 pct covering the period March
2 to 9 aimed at relieving money market tightness.
    Subscriptions to 300 mln guilders were met in full, amounts
above 300 mln at 50 pct.
    The new facility replaces old five-day advances worth 8.0
billion guilders at the same rate.
    Dealers expect this week's money market shortage to be
around 12 billion guilders.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=307>
The Bank of England said it forecast a
shortage of around 800 mln stg in the money market today.
    Among the main factors affecting liquidity, bills maturing
in official hands and the take-up of treasury bills will drain
some 1.61 billion stg.
    Partly offsetting this outflow, exchequer transactions and
a fall in note circulation will add around 425 mln stg and 360
mln stg respectively. In addition, bankers' balances above
target will add some 20 mln stg to the system today.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=322>
The Bank of Japan decided at a policy
board meeting to promote further interest rate liberalisation
by lowering the minimum denomination of regulation-free large
deposits and by raising the interest rate ceiling on money
market certificates (MMCs), a central bank official said.
    The new guideline will go into effect on April 6, the bank
said.
    Under the guideline, the minimum denomination of
regulation-free large deposits will be lowered to 100 mln yen
from 300 mln.
    The interest rate ceiling of MMCs with maturities of
between one year and two years will be set at 0.5 percentage
point below the prevailing certificate of deposit rate, the
bank said.
    But the ceiling on MMCs with maturities of one year or less
will remain the same, or 0.75 percentage point below the CD
rates.
    The minimum denomination of MMCs will be lowered to 10 mln
yen from 30 mln.
    The bank also said time deposit rates will be lowered by
0.37 point, effective March 16, in line with the half-point cut
in the official discount rate on February 23.
    New interest rates on two-year and one-year deposits at
banks, for example, will be 3.64 pct and 3.39 pct per annum,
respectively.
    Demand deposit rates, however, will remain the same.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=336>
The Bank of England said it revised its
forecast of the shortage in the money market down to around 700
mln stg from its original estimate of 800 mln.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=341>
The Bank of England said it had provided
the money market with 37 mln stg assistance in the morning
session. This compares with the Bank's downward revised
estimate of the shortfall in the system today of around 700 mln
stg.
    The central bank purchased bank bills outright comprising
four mln stg in band one at 10-7/8 pct and 33 mln stg in band
two at 10-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=411>
The Bank of England said it had offered
borrowing facilities to those discount houses wishing to use
them at 1430 GMT.
    The Bank also said it provided the money market 456 mln stg
assistance in the afternoon session bringing its total help so
far today to 493 mln stg. This compares with its forecast of a
shortage in the system today of around 700 mln stg.
    The central bank purchased bank bills outright comprising
41 mln stg in band one at 10-7/8 pct 361 mln stg in band two at
10-13/16 pct and 54 mln stg in band three at 10-3/4 pct.
    Money market dealers said the Bank of England has recently
used the offer of borrowing facilities to signal that it does
not want to see an early reduction in U.K. Base lending rates.
    The Bank does this by lending to the discount houses at
rates of interest higher than its prevailing money market
dealing rates.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=475>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
enter the U.S. Government securities market to add temporary
reserves, economists said.
    They expect it to supply the reserves indirectly by
arranging a fairly large round, two billion dlrs or more, of
customer repurchase agreements. The Fed may add the reserves
directly instead via System repurchases.
    Federal funds, which averaged 6.02 pct on Friday, opened at
6-1/8 pct and traded between there and 6-1/16 pct. Funds are
under upward pressure from settlement of recently sold two-year
notes and from a Treasury tax and loan call on banks.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=522>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange 1.5 billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a Fed spokesman said.
    Dealers said Federal funds were trading at 6-3/16 pct when
the Fed began its temporary and indirect supply of reserves to
the banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=913>
The Bank of England said it forecast a
shortage of around 350 mln stg in the money market today.
    Among the main factors affecting liquidity, bills maturing
in official hands and the take-up of treasury bills will drain
some 525 mln stg while bankers' balnces below target will take
out around 175 mln stg.
    Partly offsetting these outflows, exchequer transactions
and a fall in note circulation will add some 300 mln stg and 40
mln stg to the system respectively.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=926>
The Bundesbank is unlikely to change
its credit policies at its central bank council meeting on
Thursday, as exchange rates and short-term interest rates have
stabilized over the past few weeks, money market dealers said.
    Attention in the money market is focused on tomorrow's
tender for a securities repurchase pact, from which funds will
be credited on Thursday, when an earlier pact expires, draining
16 billion marks from the system.
    The tender was announced last Friday, because carnival
festivities closed banks in Duesseldorf yesterday, and will
close banks here this afternoon.
    Because of the disruption to business from carnival,
minimum reserve figures for the start of the month are
unrealistic, making it difficult for banks to assess their
needs at the tender.
    Dealers said the Bundesbank would want to inject enough
liquidity in this week's pact to keep short-term rates down.
    But because of uncertainty about banks' current holdings,
the Bundesbank may well allocate less than 16 billion marks
this week, and top it up if necessary at next week's tender.
    "I would not be surprised if the Bundesbank cuts the amount
a little, to say 14 or 15 billion marks," one dealer said.
    "They would then stock it up at the next tender when the
need is clearer," he added.
    An earlier pact expires next week, draining 8.5 billion
marks from the system. Banks also face a heavy but temporary
drain this month from a major tax deadline for customers.
    Banks held 52.0 billion marks on February 27 at the
Bundesbank, averaging 51.0 billion over the whole month, just
clear of the 50.5 billion February reserve requirement.
    Call money traded today at 3.85/95 pct, up from 3.80/90
yesterday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=942>
The Bundesbank is unlikely to change
its credit policies at its central bank council meeting on
Thursday, as exchange rates and short-term interest rates have
stabilized over the past few weeks, money market dealers said.
    Attention in the money market is focused on tomorrow's
tender for a securities repurchase pact, from which funds will
be credited on Thursday, when an earlier pact expires, draining
16 billion marks from the system.
    The tender was announced last Friday, because carnival
festivities closed banks in Duesseldorf yesterday, and will
close banks here this afternoon.
    Because of the disruption to business from carnival,
minimum reserve figures for the start of the month are
unrealistic, making it difficult for banks to assess their
needs at the tender.
    Dealers said the Bundesbank would want to inject enough
liquidity in this week's pact to keep short-term rates down.
    But because of uncertainty about banks' current holdings,
the Bundesbank may well allocate less than 16 billion marks
this week, and top it up if necessary at next week's tender.
    "I would not be surprised if the Bundesbank cuts the amount
a little, to say 14 or 15 billion marks," one dealer said.
    "They would then stock it up at the next tender when the
need is clearer," he added.
    An earlier pact expires next week, draining 8.5 billion
marks from the system. Banks also face a heavy but temporary
drain this month from a major tax deadline for customers.
    Banks held 52.0 billion marks on February 27 at the
Bundesbank, averaging 51.0 billion over the whole month, just
clear of the 50.5 billion February reserve requirement.
    Call money traded today at 3.85/95 pct, up from 3.80/90
yesterday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=943>
The Bank of England said it revised up
its forecast of the shortage in the money market today to
around 500 mln stg from its initial estimate of 350 mln.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=953>
The Bank of England said it provided 24
mln stg help to the money market in the morning session.
    This compares with the bank's upward revised shortage
forecast of around 500 mln stg.
    The central bank purchased bank bills outright comprising
two mln stg in band one at 10-7/8 pct and 22 mln stg in band
two at 10-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=999>
The Bank of England said it had revised
its forecast of the shortage in the money market down to 450
mln stg before taking account of its morning operations. At
noon the bank had estimated the shortfall at 500 mln stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1008>
The Bank of England said it had provided the
money market with a further 437 mln stg assistance in the
afternoon session. This brings the Bank's total help so far
today to 461 mln stg and compares with its revised shortage
forecast of 450 mln stg.
    The central bank made purchases of bank bills outright
comprising 120 mln stg in band one at 10-7/8 pct and 315 mln
stg in band two at 10-13/16 pct.
    In addition, it also bought two mln stg of treasury bills
in band two at 10-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1078>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
enter the U.S. Government securities market to add temporary
reserves, economists said.
    They expect it to supply the reserves indirectly by
arranging 1.5 to two billion dlrs of customer repurchase
agreements. The Fed may add the reserves directly instead via
System repurchases.
    Federal funds, which averaged 6.18 pct yesterday, opened at
6-3/16 pct and stayed there in early trading. Analysts said the
rate is under upward pressure partly from settlement of 8.25
billion dlrs of five-year Treasury notes.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1112>
Loans and advances from the Dutch
central bank to the commercial banks were barely changed at
12.9 billion guilders in the week up to and including March 2,
the central bank weekly return showed.
    The Treasury's account with the bank dropped 1.3 billion
guilders. Dealers said a larger amount of funds in the form of
interest and repayments on state loans went out than came in
the form of tax payments to the state.
    Notes in circulation rose 360 mln to 27.7 billion as the
public withdrew cash to celebrate this week's Carnival festival
or take an end-of-winter holiday break, dealers said.
    Current money market rates are at 5-3/4 to 6-1/4 pct for
call money against 5-1/4 to 5-3/8 a week ago, and between
5-5/16 and 5-9/16 pct against 5-1/4 to 5-1/2 for one to 12
month periods, dealers said.
    The cause for the rise was a rather tight 4.8 billion
guilders of special advances set by the Bank yesterday compared
with 8.0 billion guilders for the previous set, dealers added.
    They expect the money market shortage to continue around 12
billion guilders this week.
    The weekly return showed total Dutch gold and currency
reserves rose 11.3 mln guilders to 56.0 billion guilders.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1125>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange 1.5 billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a Fed spokesman said.
    Dealers said Federal funds were trading at 6-1/4 pct when
the Fed began its temporary and indirect supply of reserves to
the banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1154>
The Swiss Federal Government's new series
of six-month money market certificates raised 177.5 mln Swiss
francs at an issue price of 98.401 pct to give an average
annual yield of 3.286 pct, the National Bank said.
    Payment date is March 5.
    The last series of six-month paper issued in January raised
159.6 mln francs at 98.392 pct to give an average yield of
3.251 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1421>
The International Swap Dealers
Association has developed the first standard form contract for
use by arrangers of currency and interest rate swap
transactions, said Thomas Jasper, the Association's
co-chairman.
    The contract, unveiled at a press conference , is expected
to make the 300 billion dlr a year swap market more efficient,
he said. "The contracts wil accelerate the process and reduce
the expense of swap documentation," Japsper said.
    Privately, eurobond traders estimate that about 80 pct of
all new issues eventually become part of either an interest
rate or currency swap.
    An interest rate swap occurs when two issuers, usually
acting through a bank middleman, agree to accept each other's
interest payments on debt securities. Usually, the issuer of a
floating rate debt security swaps into fixed-rate debt and vice
versa. But the obligation for repayment of the debt remains
with the original borrower.
    Bank regulators have become concerned about the use of
swaps because the middleman, usually a bank, takes on some
portion of the risk but is not required to show it on the
balance sheet as a liability and may not have sufficient
capital to cushion it.
    Kenneth McCormick, a co-chairman of the ISDA and president
of Kleinwort Benson Cross Financing Inc, said the Bank of
England and the U.S. Federal Reserve Board were expected later
today to announce joint proposals for setting minimum capital
standards for counterparties in swaps.
    The standards are part of the recently announced
convergence agreement between the two countries in which
regulators have attempted to set similar capital requirements
for institutions.
    McCormick told reporters the ISDA was concerned that a
"level playing field" be maintained in the swaps market.
    He said if U.K. And U.S. Banks were required to hold more
primary capital against swap transactions than is the current
practice, the additional costs would have to be passed on to
issuers.
    The issuers might then choose to do business with
lower-cost banks which are not subject to U.S. Or U.K. Banking
rules.
    He said the ISDA had been working on a code of conduct for
swap dealers as part of its self-regulatory effort.
    That code should be completed within the next few weeks, he
said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1427>
General Motors Corp said its
Pontiac Division has established an interest rate support
incentive program, effective immediately, as an alternative to
its current option bonus program.
    The company said qualified buyers of Pontiacs may now
select special finance rates of 3.9 pct on 24-month contracts,
7.9 pct on 36-month contracts, 8.9 pct on 48-mopnth contracts
or 9.9 pct on 60-month contracts.  The program is scheduled to
expire April 30.
    Under the option bonus program, which is also scheduled to
expire April 30, buyers receive cash bonuses on the purchase of
Pontiacs equipped with option group packages, with the amount
depending on the option level on each vehicle.
    The company said the special interst rate program applies
to ann new 1986 and 1987 Pontiacs sold from dealer stock and
delivered to customers during the program period.  A customer
may choose only one program, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1503>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
enter the U.S. Government securities market to add temporary
reserves, economists said.
    They expect it to supply the reserves indirectly by
arranging around 1.5 of customer repurchase agreements.
    Federal funds, which averaged 6.22 pct yesterday, opened at
six pct and remained there in early trading.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1553>
The Federal Reserve Board voted
unanimously to propose a formula for calculating the risk of
interest rate and currency swaps as part of its ongoing effort
to come up with a new capital standard for U.S. banks that
takes into account the riskiness of a bank's loans and other
assets.
    Fed officials said an identical proposal was being issues
today by the Bank of England.
    The Fed set a 60-day period for public comment on the plan.
    The proposal adopted today addresses only the credit risks
associated with interest rate swaps, forward foreign exchange
contracts and similar financial instruments.
    Previously, the Fed Jan. 8 proposed a series of guidelines
for calculating the risk of other off-balance-sheet activities
that banks would be required to take into account in
calculating the minimum financial cushion they would need to
maintain.
    Both guidelines set five broad categories of risk for loans
and other bank assets and assigned to each a level of risk that
would establish a bank's minimum capital needs.
    The additional guidelines proposed today would determine
the amount of capital support required for a bank's current
exposure for a given asset and the potential future exposure.
    The current exposure would be measured by the
mark-to-market value of the asset, which would reflect the
replacement cost.
    Potential future increases in the replacement cost would be
calculated using credit conversion factors based on statistical
analyses by the staffs of the Bank of England and U.S. banking
regulators. Future exposure would rise over the life of the
asset.
    The Fed staff said the risk gauge attempted to balance
conflicting needs for precision and simplicity.
    They ignore, for example, the relative volatility of the
particular currencies involved in exchange rate contracts.
    Board officials said the new gauge could increase the
capital required of the largest money center banks, which are
the principal participants in these types of activities.
    They cautioned the Fed board to take account of the
potential impact of the plan on the ability of U.S. banks to
compete in world financial markets.
    However, the staff concluded, "The credit risks inherent in
such contracts now constitute a significant element of the risk
profiles of some banking organizations."
    The Fed proposal would exempt all but the 20-25 largest
participants in this market, on grounds the benefits of
including the smaller banks would be outweighed by costs.
    Also excluded would be interest rate and foreign exchange
contracts traded on organized exchanges.
    Governor Martha Seger said she was concerned that Japan was
not involved in the U.K.-U.S. effort to draft new capital
rules.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1560>
The Bank of England and the U.S. Federal
Reserve Board have agreed new proposals for joint standards to
measure the risk of an array of credit exposures that do not
show up in bank balance sheets, the Bank of England said.
    The plan, covering swaps, forward contracts and options
involving interest or exchange rates, complements proposals
agreed in January between the two central banks to make
commercial banks in the U.S. And Britain subject to similar
standards for measuring capital adequacy, the proposal said.
    It said no final decisions had been reached yet and banks
have until April 16 to comment on the trunk proposals.
    The Bank of England and Fed said they had faced a dilemma.
    "On the one hand (we) are determined to require adequate
capital support for potential future exposure -- on the other
hand (we) are concerned that overly stringent capital
requirements might unnecessarily affect the ability of U.S. And
U.K. Banking organisations to price...Contracts competitively."
     At the basis of the new proposals lies the concept of the
so-called credit equivalent amount - the current value of a
currency or interest rate contract and an estimate of its
potential change in value due to currency or interest rate
fluctuations until the contract matures.
    In treatment similar to that agreed in January for balance
sheet assets, the credit equivalent will be assigned one of
five risk weights between zero and 100 pct, depending on the
quality of the counterparty, the remaining maturity of the
contract and on collaterals or guarantees to the contract, the
plans showed.
    The proposal showed that collaterals and guarantees would
not be recognised in calculating credit equivalent amounts.
    They would, however, be reflected in the assignment of risk
weights. The only guarantees recognised are those given by U.S.
And U.K. Governments or, in the U.S., By domestic national
government agencies, the proposals showed.
    The paper said the proposed rules would not cover spot
foreign exchange contracts and securities traded in futures and
options exchanges.
    It said U.S. Regulatory authorities and the Bank of England
were keen to encourage banks to "net" contracts -- consolidate
multiple contracts with the same counterparty into one single
agreement to create one single payments stream.
    It recognised that "such arrangements may in certain
circumstances reduce credit risk and wish to encourage their
further development and implementation," and said some of the
current proposals may be changed to take this into account.
    The paper said the proposed rules would not cover spot
foreign exchange contracts and securities traded in futures and
options exchanges.
    It said U.S. Regulatory authorities and the Bank of England
were keen to encourage banks to "net" contracts -- consolidate
multiple contracts with the same counterparty into one single
agreement to create one single payments stream.
    It recognised that "such arrangements may in certain
circumstances reduce credit risk and wish to encourage their
further development and implementation," and said some of the
current proposals may be changed to take this into account.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1724>
U.S. and U.K. bank regulators are asking
banks to set aside more reserves than is necessary to cushion
them against the risks posed by the interest rate and currency
swap transactions they carry, swap dealers said.
    After viewing proposed guidelines released jointly today by
the Bank of England and the Federal Reserve Board, dealers said
that in effect, regulators are asking them to set aside
reserves twice for the same risk.
    Market participants will have 60 days to respond to the
proposals.
    Adoption of stiffer capital requirements is especially
significant in the eurobond markets, which saw new issue volume
of about 183 billion dlrs in 1986 according to figures compiled
by Euromoney magazine. While no firm figures exist, dealers in
eurobonds estimate that 80 pct of all new issues are involved
in some swap arrangement. Separately, the ISDA estimates that
about 300 billion dlrs worth of swap transactions are
outstanding. Kenneth McCormick, co-chairman of the
International Swap Dealers Association (ISDA) and President of
Kleinwort Benson Cross Financing Inc, said that the Association
has no comment and will study the proposals.
    "What they are proposing is really double counting," Patrick
de Saint-Aignan, managing director of swaps for Morgan Stanley
and Co, said. Instead, he argues, banks should either be
required to hold a percentage of the face value -- say one pct
per year to maturity -- or to hold a percentage of the cost of
replacing the contract in the event of a counterparty default.
    "The potential risk factors are very large relative to what
we had expected," said a director at one U.K. merchant bank.
"What they are really doing is asking you to capitalize now --
to borrow money now -- to cushion you against risk you might
have 10 years from now," he added.(Adds title first paragraph).
    Dealers also said they believe that banks not covered by
the agreement, such as those based in Japan, will have a
competitive advantage because they will not have to pass the
costs on to customers.
    Indeed, regulators are apparently also concerned about the
exclusion of other countries from the new requirements. Federal
Reserve Board Governor Martha Seger, following approval of the
proposed guidelines by the Fed, said she is concerned that
Japan was not involved in the U.K.-U.S. effort to draft new
capital rules.
     Dealers said they were somewhat relieved to see that bank
regulators recognized the concept of netting, that is,
offsetting the amounts receiveable from and payable to a single
counterparty against each other.
    The paper said that regulatory authorities "recognize that
such arrangements (netting) may in certain circumstances reduce
credit risk." Furthermore, the paper said, if a netting
agreement could be reached that would withstand legal tests, it
might be willing to reduce capital requirements accordingly.
    But dealers said they fear regulators may insist on an
airtight netting agreement that is impossible to design.
     "One problem is that there has never been a major default
in the swaps market. So we don't know if any of the swap
arrangements will really stand up in court," said one bank
official.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1931>
The Bank of England said it had invited
an early round of bill offers from the discount houses. The
Bank forecast the shortage in the system today at around 1.15
billion stg.
    Among the main factors affecting liquidity, bills maturing
in official hands and the take-up of treasury bills will drain
some 732 mln stg and exchequer transactions some 245 mln. In
addition, bankers' balances below target and a rise in note
circulation will drain a further 135 mln stg and 30 mln stg
respectively.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1943>
The Bank of England said it provided just
17 mln stg assistance to the money market in response to an
early round of bill offers.
    Earlier, the Bank had estimated the shortage in the system
today at around 1.15 billion stg.
    The central bank purchased bills for resale to the market
on April 2 at an interest rate of 10-15/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1967>
The Bank of France is likely to cut its
money market intervention rate by up to a quarter point at the
start of next week.  This follows a steady decline in the call
money rate over the past 10 days and signals from the Finance
Ministry that the time is ripe for a fall, dealers said.
    The call money rate peaked at just above nine pct ahead of
the meeting of finance ministers from the Group of Five
industrial countries and Canada on February 22, which restored
considerable stability to foreign exchanges after several weeks
of turbulence.
    The call money rate dropped to around 8-3/8 pct on February
23, the day after the Paris accord, and then edged steadily
down to eight pct on February 27 and 7-3/4 pct on March 3,
where it has now stabilised.
    Dealers said the Bank of France intervened to absorb
liquidity to hold the rate at 7-3/4 pct.
    While call money has dropped by well over a percentage
point, the Bank of France's money market intervention rate has
remained unchanged since January 2, when it was raised to eight
pct from 7-1/4 pct in a bid to stop a franc slide.
    The seven-day repurchase rate has also been unchanged at
8-3/4 since it was raised by a half-point on January 5.
    The Bank of France has begun using the seven-day repurchase
rate to set an upper indicator for money market rates, while
using the intervention rate to set the floor.
    Sources close to Finance Minister Edouard Balladur said
that he would be happy to see an interest rate cut, and dealers
said any fall in the intervention rate was most likely to come
when the Bank of France buys first category paper next Monday,
although an earlier cut could not be excluded.
   A cut in the seven-day repurchase rate could come as early
as tomorrow morning, banking sources said.
    They said recent high interest rates have encouraged an
acceleration in foreign funds returning to France, discouraging
the authorities from making a hasty rate cut. But they also
pointed out that money supply is broadly back on target, giving
scope for a small fall in rates.
    M-3 money supply, the government's key aggregate, finished
1986 within the government's three to five pct growth target,
rising 4.6 pct compared with seven pct in 1985.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1971>
The Bundesbank left credit policies
unchanged after today's regular meeting of its council, a
spokesman said in answer to enquiries.
    The West German discount rate remains at 3.0 pct, and the
Lombard emergency financing rate at 5.0 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1976>
The Bank of England said it provided the
money market with a further 20 mln stg of assistance during the
morning. It again bought bills for resale to the market on
April 2 at a rate of 10-15/16 pct. Earlier this morning, it
bought 17 mln stg of bills at the same rate and for resale on
the same date.
    The Bank has thus given a total of 37 mln stg so far today,
which leaves the bulk of a 1.15 billion stg shortage still in
the system. Dealers noted that money market rates again eased
this morning and the Bank may have refused bill offers from the
discount houses at rates below its established dealing levels.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1982>
The Swiss Finance Ministry is inviting
tenders for a new series of three-month money market
certificates to raise about 150 mln Swiss francs, the Swiss
National Bank said.
    Bids would be due on March 10 and payment on March 12.
    The last issue of three-month paper conducted on February
12 yielded 2.969 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1995>
Spain's Finance Ministry deregulated bank
deposit rates in an effort to raise competition among banks and
bring legislation into line with the European Community (EC), a
ministry spokesman said.
    The measure was published today in the Official State
Gazette. It takes effect tomorrow and lifts restrictions on
rates, now limited to six pct on deposits of up to 180 days.
    The government also enacted a decree cutting to one pct
from 13 pct the proportion of total assets which banks must
lend at favourable rates to industries classified "of public
interest."
    Some bankers expect the deregulation of rates to result in
a 20 pct drop in profits this year.
    Secretary of State for the Economy Guillermo de la Dehesa
told Reuters in a recent interview the reduction in fixed asset
investments would offset losses from the rate liberalisation.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10091>
Bank of England Governor Robin
Leigh-Pemberton said the Paris pact agreed between six leading
industrialised nations set no nominal exchange rate targets.
    Leigh-Pemberton said in oral evidence to a select committee
that "we did not swap numbers - we reached an understanding" on
how to cooperate towards stabilizing currencies at around their
current levels.
    He said the accord had brought Britain into a form of joint
currency float - but one which let it still purse an
independent monetary policy. "I would concede that, since the
Louvre Accord, we are acting as if we are in something,"
Leigh-Pemberton said.
    "The Louvre and Plaza accords show there is a very effective
role for the (Group of) seven central banks to operate together"
towards stabilising exchange rates," Leigh-Pemberton said.
    He did not mention this week's intervention by central
banks to support the dollar, after markets decided to test the
accord.
     Leigh-Pemberton said that "the effectiveness of this
(cooperation) is actually larger than many of us had thought in
the pre-Plaza days" before September 1985.
    He did not indicate what exchange rate levels were broadly
sought by the six nations, and noted that "we are more effective
in our agreement if we can leave the markets guessing."
    He did not indicate what exchange rate levels were broadly
sought by the six nations, and noted that "we are more effective
in our agreement if we can leave the markets guessing."
    Leigh-Pemberton said that, in principle, the Bank of
England favoured full EMS membership for sterling, provided
such a move did not endanger U.K. Anti-inflation monetary
policy. Asked whether he wanted to see U.K. Interest rates
lower, he said "the two half point cuts (this month in banks'
base lending rates) have been appropriate up until now."
    Leigh-Pemberton said he preferred a "cautious step-by-step
approach" to reducing short term interest rates, not least
because "we have a potential problem with inflation."
    Underlying U.K. Inflation was currently around 4.0 pct, "one
of the highest" among industrialised nations, he added.
    Leigh-Pemberton said the Bank of England had not wanted
base rates to fall before the unveiling of the 1987/88 budget
on March 17, but he said pressure from financial markets for
such a move had proved irresistible. Base rates are now at 10
pct.
    Regarding sterling's relationship with oil, Leigh-Pemberton
said that the pound could be seen being undervalued overall.
    He said the current oil price of some 18 dlrs a barrel
might suggest a level of 74 on the Bank of England's sterling
index, when compared with the index's level before oil prices
dropped from around the 30 dlr level. The index, base 1975,
closed here today at 72.1, unchanged from the previous close.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10156>
The eight major New York City banks
did not borrow from the Federal Reserve in the week ended
Wednesday March 25, a Fed spokesman said.
    It was the second half of a two-week bank statement period
that ended on Wednesday. The banks did not borrow in the first
week of the period.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10246>
Federal Reserve data released today
indicate that there has been no policy change in recent weeks
and that none is likely at next week's Federal Open Market
Committee (FOMC) meeting, economists said.
    "The Fed continues to be accommodative in its provision of
reserves, indicating that there has been no policy shift since
the beginning of this year," said Harold Nathan, economist at
Wells Fargo Bank.
    "These numbers and other things suggest the FOMC will not
change policy," said Robert Brusca of Nikko Securities Co.
    "The Fed is sitting fairly pretty now. There's no real
reason for it to change policy," said Joseph Liro of S.G.
Warburg and Co Inc.
    Liro said the economy is showing moderate growth and does
not require immediate policy easing and the money aggregates
may well end March at the bottom of their target ranges.
    All of the economists agreed that the Fed's major concern
now is recent weakness in the dollar which early this week was
heavily supported by central banks. They said fear of hurting
the dollar will cause the Fed to be cautious in lowering
interest rates further.
    Numbers released by the Fed today were all in line with
expectations and similar to the data for most of this year.
    The Fed said that banks' net free reserves averaged 603 mln
dlrs in the two-week statement period that ended on Wednesday
versus 749 mln dlrs in the previous period.
    In the single week to Wednesday, banks' borrowings at the
discount window, less extended credits, averaged 302 mln dlrs
compared with 228 mln dlrs in the first week of the statement
period. Meanwhile the Federal funds rate average edged up to
6.14 pct from 6.08 pct.
    The Fed's failure to add reserves in the market on Tuesday
and Wednesday surprised some, but economists said the data
released today suggest it had no real need to add reserves.
    The Fed's absence may be explained by the lack of any
pressing need for it to supply reserves and by a desire to
boost borrowings in the second week of the statement period to
meet its borrowings target, said Liro of Warburg.
    Liro said the Fed probably is shooting for a two-week
borrowings average of 300-325 mln dlrs. The borrowings actually
averaged 265 mln dlrs in the latest statement period and that
was up from 191 mln dlrs in the prior period.
    Brusca of Nikko agreed that the Fed probably is aiming for
two-week average discount window borrowings of around 300 mln
dlrs. He said that would correspond to a Federal funds rate of
around 6.10 pct.
    It is nearly impossible for the Fed to hit any borrowings
target since the demand for excess reserves is erratic, said
Wells Fargo's Nathan. He said the Fed is focusing instead on
the funds rate and is trying to keep it roughly within a six to
6-1/4 pct band.
    Upward funds rate pressure and a big reserve-adding need
are anticipated for the statement period that began today.
 More
    Brusca believes the Fed will have to add 3.5 to four
billion dlrs a day in reserves in this statement period. Liro
puts the add need at around 3.9 billion dlrs.
    To partly address this requirement, many expect the Fed to
add permanent reserves with effect next Thursday by offering to
buy all maturities of Treasury bills on Wednesday. A similar
coupon "pass" may be required later.
    There will be a greater demand for funds in this statement
period because it includes the close of the quarter. Further
upward pressure on the Federal funds rate may come from window
dressing demand as the Japanese fiscal year ends on March 31.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10464>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
enter the U.S. government securities market to add reserves
today, economists said.
    They said the Fed would probably supply temporary reserves
indirectly by arranging one to two billion dlrs of customer
repurchase agreements.
    After averaging 6.21 pct yesterday, federal funds were
opened at 6-1/8 pct and remained at that level.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10503>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange one billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a Fed spokesman said.
    Dealers said Federal funds were trading at 6-1/8 pct when
the Fed began its temporary and indirect supply of reserves to
the banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10545>
Central Bank president Francisco Gros
denied rumours that foreign creditors had filed court actions
against Brazil to seek payment of its 109-billion dlr debt.
    "There is no court action against Brazil," Gros said in a
television interview.
    Brazil last month suspended interest payments on its 68
billion dlr debt to commercial banks and yesterday suggested an
extension of short-term credit lines for 60 days until May 31.
    Media reports said some banks rated as small among Brazil's
700 creditors had filed lawsuits against the decision to
suspend interest payments.
    Gros said negotiations with the commercial creditors would
start within two weeks, when he and Finance Minister Dilson
Funaro attend council meetings of the International Monetary
Fund (IMF) in Washington.
    "Brazil is facing the issue very carefully. We are seeking a
negotiation that will give the country space to grow, because
only with growth will we be able to meet our commitments," Gros
said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11083>
The Federal Reserve's move to easier
monetary policy, begun with four quick half-point discount rate
cuts in 1986, will likely end with a final rate drop in the
second quarter, analysts said.
    A poll of 10 economists shows most expect interest rates to
edge lower, with the Fed likely to drop its basic lending rate
from 5-1/2 pct late next quarter to help the economy.
    "The Fed is not likely to ease policy much further without
a full-blown recession," said Raymond Stone, chief financial
economist at Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.
    Stone said economic data available by late June may be just
weak enough to prompt one more discount rate cut. But he said
it may only be a quarter-point drop instead of the usual half
point, to avoid hurting the dollar further.
    All of the economists agreed that the Federal Open Market
Committee tomorrow will leave Fed policy unchanged.
    The average forecast of those surveyed projects roughly
quarter-point drops by the end of June in both the Treasury
bond yield, to 7-1/2 pct, and the Federal funds rate at which
banks lend to one another, to 5-7/8 pct. Most expect the prime
lending rate at major banks to remain at 7-1/2 pct.
    Other broad predictions of the survey, relating mainly to
the April-June quarter, follow:
    - The dollar is likely to decline five to 10 pct further
against other major currencies because of a large U.S. budget
deficit and a wide, but narrowing, trade gap. Contacted after
the dollar's steep drop in the last two business days, the
economists reaffirmed this view but stressed the risk is that
the dollar will fall more, rather than less, than they expect.
    - Oil prices in the second quarter are likely to continue
trading roughly between 16 and 19 dlrs a barrel and could well
test the lower end of that range.
    - Stocks will continue to outperform bonds next quarter and
probably for all of 1987. Stocks should gain on strong
foreign demand and a modest second-half economic rise. The
outlook for bonds also is less favorable later in the year
since both inflation and interest rates may be edging up.
    - Inflation as measured by the GNP implicit price deflator
will rise to around 3.3 pct this year from 2.7 pct in 1986. The
sharp fall in the dollar to date will add to inflation, as will
a mild economic pickup in the second half of this year.
    - U.S. real gross national product, which grew at a two pct
annual rate in the 1986 second half, should expand at
respective rates of about 2.3 pct and 2.5 pct in the 1987 first
and second halves. First-quarter growth is put at a 2.4 pct
annual
rate, slowing to 2.1 pct next quarter.
    Robert Brusca of Nikko Securities Co International sees
both the strongest economy and the highest interest rates among
those surveyed. He expects real GNP, which grew at a 1.1 pct
rate in fourth-quarter 1986, to expand at a 3.3 pct rate this
quarter and 3.5 pct next quarter.
    "The economy will bounce back more strongly than many
expect," Brusca said. He said an involuntary buildup in
inventories, largely in autos, will add to first-quarter
economic growth, with consumer spending helping later.
    "We're running out of special factors to keep the economy
afloat," said Philip Braverman of Irving Securities Corp. His
interest rate and economic forecasts were among the lowest.
    Braverman said tax law changes and inventory accumulation
helped lift fourth and first quarter GNP growth, respectively.
He expects 2.5 pct first quarter growth but said that second
quarter growth could be zero or negative.
    Braverman said economic activity next quarter will suffer
from a paring of inventories, lower capital investment, slow 
government spending and less construction. Only a marginally
narrower trade deficit will add to growth.
    He sees a 7.10 pct end-of-June yield on Treasury bonds,
with Federal funds and prime rates at 5.50 and seven pct,
respectively. Nikko's Brusca projects rates of 8.25 pct for
bonds, 6.15 pct for funds and 7.75 pct for the prime rate.
    Two of the 10 economists revised rate forecasts up mildly
after the dollar's fall to 40-year lows versus the yen in past
days and news of pending U.S. trade sanctions against Japan.
    David Resler of Nomura Securities Co International Inc
raised his end-June bond yield forecast to 7.50 pct from 7.20
pct and a Fed funds rate estimate to six pct from 5.80 pct.
    Raul Nicho, president of Money Market Services Inc, lifted
his forecast of bond and Fed funds rates an eighth of a point
to eight pct for bonds and 6-1/4 pct for funds. Both Nicho and
Resler left their end-June prime rate forecast at 7-1/2 pct.
    The higher rate forecasts reflected a belief that Japanese
investors will be less eager to buy U.S. bonds because of fear
about further dollar erosion and perhaps in response to U.S.
trade sanctions. Yields may have to rise to lure other buyers.
......END-JUNE U.S. INTEREST RATE FORECASTS....
....................T-bonds..Fed funds..Prime..
Nikko Securities.....8.25......6.15......7.75..
Money Mkt Services...8.00......6.25......7.50..
Discount Corp........7.75......6.25......7.50..
Merrill Lynch........7.30......5.75......7.50..
Bankers Trust........7.25......5.50......7.50..
Wells Fargo Bank.....7.30......5.60......7.00..
Irving Securities....7.10......5.50......7.00..
Dean Witter..........7.00......5.50......7.00..
.FORECAST AVERAGE....7.50......5.875.....7.50..
.CURRENT LEVELS......7.80......6.125.....7.50..
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11200>
The Bank of England said it had provided
the money market with 1.143 billion mln stg assistance in
response to an early round of bill offers from the discount
houses.
    Earlier, the Bank forecast the system would face a very
large deficit today of around 1.75 billion stg.
    The central bank purchased bank bills outright comprising
393 mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct, 649 mln stg in band two
at 9-13/16 pct and 85 mln stg in band three at 9-3/4 pct.
    In addition it bought 16 mln stg of local authority bills
in band two at 9-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11238>
The Bundesbank declined to comment on
rumours in Tokyo that it was intervening heavily to support the
dollar, but dealers here said they had not seen the German
central bank in the market all morning.
    The dollar was quoted at around 1.8040 marks shortly after
midday in nervous but quiet trading, up from its 1.7975/85
opening.
    Spreads against the mark remained around 10 basis points,
with some banks quoting only five point spreads. Dealers said
spreads would widen and the dollar would move more sharply if
the Bundesbank did intervene.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11244>
The Bank of Japan will sell tomorrow a
total of 800 billion yen worth of financing bills from its
holdings to help absorb a projected money market surplus of
1,700 billion yen, money traders said.
    Of the total, 300 billion yen will yield 3.8992 pct on
sales from money houses to banks and securities houses in a
23-day repurchase accord maturing on April 24.
    The remaining 500 billion yen will yield 3.8990 pct in a
31-day repurchase pact maturing on May 2, they said.
    The repurchase agreement yields compare with the 3.8750 pct
one-month commercial bill discount rate today and the 4.28/11
pct rate on one-month certificates of deposit.
    Tomorrow's surplus is attributable to excess bank holdings
from sales of yen to buy dollars and to huge cash amounts to be
redeposited at banks after the current financial year-end
today, the traders said.
    The operation will put the outstanding bill supply at about
3,200 billion yen.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11263>
The Bank of England said it had provided
the money market with a further 168 mln stg assistance in the
afternoon session. This takes the Bank's total help so far
today to 1.88 billion stg and compares with its estimate of a
record two billon stg shortage in the system.
    The central bank purchased bank bills outright comprising
25 mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct, 138 mln stg in band two at
9-13/16 pct and three mln stg in band three at 9-3/4 pct.
    It also bought two mln stg of treasury bills in band two at
9-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11314>
Treasury Secretary James Baker said
that the current expansion, which he noted was in its fifth
year, will continue in the period ahead.
    He told the House Appropriations Committee that "there is
every prospect that the current expansion will continue
unabated through 1987 and the years beyond."
    Baker said interest rates over the period have continued to
decline and that "policies of the Federal Reserve assure that
ample credit was available.
    He said that the administration's longer term forecast
envisioned that "we will maintain and improve upon our progress
in bringing down the rate of inflation."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11365>
Loans and advances from the Dutch
Central Bank to the commercial banks fell 1.01 billion guilders
to 9.5 billion guilders in the week ending March 30, the Bank's
weekly return showed.
    Dealers said payments by the Dutch state, partly in the
form of civil service wages, had outweighed payments to the
State, causing the money market deficit to ease.
    The Treasury's account with the Bank dropped 960 mln
guilders to 6.5 billion guilders.
    Liabilities in gold or foreign currency rose 200 mln to
11.9 billion guilders.
    Dealers said it was more likely that the alteration in this
item on the weekly return indicated normal commercial foreign
exchange business rather than intervention by the Central Bank.
     The Bank itself does not disclose information on
intervention.
    Seasonal variation brought bank notes in circulation up 190
mln guilders to 29.7 billion guilders.
    Total gold and currency reserves rose 173 mln guilders to
56.4 billion guilders.
    Call money and period rates were barely changed in the
week. Today all were traded at 5-3/8 to 5-1/2 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11425>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange 1.5 billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a Fed spokesman said.
    Dealers said Federal funds were trading at 6-3/8 pct when
the Fed began its temporary and indirect supply of reserves to
the banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11746>
Quarter-point prime rate increases to
7-3/4 pct by Citibank and Chase Manhattan Bank today will be
followed by other banks only after they see clearer signs of
the Federal Reserve's policy intentions, economists said.
    "Based on the spread between banks' cost of funds and the
prime rate, it probably makes sense for others to follow, but
no rush is likely," said Paul McCulley of E.F. Hutton and Co.
    Citibank's surprise base rate increase, quickly followed by
Chase, sent U.S. bond prices lower and the dollar higher.
    McCulley said that once the spread between three-month
certificates of deposit and the prime rate narrows to less than
1-1/2 percentage points, there is a strong chance of a prime
rate increase. It has been under 1-1/4 points recently.
    However, banks are likely to hold rate increases until they
see what the Fed intends to do about interest rates in the near
term, analysts said. They noted that banks historically like to
follow Fed rate movements, rather than lead them. For example,
the last prime rate increase occurred in June 1984 when banks
lifted the rate to 13 pct from 12-1/2 pct after a Fed discount
rate increase in April of that year.
    Major banks had been posting a 7-1/2 pct prime rate since
last August 26/27, when they lowered the rate from eight pct
shortly after the Fed's half-point discount rate cut to the
current 5-1/2 pct level on August 20.
    "The banks will not rush to raise their prime rates. There
should be a split prime for a while with some posting a 7-1/2
pct rate and others 7-3/4 pct," said David Jones of Aubrey G.
Lanston and Co.
    Jones said the Federal Open Market Committee at today's
meeting voted no change in Fed policy. But he said the Fed may
well foster higher interest rates soon.
    Jones said that, while the FOMC probably voted no policy
change today, it may have decided to apply slight upward rate
pressure later if the dollar weakens, inflation pressures heat
up or the economy shows sign of strong recovery.
    "The Fed clearly indicated that they did not intend to
tighten policy when they did today's coupon pass," said Joseph
Liro of S.G. Warburg and Co.
    In a move that came a day earlier than most expected, the
Fed today supplied permanent reserves to the banking system by
offering to buy all maturities of Treasury notes and bonds for
its own account. This seasonal reserve add is called a "pass."
    "The Fed demonstrated that there has been no policy
change," said Elizabeth Reiners, economist at Dean Witter
Reynolds Inc. 
    She said the spread between banks' cost of funds and the
prime rate is now around 137 basis points compared with a 153
basis point average in 1986. Reiners said the spread is not
really narrow enough to present a clear need for a prime rate
increase.
    The Dean Witter economist said that today's prime rate rise
"may have been less a response to interest rates than an
attempt to enhance the (balance sheet) bottom line."
    Reiners said that, given recent problems with loans to
developing countries, large money center banks with heavy
exposures might be the first to match the higher prime rate in
an effort to get more profitable spreads on other loans.
    The Federal funds rate at which banks lend overnight money
to one another could help determine how many banks match the
higher prime rate and also how quickly they move.
    In raising their prime rates, banks cited a higher cost of
funds. In the three business days through Monday, the Federal
funds rate at which banks lend to one another averaged nearly
6-1/4 pct. But quarter end pressures helped push up funds.  
    The Fed funds rate was extremely volatile today, reflecting
demand pressure associated with the end of the quarter and the
close of the Japanese fiscal year. Funds traded between five
and 6-3/4 pct.
    Once the special distortions end, analysts said the funds
rate probably will return to its recent trading level in the
6-1/8 pct area. They said that, if it stabilizes near there,
banks may not quickly boost their prime rates.
    But a consistently higher funds rates would suggest to many
that the Fed was fostering somewhat higher interest rates to
help the dollar. Then banks would lift prime rates quickly.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11776>
The Bundesbank should take further
steps to reduce German interest rates to protect the mark from
further appreciation and to persuade investors to bring
long-term yields lower, Commerzbank AG &lt;CBKG.F> management
board chairman Walter Seipp said.
    But he told the bank's annual news conference this did not
mean a cut in leading interest rates, rather a reduction in
money market rates through bringing the allocation rates down
for Bundesbank securities repurchase agreements.
    "Leading interest rates are not the decisive rates," he said.
"The money market rates are the important ones."
    Seipp said the Bundesbank should move away from allocating
money market liquidity at a fixed 3.8 pct as it has in recent
tender allocations.
    An easier monetary policy would not mean a loss of
credibility for the Bundesbank in its containment of monetary
growth. A fall in short rates would make the public aware of
the high yields in bonds and lead to a longer-term capital
formation, braking the expansion of money supply.
    "Thus, you can have lower rates and also a normalisation of
monetary growth both at the same time," he added.
    Seipp said there were no grounds to paint too black a
picture of the German economy, since company profitability had
improved over recent years and domestic oriented firms were
profiting from cheaper imports because of the rise in the mark.
    Growth this year should be at least one pct, he said,
describing the downturn in production in the first months as a
false start, unrepresentative of the rest of the year.
    After an economic contraction in the first quarter, the
economy should show an uptrend in the last three. "We don't
believe that the economy has tipped over, but see it more as a
'growth dip,'" Seipp said.
    But Seipp also called for support for growth from fiscal
policy, saying the top rate of income and corporate tax should
be brought down to 49 pct. The current peak rate is 56 pct.
    The additional tax cuts brought forward to next January
were no substitute for support for growth.
    Seipp added the federal government should make "further
courageous steps to decrease the state's proportion of the
German economy and to increase its flexibility."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11817>
Banks in Hong Kong are likely to raise
prime rates by half a percentage point to 6-1/2 pct following a
one-quarter point prime rate increase by two major U.S. Banks
yesterday, dealers said.
    They told Reuters local banks may decide on the increase at
this weekend's routine meeting of the Hong Kong Association of
Banks.
    G.C. Goh, chief dealer of the Standard Chartered Bank, said
prime rate increases by Citibank and Chase Manhattan Bank to
7-3/4 pct from 7-1/2 may prompt Hong Kong banks to follow suit.
    Goh said local banks want to restore the prime to 6-1/2
pct, the level at beginning of 1987.
    The banks raised the prime to the current six pct from five
pct on February 28 after cutting it 1-1/2 points from 6-1/2 on
January 15 in response to upside pressure on the Hong Kong
dollar, he said.
    The medium and longer term interbank rates firmed today,
with three months ending at 5-1/16 to 4-7/8 pct against
yesterday's five to 4-13/16 close. The overnight rate, however,
fell to 3-1/2 to three pct from 4-1/2 to four because of
increased liquidity for a local stock issue.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11820>
Call money rates fell to 3.85/95 pct
from five pct yesterday in moderate trading as month end
tightness disappeared and operators took positions for April.
    Dealers said they expected rates to remain within a 3.70 to
four pct range this month. A minor tax payment period on behalf
of customers mid-month, the long Easter weekend and pension
payments were unlikely to tighten rates significantly.
    Next Wednesday, 14.9 billion marks are leaving the system
on the expiry of a securities repurchase pact. But dealers said
they expected the Bundesbank to fully replace the outflow with
a new tender at a fixed rate of 3.80 pct.
    Commerzbank AG's management board chairman Walter Seipp
called on the Bundesbank to reduce interest rates to protect
the mark through bringing the allocation rate for securities
repurchase agreements down.
    But dealers said the Bundesbank was unlikely to ease credit
policies at the moment. There was little domestic and foreign
pressure for lower rates and no signs of a change.
    Yesterday one or two large West German banks effectively
drained the domestic money market of liquidity in order to
achieve higher rates from their overnight deposits, dealers
said.
    Bundesbank figures showed banks held an average daily 50.7
billion marks in minimum reserves at the central bank over the
first 30 days of March, the exact requirement needed just one
day before the end of the month.
    Actual holdings on Monday were 42.0 billion marks.
    Because rates soared to the level of the Lombard emergency
funding rate yesterday, banks fell back on the loan facility to
draw down a high 5.3 billion marks in an attempt to meet
Bundesbank needs, the data showed.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11831>
The Indian Finance Ministry's
announcement in Parliament yesterday, changing the nation's
interest rate structure, will benefit industry and agriculture
by providing loans at lower interest, bankers and brokers said.
    The changes, effective today, included reducing commercial
bank lending rates that have ranged between 15 pct and 17.5 pct
by one percentage point.
    New rates, which affect both Indian and foreign banks, also
include a one percentage point gain, to an annual 10 pct, on
deposits of two years or more but less than five.
    Bank deposits of five years or more carrying 11 pct
interest have been abolished.
    Bankers said the interest rate modifications reflect the
government's concern to reduce the costs of borrowing and help
improve world competitiveness of Indian goods.
    There is likely to be a shift to short-term bank deposits
by long-term depositors, bankers predicted. This will create
the flexibility to draw and re-invest funds in either equity
shares or short-term bank deposits, they said.
    A merchant banker also said reduced manufacturing costs due
to lower lending rates are likely to boost the share market.
    Tata Steel, a trend setter on the Bombay Stock Exchange,
opened today higher at 1,040 rupees against yesterday's closing
of 1,012.50 rupees.
    A stockbroker said investors may be less enthusiastic now
to buy convertible and non-convertible debentures because the
Finance Ministry has reduced the annual interest rate to 12.5
pct and 14 pct respectively from 13.5 and 15 pct respectively.
    "But overall debenture prospects remain bright because the
rates of interest on them will still be higher than what banks
pay for deposits of similar maturity," a merchant banker said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11848>
Banks in Hong Kong are likely to raise
prime rates by half a percentage point to 6-1/2 pct following a
one-quarter point prime rate increase by two major U.S. Banks
yesterday, dealers said.
    They told Reuters local banks may decide on the increase at
this weekend's routine meeting of the Hong Kong Association of
Banks.
    G.C. Goh, chief dealer of the Standard Chartered Bank, said
prime rate increases by Citibank and Chase Manhattan Bank to
7-3/4 pct from 7-1/2 may prompt Hong Kong banks to follow suit.
    Goh said local banks want to restore the prime to 6-1/2
pct, the level at beginning of 1987.
    The banks raised the prime to the current six pct from five
pct on February 28 after cutting it 1-1/2 points from 6-1/2 on
January 15 in response to upside pressure on the Hong Kong
dollar, he said.
    The medium and longer term interbank rates firmed today,
with three months ending at 5-1/16 to 4-7/8 pct against
yesterday's five to 4-13/16 close. The overnight rate, however,
fell to 3-1/2 to three pct from 4-1/2 to four because of
increased liquidity for a local stock issue.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11858>
Financial markets welcomed public
spending cuts announced by Ireland's new minority government in
its budget, saying the move would lead to lower interest rates.
    Finance Minister Ray MacSharry, making cuts across the
board, reduced the Exchequer Borrowing Requirement to 1.85
billion punts, 10.7 pct of GNP, compared with 2.15 billion
punts or 13 pct of GNP last year.
    Allied Irish Banks foreign exchange dealer John Kearney
commented: "I would see interest rates coming down by two to 2.5
pct in the next three months."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11861>
The prospect that other banks will
follow industry leaders Citibank and Chase Manhattan in raising
their prime rate is likely to cast a pall over the credit
markets today, economists said.
    Bond prices had been making a smart recovery from two days
of heavy selling when Citibank surprised the market by
announcing a quarter-point increase in its prime rate to 7-3/4
pct. Chase Manhattan quickly followed.
    Prices quickly fell by a full point, even though the dollar
- the market's overriding concern of late - rose sharply on the
news.
    Citibank cited the higher cost of money, especially in the
Euromarket, as the reason for raising its prime rate.
    Part of this rise in market rates has been caused by fears
of a tighter Federal Reserve policy to defend the dollar, but
economists said it is too early to tell whether the Fed, whose
policy-making federal open market committee, FOMC, meets this
week, is already tightening its grip on credit.
    "The Fed seems to have been a bit slow in meeting the
banking system's reserve needs this statement period, but I
wouldn't conclude anything until I've seen the Fed data," said
Jeffrey Leeds of Chemical Bank.
 REUTER^M
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11900>
The Bundesbank will not hold a press
conference after its regular fortnightly council meeting
tomorrow, a spokesman said in answer to enquiries.
    Bundesbank vice-president Helmut Schlesinger will chair the
meeting, as president Karl Otto Poehl has a private engagement.
    The next meeting is scheduled for April 16.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11907>
Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co became
the third major U.S. bank to increase its prime rate to 7-3/4
pct from 7-1/2, matching a move initiated yesterday by Citibank
and Chase Manhattan.
    The bank, the main subsidiary of Manufacturers Hanover
Corp, said the new rate is effective today.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11913>
Irving Trust Co said it is raising its
prime rate to 7-3/4 pct from 7-1/2, effective immediately.
    It becomes the fourth U.S. bank to raise the rate,
following Citibank, Chase Manhattan and Manufacturers Hanover
Trust.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11934>
Chemical Bank, the main bank subsidiary
of Chemical New York Corp, said it is raising its prime lending
rate to 7-3/4 pct from 7-1/2 pct, effective immediately.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11940>
Marine Midland Banks Inc said it is
raising its prime lending rate to 7-3/4 pct from 7-1/2 pct,
effective immediately.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11941>
The Federal Home Loan Bank Board
adjusted the rates on its short-term discount notes as follows:
    MATURITY   NEW RATE  OLD RATE  MATURITY
   30-69 days  5.00 pct  5.00 pct   30-124 days
   70-88 days  5.92 pct  5.90 pct  125-150 days
  89-123 days  5.00 pct  5.00 pct  151-173 days
 124-150 days  5.93 pct  5.92 pct  174-182 days
 151-349 days  5.00 pct  5.00 pct  183-349 days
 350-360 days  5.98 pct  5.94 pct  350-360 days
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11960>
Mercantile Bancorp said its Mercantile
Bank N.A. raised its prime rate to 7-3/4 pct from 7-1/2 pct,
effective immediately.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11989>
Continental Illinois Corp said it has
raised its prime rate to 7-3/4 from 7-1/2.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12010>
The Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp
adjusted the rates on its short-term discount notes as follows:
   MATURITY   RATE       OLD RATE  MATURITY
    32 days   6.00 pct   6.10 pct   1 day
  
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12016>
The Federal Home Loan Bank Board
adjusted the rates on its short-term discount notes as follows:
    MATURITY   NEW RATE  OLD RATE  MATURITY
                         5.00 pct    30-69 days
                         5.92 pct    70-88 days
  30-123 days  5.00 pct  5.00 pct   89-123 days
 124-150 days  5.93 pct  5.93 pct  124-150 days
 151-349 days  5.00 pct  5.00 pct  151-349 days
 350-360 days  5.98 pct  5.98 pct  350-360 days
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12027>
Treasury Secretary James Baker said
he hopes yesterday's small increase in two major money center
banks' prime rate was a temporary phenomenon.
    "I hope it was a temporary blip upward," he told a House
Appropriations subcommittee.
    He said the decline in interest rates since President
Reagan took office remains "one of the significant
accomplishments, in the economic area, of this administration."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12040>
The Federal Home Loan Bank Board
adjusted the rates on its short-term discount notes as follows:
    MATURITY   NEW RATE  OLD RATE  MATURITY
                                                               
                              30-123 days  5.00 pct  5.00 pct  
30-123 days
 124-150 days  5.90 pct  5.93 pct  124-150 days
 151-349 days  5.00 pct  5.00 pct  151-349 days
 350-360 days  5.96 pct  5.98 pct  350-360 days
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12073>
Institute of International Finance
Managing Director Horst Schulmann said that his orgnaization
has been forecasting further declines of interest rates in the
first half this year and then a levelling off and there is no
reason to change that.
    Speaking to reporters, the bank research group said that
the increase in interest rates announced yesterday and other
activity in the foreign exchange markets did not indicate a
fundamental change in the outlook.
    Schulmann, speaking broadly about the global debt problem,
said that the International Monetary Fund should increase its
assistance to third world countries.
    The remarks come just before next week's meeting of the
IMF's Interim Committee and the Joint Development Committee of
the IMF and World Bank.
    In a letter to the committee's, the bank group said,
"Commercial banks cannot be the dominant supplier of balance of
payments finance."
    Schulmann said that IMF exposure peaked in 1985 and has
declined a bit since then.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12084>
Calls for a cut in Austrian interest
rates have grown in recent days but bank chiefs are divided
over the issue.
    Karl Vak, General Director of the Zentralsparkasse und
Kommerzialbank, Wien, called today for a cut of up to half a
percentage point in interest rates across the board. But Hannes
Androsch, head of Creditanstalt-Bankverein &lt;CABV.VI> told
Reuters he opposed a cut because it would hurt small savers.
    Vak told a news conference that last January's cut in
lending rates for commercial customers and for all depositors
by a quarter point had been insufficient.
    The January cut followed the National Bank's lowering of
its discount and Lombard rates by half a point in line with a
similar Bundesbank move. Prime lending rate is now 8.75 pct and
deposit rates vary between 3.25 and 5.75 pct.
    Yesterday Hellmuth Klauhs, head of the Genossenschaftliche
Zentralbank AG, said rates could fall at least a quarter of a
point, or even half a point if German rates dropped further.
    Vak noted that inflation had fallen below one pct. A
widening gap between Austrian rates and cheaper West German
credit along with forecasts of slow Austrian economic growth
this year also justified a further interest drop, he said.
    Karl Pale, head of Girozentrale und Bank der
oesterreichischen Sparkassen AG [GIRV.VI] has also called for
lower deposit rates but said lending rates should remain
unchanged at the moment. Interest margins were too small,
particularly when compared with other West European countries.
    But Hans Haumer, head of the Erste Oesterreichische
Spar-Casse-Bank told Reuters that no cut should be made unless
West German rates came down first.
    Banking sources said no bank seemed ready to lower rates
alone and supporters of a cut would have difficulty overcoming
opposition from Creditanstalt, Austria's biggest bank.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12091>
Manufacturers National Corp's
Manufacturers Bank-Wilmington said it increased the interest
rate on its no-fee variable rate MasterCard to 13.6 pct from
13.3 pct.
    The new interest rate applies to the second quarter. The
rate on the card is set quarterly.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12101>
Bankers Trust Co said it has raised its
prime lending rate to 7-3/4 pct from 7-1/2, effective
immediately.
    This move is the latest in a series of similar actions by
leading U.S. money center banks, including Citibank NA and
Chase Manhattan Bank NA, over the last 24 hours.
    AmeriTrust Corp of Ohio also raised its prime lending rate
to 7-3/4 pct from 7-1/2, effective tomorrow.     
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12102>
Boatmen's Bancshares said its
Boatmen's National Bank raised the prime rate to 7-3/4 pct from
7-1/2 pct, effective immediately.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12112>
First Wisconsin National Bank said it
has raised its prime rate to 7-3/4 pct from 7-1/2 pct,
effective today.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12122>
The new interest rate of 7/8 pct over
Libor on Venezuelan public sector debt payments goes into
effect today, Finance Minister Manuel Azpurua said .
    Azpurua told reporters yesterday the reduction from the
previous margin of 1-1/8 pct above Libor will save the country
some 50 mln dollars in debt servicing.
    The new rate is among changes agreed last month to the 20.3
billion dlr public sector debt rescheduling. Under the new
agreement, Venezula was also able to extend the term from 12 to
14 years and to lower debt payments in the 1987-89 period by 64
pct.
    Azpurua said that according to the agreement, the new
interest rate will be retroactive to April 1, provided the
accord is approved before October 1.
    He told reporters the term sheet detailing the changes in
the rescheduling has already been endorsed by the 13-member
debt steering committee and is now being sent to the country's
460 creditor banks for their approval.
    The new agreement replaces a rescheduling accord signed in
February 1986, which Venezuela asked to revise to reflect a 45
pct drop in oil revenues.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12125>
SunTrust Banks said that Sun Banks in
Florida and Trust Co banks in Georgia have raised their prime
rate to 7-3/4 pct from 7-1/2 pct.
    The company said the action is effective immediately.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12131>
First Bank Minneaplois and First
Bank Saint Paul, both units of First Bank Systems Inc, said
they raised their reference rates to 7-3/4 pct from 7-1/2 pct.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12147>
Chemical Bank, the main bank subsidiary
of Chemical New York Corp, and Marine Midland Banks Inc said
they were raising the prime lending rate to 7-3/4 pct from
7-1/2 pct, effective immediately.
    In St Louis, Mercantile Bancorp said its Mercantile Bank
N.A. was also raising its prime rate to 7-3/4 pct from 7-1/2
pct, effective immediately.
    The changes follow similar cuts yesterday by Citicorp and
Chase Manhattan.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12183>
The Federal Reserve bought about 550
mln dlrs of U.S. Treasury bills for a customer, a spokeswoman
said.
    She said the Fed bought bills maturing from May through
September 24 for regular delivery tomorrow.
    Federal funds were trading at 6-3/16 pct when the Fed
announced the operation.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12197>
&lt;Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce>
said it was lowering the interest rate on its Visa credit card
to 15.9 pct from 18.6 pct, effective with the May billing
statement.
    The bank said it was also halving its yearly Visa card user
fee to six dlrs, but would retain its 15 ct fee for each
transaction.
    A bank spokesman said the previously reported call by the
Canadian Parliament's finance committee on March 20 for a
substantial cut in credit card rates "was a factor" in the
move, but he would not elaborate.
    Canada's minister of state for finance Thomas Hockin had
threatened legislation to reduce the rates, which apply to
unpaid balances, if the financial institutions did not
voluntarily act.
    The Canadian Imperial Bank spokesman said "the bank card
market is a very competitive one and we have to move to stay
competitive."
    Canadian Imperial's new rates match those of &lt;Toronto
Dominion Bank>, which lowered its rates before the finance
committee report.
    Canadian Imperial Bank added that cardholders will be
allowed to choose between the 15 ct transaction fee or the six
dlr yearly card fee.
    It will also eliminate the 50 ct minimum monthly
transaction fee, it said.
    Minister of State for Finance, Tom Hockin, said in the
House of Commons today he was "delighted" with the bank's cut
in its credit card rate.
    "I would hope retail stores and other financial
institutions will look to their rates as well," Hockin said
during the daily question period.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12229>
Bank of New York said it raised its
prime lending rate a quarter point to 7-3/4 pct.
    It said the move is effective immediately.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12235>
Manufacturers National Bank of Detroit
said it increased its prime rate to 7-3/4 pct from 7-1/2 pct,
effective immediately.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12246>
Mellon Bank NA of Pittsburgh and
Republic Bank of Dallas have both raised their prime lending
rates to 7-3/4 pct from 7-1/2, effective immediately.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12259>
&lt;Royal Bank of Canada> said it is
raising its U.S. base lending rate by 1/4 pct to 8-1/4 pct,
effective tomorrow.
    The move is the first change in the bank's U.S. dollar base
lending rate since last August, when it lowered the rate 1/2
point.
    It follows the announcement yesterday of a 1/4 point rise
to 7-3/4 pct of two of the largest U.S. banks' prime rates.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12260>
&lt;The Harris Trust and Savings Bank> said
it has increased its prime rate to 7-3/4 from 7-1/2 effective
immediately.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12274>
TCF Banking and Savings FA said it
is raising its prime rate to 7-3/4 pct from 7-1/2 pct effective
today.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12278>
The Commodity Credit Corporation
(CCC) interest rate on loans disbursed in April will carry a
six pct ionterest rate, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.
    The April rate is up from March's 5-7/8 pct and reflects
the interest rate charged CCC by the U.S. Treasury, the
department said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12302>
Security Pacific National Bank and
Provident National Bank said they increased their prime lending
rates a quarter point to 7-3/4 pct.
    They said the move is effective immediately.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12316>
The First National Bank of Boston, the
main banking unit of Bank of Boston, said it is raising its
prime lending rate to 7.75 pct from 7.50 pct, effective
immediately.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12333>
Most major U.S. banks today matched
Tuesday's quarter-point prime rate cuts by Citibank and Chase
Manhattan Bank, the first prime rate boosts since mid-1984.
    Most cited narrower spreads between the prime and funding
costs as justification. Analysts said the prime rate rises may
have been triggered partly by a desire by banks to enhance
profit margins given problems with developing country loans. 
    Commenting on the prime rate increases, U.S. Treasury
Secretary James Baker told a House Appropriations Committee
that "I hope it was a temporary blip upward."
    Among the major banks which today announced prime rate
increases to 7-3/4 pct were Bankers Trust, Chemical Bank,
Continental Illinois National Bank, Harris Trust and Savings
Bank, Irving Trust, Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co, Marine
Midland, and Security Pacific National Bank.
    Other banking companies announcing prime rate rises
included Pittsburgh National Bank, Texas Commerce Bank-Houston,
Provident National Bank, First National Bank of Boston, Florida
Federal Savings and Loan Association, and SunTrust Banks.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12336>
The Union Bank subsidiary of
Standard Chartered PLC said today it was raising its prime
lending rate to 7.75 pct from 7.50 pct, effective immediately.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12337>
After an already steep fall in the past
week, U.S. interest rate futures may be in for further declines
in the near term, financial analysts said.
    However, some analysts said recent sharp losses in bond
futures have left the bond market somewhat oversold, and the
contracts on long-term debt could stage a recovery before
resuming their decline.
    Key to the near-term direction of futures will be the
course of the dollar, they said.
    "As the dollar goes, so goes the bond market," said Dean
Witter analyst Karen Gibbs.
    The recent decline in the dollar, which hit a 40-year low
against the Japanese yen Monday, was reversed Wednesday when
several large U.S. money center banks unexpectedly raised their
prime lending rates by a quarter point, to 7-3/4 pct.
    "Even though the prime rate cut was good for the dollar,
foreign exchange traders are not convinced the dollar decline
is over," Gibbs said.
    The dollar decline was key in recent weakness in debt
futures as it rekindled concern about a pickup in inflation.
    Indeed, the falling dollar may have been a key topic at the
meeting of the Federal Reserve's policy making arm, the Federal
Open Market Committee, this week, analysts said.
    "To the Fed, the combination of a falling dollar, a
steepening yield curve, and rising commodity prices look
suspiciously like the traces of expectations of accelerating
inflation," said Denis Karnosky, analyst at Carroll, McEntee
and McGinley Inc.
    Such expectations could mean that "a shift in policy toward
restriction of bank reserves is likely to get very serious
consideration," at the FOMC meeting, he said.
    Any such restriction of reserves will not be a highly
visible form of monetary tightening, Karnosky said.
    Rather, the key to detecting a change will be found in
seasonal and adjustment borrowing at the discount window, he
said. Borrowings have held near a weekly average of 300 mln
dlrs over the past several months, he said.
    In the meantime, however, "the market looks a bit
oversold," said Jim Wysoglad, analyst at Golden Gate Futures.
    Wysoglad said a recovery from the oversold condition could
drive June bonds to a high near 99 before falling back to test
chart support near the recent low of 97-13/32.
    Technician Leslie Keefe of Technical Data Corp of Boston
said that the key test for June bonds will be whether the
nearby contract holds above chart support at 96-24/32.
    "All previous selloffs since mid-November have stopped and
buyers have surfaced at that level," Keefe said.
    If that level is broken, and the dollar continues to
decline, Keefe said she expects the June bond contract to
decline to test support between 92 and 93, the primary uptrend
line dating back to 1984.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12396>
A world recession is unlikely this
year as fiscal and monetary policy in most industrialized
countries is supporting the economy, Deutsche Bank AG &lt;DBKG.F>
management board joint spokesman Alfred Herrhausen said.
    But growth rates will be smaller than last year, with 1.5
to 2.5 pct likely in most industrialized countries, he told a
news conference.
    Herrhausen said he was confident private consumption would
support economic growth in West Germany this year, with net
income increases turning into purchasing power as long as
inflation did not revive.
    Herrhausen said he did not expect interest rates to rise in
West Germany this year, but there was little room for further
falls. Rates in the U.S. were however rising, as evidenced by
the latest prime rate moves, but this rise would be moderate.
    Herrhausen said he did not expect any major narrowing of
the U.S. Trade and budget deficits in the next few months.
    One success of the Paris agreement in February to foster
currency stability was that U.S. Officials have stopped talking
down the dollar, he noted.
    The recent stability would last until markets decided to
test the resolve of central banks, he said.
    He noted that central banks had spent some 10 billion dlrs
this week to stabilize the dollar against the yen in the first
such test.
    "A massive attack on the mark, which could come if we get
bad news out of the U.S., Would require a much higher
intervention amount, raising the danger of inflation," he said.
    Turning to the international debt problem, Herrhausen said
Brazil's unilateral debt moratorium had surprised banks.
    But the move showed that a real solution to debt problems
was only possible with the involvement of all parties.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12398>
Westpac Banking Corp in New Zealand
said it will increase its indicator lending rate by 1.5
percentage points to 22.5 pct from April 7.
    Westpac said in a statement the increase reflects high
costs of funding.
    The bank said nervousness in the wholesale deposit market
is creating uncertainty about the immediate outlook for
interest rates. Liquidity is expected to remain tight over the
next month and this will put upward pressure on interest rates.
Base lending indicator rates of the other three trading banks
range between 21.0 pct and 21.5 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12406>
Money market rates rates showed a harder
edge after news U.K. Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson
has set a target for the pound against the mark and dollar, to
be maintained by a mixture of interest rates and intervention
in the foreign exchange markets.
    Dealers said the market was surprised by the Chancellor's
disclosure of sterling target rates, around 2.90 marks and 1.60
dlrs, and nervous over the implications for domestic interest
rates, further reducing the propects for a near term cut in
U.K. Bank base rates. The key three months interbank sterling
rate gained 1/16 point at 10 9-7/8 pct.
    The pound opened three basis points lower at 71.3 in trade
weighted terms, at around 1.59 dlrs and 2.91 marks.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12410>
The Bank of France is to inject liquidity
against first category paper at a tender this afternoon, a Bank
spokesman said.
    Money market sources were divided as to whether they
thought the Bank of France would use the occasion to cut its
intervention rate, which has stood at 7 3/4 pct since it was
cut from eight pct on March 9.
    Some thought a rate cut unlikely given foreign exchange
turbulence and the U.S. Prime rate rise to 7 3/4 pct, while
others still counted on a 1/4 point cut by the Bank of France.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12418>
Interest rates on the London money market
were slightly firmer on news U.K. Chancellor of the Exchequer
Nigel Lawson had stated target rates for sterling against the
dollar and mark, dealers said.
    They said this had come as a surprise and expected the
targets, 2.90 marks and 1.60 dlrs, to be promptly tested in the
foreign exchange markets. Sterling opened 0.3 points lower in
trade weighted terms at 71.3.
    Dealers noted the chancellor said he would achieve his
goals on sterling by a combination of intervention in currency
markets and interest rates.
    Operators feel the foreign exchanges are likely to test
sterling on the downside and that this seems to make a fall in
U.K. Base lending rates even less likely in the near term,
dealers said.
    The feeling remains in the market, however, that
fundamental factors have not really changed and that a rise in
U.K. Interest rates is not very likely. The market is expected
to continue at around these levels, reflecting the current 10
pct base rate level, for some time.
    The key three months interbank rate was 1/16 point firmer
at 10 9-7/8 pct.
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12447>
Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel
Lawson's remarks yesterday suggesting there are precise
exchange rate targets for the pound undermined sterling,
dashing hopes for an early cut in U.K. Base rates, analysts
said.
    But the market's reaction, testing exchange rate levels
indicated by Lawson, was probably overdone and the longer term
outlook for sterling remained bullish, they agreed.
    In an apparent break with the previous policy of secrecy,
Lawson told a National Economic Development Council meeting he
was comfortable with sterling exchange rates around current
levels, specifying rates of around 1.90 marks and 1.60 dlrs.
    Lawson added the U.K. Government intended to keep sterling
at about present levels, using currency intervention and
interest rates to achieve this.
    The February 22 Paris agreement of the Group of Five and
Canada to stabilise exchange rates is widely believed to
include target ranges, but all participants to the meeting had
so far refused to specify these.
    Markets were quick to react to the statement, chopping
about one U.S. Cent and over one pfennig off the pound to match
the levels mentioned by Lawson.
    But most analysts polled said they did not believe Lawson's
statement signalled a change in U.K. Policy.
    Keith Skeoch, chief economist at stockbrokers James Capel
and Co, said, "the remarks have been blown out of proportion.
Lawson is paying now for a little bit of a slip of the tongue."
    Barclays de Zoete Wedd economist Mark Brett said, "there is
nothing great and fantastic in the Chancellor's statement."
    He said he did not believe the rates indicated by the
Chancellor were precise targets, but merely represented central
rates around which sterling would be allowed to fluctuate,
perhaps by as much as 10 pct.
    "It would be insane to pinpoint an exchange rate ahead of an
election ... I don't believe Lawson is mad enough to tie
himself to a fixed rate," Brett said.
    Currency markets were keen for official statements to
clarify the scope of the Paris accord and reactivate currency
trading. This mood easily led to over-reaction, analysts said.
    "Making similar statements when the market is high strung
and ready to bounce is perhaps a mistake," one senior dealer
with a U.S. Bank said.
    Capel's Skeoch said, "it gives the foreign exchange markets
something to shoot at."
    "It is obvious that the government, as a member of the Group
of Six, has agreed exchange rate bands. But they are not cut in
stone, they can change with time," Skeoch said.
    Brett said, "we think the 2.90 marks level is a central
rate. Give or take 10 pfennigs and all is fine."
    Not all analysts played down the significance of the
remarks, however. Chris Dunn, economist at Royal Bank of
Canada, said the remarks may signal a decisive move to insulate
sterling from the fortunes of the dollar.
    Although about two-thirds of Britain's trade is conducted
with European countries, sterling has traditionally shadowed
the dollar rather than the mark, analysts noted.
    "Britain must decide whether it wants to follow the U.S. Or
throw in its lot with Europe," Dunn said.
    "It suggests that while the U.K. Is not actually applying to
join the European Monetary System, it is seeking protection by
shadowing it ... The Bundesbank has made it clear that it wants
the U.K. To clarify its position relative to the mark," he said.
    Analysts said sterling's dip on currency markets following
Lawson's remarks made an early half-point cut in U.K. Base
rates from current 10 pct levels unlikely in the short term.
    "Over the next three weeks, a cut is out, unless we get some
extremely good economic indicators," Capel's Skeoch said.
    Base rates have been cut twice by one-half point in March,
the last after the March 17 budget presentation, and analysts
had been expecting another half point cut shortly afterwards.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12453>
The Bank of England said it had provided
the money market with 345 mln stg help in the morning session.
This compares with its forecast of a shortage of around 800 mln
stg in the system today.
    The central bank made outright purchases of bank bills
comprising 58 mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct, 227 mln stg in
band two at 9-13/16 pct, 56 mln stg in band three at 9-3/4 pct
and four mln stg in band four at 9-11/16 pct.
    Dealers noted that this was the first time bills in band
four, which have a maturity of between two and three months,
have been dealt in the market since mid-February.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12456>
The Bundesbank left credit policies
unchanged after today's regular meeting of its council, a
spokesman said in answer to enquiries.
    The West German discount rate remains at 3.0 pct, and the
Lombard emergency financing rate at 5.0 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12469>
Westpac Banking Corp in New Zealand
said it will increase its indicator lending rate by 1.5
percentage points to 22.5 pct from April 7.
    Westpac said in a statement the increase reflects high
costs of funding.
    The bank said nervousness in the wholesale deposit market
is creating uncertainty about the immediate outlook for
interest rates. Liquidity is expected to remain tight over the
next month and this will put upward pressure on interest rates.
Base lending indicator rates of the other three trading banks
range between 21.0 pct and 21.5 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12470>
The Bank of Japan intervened just after
the Tokyo market opened, buying dollars at around 147.65 yen,
dealers said.
    They were unsure of the amount of the central bank's
purchasing, but it seemed to prevent the dollar from weakening
against the yen amid bearish sentiment for the U.S. Currency,
they said.
    The dollar opened at 147.65 yen against 147.20/30 in New
York and 146.90 at the close here yesterday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12471>
The Bundesbank left credit policies
unchanged after today's regular meeting of its council, a
spokesman said in answer to enquiries.
    The West German discount rate remains at 3.0 pct, and the
Lombard emergency financing rate at 5.0 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12483>
BankAmerica Corp, following moves
by other major banks, said it has raised its prime rate to 7.75
pct from 7.50 pct, effective today.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12494>
The Bank of England said it had given the
money market a further 152 mln stg assistance in the afternoon
session.
    This takes the Bank's total help so far today to 497 mln
stg and compares with its forecast of a shortage in the system
of around 700 mln stg which it earlier revised down from 800
mln.
    The central bank made outright purchases of bank bills
comprising 34 mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct, 39 mln stg in
band two at 9-13/16 pct, 51 mln stg in band three at 9-3/4 pct
and 28 mln stg in band four at 9-11/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12501>
The Bank of France said it left its
intervention rate unchanged at 7-3/4 pct when it injected funds
to the market against first category paper in todays money
market intervention tender.
    Money market dealers had earlier expressed mixed views on a
possible quarter point cut.
    The rate was last adjusted on March 9, when it was reduced
to 7-3/4 pct from the eight pct rate set in January.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12509>
First Chicago Corp said its First
National Bank of Chicago raised its prime rate to 7-3/4 pct
from 7-1/2 pct, effective immediately.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12514>
Comerica Inc said it raised its prime
interest rate to 7-3/4 pct from 7-1/2 pct, effective April 1.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12554>
The Dutch central bank announced new
12-day special advances at an unchanged rate of 5.3 pct to
cover money market tightness for the period April 3 to 15.
     The amount will be set at tender on April 3 between 0700
and 0730 hours GMT.
    The new facility replaces the current 4.2 billion guilders
of nine-day advances which expire tomorrow.
    Money market dealers said the rate for the new advances was
in line with expectations. They added they expect the Bank to
allocate between 4.0 and 4.5 billion guilders.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12571>
North Carolina Federal Savings
and Loan Association said it has raised its prime rate to 7-3/4
pct from 7-1/2 pct, effective yesterday, following moves by
major banks.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12592>
J.P. Morgan and Co Inc said it is
raising its prime lending rate to 7-3/4 pct from 7-1/2 pct,
effective today.
    Most major U.S. banks are now posting a 7-3/4 pct rate.
Citibank was the first to announce an increase on Tuesday.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12731>
Australia and New Zealand Banking
Group Ltd &lt;ANZA.S> said it will lower its Australian prime
lending rate to 18 pct from 18.25, effective April 6.
    The cut is the second announced by the bank in the last
week, following a cut from 18.5 pct effective last Monday.
    The ANZ's new rate will be the lowest prime set by the four
major trading banks and matches the rate set by one of the
smaller foreign banks in January and left unchanged during the
rise in primes over the last three months.
    Other primes range from 18.25 to 18.5 pct, including those
of the other three majors.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12732>
The Australia and New Zealand Banking
Group Ltd in New Zealand said it will raise its indicator
lending rate to 23 pct from 21.5 pct on April 7.
    A bank statement said the continuing rise in the cost of
funds had to be passed on to the lending customers.
    ANZ managing director Brian Weeks said: "Recent developments
in the money markets are of deep concern to all participants
... Market participants are understandably nervous and cautious
about future developments.
    These include flows to and from the government relating to
the privatisation of seven government departments on April 1.
    "We welcome the flexibility evident in the Reserve Bank's
move to raise the system cash target yesterday, but feel that
to reduce the present nervousness the cash target and primary
liquidity level need to be raised further...," he said.
    The Reserve Bank has raised its daily cash target to 45 mln
N.Z. Dlrs from its normal 30 mln dlrs.
    Call rates have traded as high as 65 pct this week because
of business year-end March 31 balance date book squaring.
    Westpac Banking Corp in New Zealand announced yesterday it
would increase its indicator lending rate by 1.5 percentage
points to 22.5 pct on April 7.
 REUTER



</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12741>
The Duth Central bank said it accepted
bids totalling 4.086 billion guilders at tender for the new
twelve-day special advances at an unchanged 5.3 pct.
    Bids up to 30 mln guilders were met in full, amounts above
at 40 pct.
    The new advances, covering the period April 3 to 15,
replace the current 4.2 billion guilder nine-day facility at
5.3 pct, which expires today.
    Money market dealers said the total amount allocated was in
line with expectations and would be sufficient to cover the
money market shortage for the duration of the facility.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12745>
The Bank of England said it has forecast
a shortage of around 700 mln stg in the system today.
    Among the main factors, maturing assistance and take-up of
treasury bills will drain 546 mln stg, bills for repurchase by
the market 76 mln, a rise in note circulation 310 mln and
bankers balances below target 105 mln.
    The outflow will be partly offset by 340 mln stg exchequer
transactions.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12774>
The Belgian National Bank cut interest
rates on one, two and three-month treasury certificates to 7.30
pct from 7.40 pct effective immediately, the bank said in a
telex message.
    The Bank last adjusted its short-term treasury certificate
rates on March 23, when it also reduced rates for all three
periods by 0.10 points.
    A National Bank spokesman said the latest adjustment would
bring the rates closer in line with currently prevailing
interbank interest rates.
    The spokesman said it was too early to predict whether the
move would herald a reduction in discount rate, which currently
stands at eight pct, when the Bank holds its regular weekly
meeting at which the rate is discussed next Wednesday.
    The discount rate generally moves in tandem with the
three-month treasury certificate rate. However, there is no
formal link and the discount rate was not adjusted following
the March 23 changes.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12789>
The Bank of England said it has operated
in the money market this morning, purchasing 170 mln stg bank
bills. This compares with the Bank's revised estimate of a 750
mln stg shortfall. In band two the Bank bought 72 mln stg at
9-13/16 pct, in band three 52 mln at 9-3/4 pct and in band four
46 mln at 9-11/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12810>
The top accepted rate of discount at the
weekly U.K. Treasury bill tender rose to 9.5261 pct  from
9.3456 pct last week.
    Applications at the lowest accepted price of 97.625 stg
 were allotted around 81 pct of the amount applied for, and
 applications above that price were allotted in full, the Bank
 of England said.
    A total of 100 mln stg of Treasury bills was offered for
sale this week.
    Last week, the average rate of discount was 9.3157 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12812>
The Bank of England said it has revised
its estimate of today's shortfall to 800 mln stg from 750 mln,
before taking account of 170 mln stg morning assistance.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12819>
The Bank of England said it has operated
in the money market this afternoon, buying back bills totalling
347 mln stg. This brings the total help so far today to 517 mln
stg and compares with the Bank's revised estimate of an 800 mln
stg shortfall.
    The central bank purchased in band one 20 mln stg at 9-7/8
pct, in band two 254 mln at 9-13/16 pct, in band three 66 mln
at 9-3/4 pct and in band four seven mln stg at 9-11/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12840>
The Bank of England said it has provided
around 205 mln stg late assistance to the market, bringing the
total help today to 722 mln which compares with the Bank's
revised deficit forecast of 800 mln stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12846>
The average rate of discount at today's
U.K. Treasury bill tender rose to 9.5195 pct from 9.3157 pct
last week, the Bank of England said.
    This week's 100 mln stg offer of 91-day bills met
applications of 327 mln stg, the bank said.
    Applications for bills dated Monday to Friday at the top
accepted rate of discount of 9.5261 pct were allotted about 81
pct.
    Next week 100 mln stg of Treasury bills will be offered,
replacing 100 mln stg of maturities.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12880>
The Federal Home Loan Bank Board
adjusted the rates on its short-term discount notes as follows:
    MATURITY   NEW RATE  OLD RATE  MATURITY
  30-273 days  5.00 pct  5.00 pct    30-89 days
 274-294 days  5.92 pct  5.83 pct   90-100 days
 295-344 days  5.00 pct  5.00 pct  101-181 days
 345-360 days  5.93 pct  5.82 pct  182-195 days
                         5.00 pct  196-274 days
                         5.90 pct  275-295 days
                         5.00 pct  296-360 days
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12891>
The Bank of Spain said it raised its rate
for overnight call money to 14.5 pct from 14 pct with immediate
effect at today's daily auction for assistance funds.
    The move followed comments yesterday by central bank
governor Mariano Rubio, who said money supply growth was too
fast.
    The bank said later that it was leaving its rate for
special assistance funds from its second window unchanged at 16
pct, surprising operators who had expected an increase there
too.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12908>
The Student Loan Marketing
Association said its rates on short-term discount notes were as
follows:
    MATURITY   NEW RATE    OLD RATE  MATURITY
    5-14 days  5.65 pct    5.60 pct     5-14 days
   15-78 days  5.00 pct    5.00 pct    15-81 days
   79-85 days  5.83 pct    5.75 pct    82-88 days
  89-360 days  5.00 pct    5.00 pct   89-174 days
                           5.85 pct  175-180 days
                           5.00 pct  181-360 days
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12912>
The Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp
adjusted the rates on its short-term discount notes as follows:
   MATURITY   RATE       OLD RATE  MATURITY
    31 days   5.95 pct   6.00 pct  32 days
  
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12919>
The Federal Home Loan Bank Board
adjusted the rates on its short-term discount notes as follows:
    MATURITY   NEW RATE  OLD RATE  MATURITY
  30-273 days  5.00 pct  5.00 pct   30-273 days
 274-294 days  5.90 pct  5.92 pct  274-294 days
 295-344 days  5.00 pct  5.00 pct  295-344 days
 345-360 days  5.93 pct  5.93 pct  345-360 days
                        
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12923>
The Federal Reserve is expected to take
no reserve-management action in the U.S. Government securities
market during its usual intervention period, economists said.
    They said that, if the Fed does act, it will likely add
temporary reserves indirectly by arranging one to 1.5 billion
dlrs of customer repurchase agreements.
    Federal funds, which averaged 6.14 pct yesterday, opened at
5-15/16 pct and remained there in early trading. Analysts
believe this probably is about where the Fed wants the funds
rate to be.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13008>
The Federal Home Loan Bank Board said
home mortgage rates fell from early February to early March to
their lowest point in nine years, but the rate of decline was
slower than it had been in recent months.
    The bank board said the average effective commitment rate
for fixed-rate mortgages for single family homes and a 25 pct
loan-to-price ratio with a maturity of at least 15 years was
9.48 pct in early March.
    The rate was four basis points lower than a month ago, only
one-eighth the size of decline in the previous month, the bank
board said.
    Rates for adjustable-rate mortgages decline eight basis
points from early February to 8.43 pct in early March, the bank
board said. The drop was far less than the 15 basis point
decline in the previous period, the agency said.
    The average effective interest rate on all loans closed by
major mortgage lenders declined nine basis points from early
February to early March, the agency said. The fall brought the
rate to 9.14 pct was the lowest since December 1977, it said.
    The effective rate for ARMS was 8.39 pct, 15 basis points
below a month earlier. For fixed-rate loans it was 9.36 pct, 14
basis points below a month earlier, the agency said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13024>
The White House said the rise in
interest rates was "unfortunate in a general sense" but reflected
market forces.
    "There's always movement up and down and the basic fact is
that we believe the economy is strong and growing and there
will always be fluctuations in the interest rate, but the
economy is sound and in good shape," spokesman Marlin Fitzwater
said.
    Citibank raised its prime rate by one quarter of a point
and the move was followed by other banks.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13105>
Bank of Montreal said it will reduce the
interest rate it charges on outstanding MasterCard balances to
18.3 pct from 21 pct, beginning in July.
    The bank said it will continue its policy of not charging
any annual fee or transaction fees to credit card holders.
                
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13144>
Treasury Secretary James Baker
reiterated his hope that this week's rise in prime rates would
be a temporary blip upwards.
    "I would hope that it would simply be a temporary blip
upward as we've seen in the past," Baker said in television
interview with the Cable News Network. The interview airs
tomorrow but CNN released extracts from his remarks today.
    Baker also repeated his position that the reaction of
financial markets to U.S. tariffs on Japanese electronic goods
showed "the importance of the United States not going
protectionist. The markets were telling us...be careful."
 reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13231>
Hongkong and Shanghai Banking Corp and
Standard Chartered Bank raised their prime rate one-half point
to 6.5 pct, effective Tuesday, the Association of Banks said.
    The association said in a statement deposit rates have also
been increased by 1/4 to 1/2 percentage point.
    The banks last announced an adjustment on February 28 when
they raised the prime rate by one point to six pct.
    The deposit interest rates are now savings and 24 hours two
pct, seven-day call, one week and two weeks 2-1/4 pct, one
month and two months 2-3/4 pct, three and six months 3-1/4 pct,
nine months 3-1/2 pct and 12 months four pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13262>
National Australia Bank Ltd &lt;NABA.S>
said it lowered its benchmark prime lending rate to 18.25 pct
from 18.5, effective today, but left its base rate at 18.5.
    The benchmark reduction brings the rate into line with the
prime rates of most of Australia's trading banks, including
those of two of the other three major trading banks.
    However, the rate is above the 18 pct - the lowest ruling
rate - set by the other major, the Australia and New Zealand
Banking Group Ltd &lt;ANZA.S>, on Friday and effective today.
    The benchmark is based on short-term interest rate
movements while the base rate is tied to longer-term trends.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13321>
&lt;Chase-AMP Bank Ltd> said it will lower
its prime lending rate to 17.75 pct from 18.25, effective
tomorrow.
    The bank is the first to lower its prime rate below the 18
pct set by a few banks in the last few days in a continuation
of a downward trend which began late last month.
    Other prime rates range from 18.25 to 18.5 pct, with the
majority on 18.25.
    The bank said the reduction reflected the recent downturn
in money market rates, the improved economic outlook and
adequate liquidity in the second quarter tax rundown period.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13543>
&lt;Chase-AMP Bank Ltd> said it will lower
its prime lending rate to 17.75 pct from 18.25, effective
tomorrow.
    The bank is the first to lower its prime rate below the 18
pct set by a few banks in the last few days in a continuation
of a downward trend which began late last month.
    Other prime rates range from 18.25 to 18.5 pct, with the
majority on 18.25.
    The bank said the reduction reflected the recent downturn
in money market rates, the improved economic outlook and
adequate liquidity in the second quarter tax rundown period.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14270>
Federal Reserve Board Chairman Paul
Volcker said that he did not believe there was a connection
between the Fed's policies and the recent rise in the prime
interest rate by most major U.S. banks.
    Asked by reporters following testimony before the Senate
Banking Committee whether the Fed had anything to do with the
rise to 7-3/4 pct in the prime, he replied, "not that I was able
to detect."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14293>
There is no consensus so far among
industrial countries on an agreement providing debt relief for
the world's poorest nations, a senior U.S. Treasury official
said.
    The official said, "There has not been a consensus reached
yet," when asked about reports the Paris club of western
creditors had agreed to long-term stretch outs of African debt
at concessional interest rates.
    The official, briefing reporters on this week's semiannual
IMF meetings, said the issue would be discussed this week and
the U.S. had an open mind on the proposal but it did object to
concessional interest rate relief.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14642>
(La Confederation des Caisses
Populaires et d'Economie Desjardins), the Quebec credit union
group, said it is lowering the interest rate on unpaid balances
on its Visa credit card to 15.9 pct from 18.0 pct, effective
with June billing statements.
    The move follows cuts in credit card interest rate charges
by several Canadian banks.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2022>
The Bank of England said it had given the
money market 206 mln stg of assistance this afternoon and
offered the discount houses borrowing facilities to take out
the rest of the 1.10 billion stg shortage, revised down from an
initial 1.15 billion estimate.
    It made no alteration to its established dealing rates,
buying 95 mln stg of band one bank bills at 10-7/8 pct and 111
mln of band two bank bills at 10-13/16 pct. This brings the
Bank's total assistance so far today to 243 mln stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2064>
Bankers welcomed the Bank of Spain's
decision to raise the reserve requirement for banks and savings
banks, saying it reflected the socialist government's
determination not to ease up in the fight against inflation
despite the painful social effects of four years of austerity.
    The central bank last night raised the requirement by one
percentage point to 19 pct from March 13, saying that excess
liquidity threatened money supply and inflation targets.
    Bankers said the move represented a change of tactic by the
Bank, which until now has relied on raising interest rates to
choke off money supply growth.
    "I think it's a good measure," a senior foreign banker said.
"It's a faster way to get the job done than using interest rates
and avoids unpleasant effects on other areas of the economy."
    "It shows that the political will is very strong. They know
that controlling inflation will make industry more competitive
and bring down unemployment in the long run," he added.
    The head of another foreign bank said that only a month
ago, the Bank of Spain had dismissed his suggestion of a rise
in reserve requirements, preferring to pursue its strategy of
raising interest rates.
    But bankers said the high real interest rates on offer now
-- around eight pct for overnight funds -- was attracting money
from abroad, strengthening the peseta and making Spanish
exports less competitive.
    The government says industry's competitiveness is also
being hit hard by inflation. At 8.3 pct last year, the rate was
way above that of Spain's major trading partners in the
European Community, which it joined a year ago.
    To help meet this year's target of five pct, it is
insisting pay rises stay at that level, setting the stage for
clashes with trade unions, who say they have made enough
sacrifices.
    Demonstrations by workers, students and farmers, whose
demands essentially involve more government spending, have
become an almost daily occurrence. But Prime Minister Felipe
Gonzalez insists that the state is doing as much as it can.
    Bankers said the reserve requirement increase could have
some impact on commercial lending rates but should not hit the
money market too hard.
    The Bank of Spain, which only yesterday raised its key
overnight call money rate to 13.5 pct, left it unchanged at
today's auction. The rate has been increased nine times since
the start of the year, when it was below 12 pct.
    Bankers said commercial lending rates were set to rise in
any case with the end of the six pct maximium interest rate
banks can offer for time deposits of up to six months.
    The measure will take effect tomorrow, following the
publication of the decree in today's official gazette. Bankers
say the liberalisation will increase the cost of funds and,
inevitably, push lending rates higher.
    A companion measure, reducing the proportion of funds which
banks must invest in specific areas, also takes effect
tomorrow. Officials said when the cut was approved last month
that it was aimed partly at compensating banks for higher
interest rates.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2155>
The Federal Reserve is not expected to
intervene in the U.S. government securities market to add or
drain reserves, economists said.
    Most economists said they did not expect the Fed to add
reserves with Federal funds trading below six pct.
    They said the funds rate's softer tone may indicate that
the need to add reserves in the current bank reserve
maintenance period is smaller than previously estimated.
    Fed funds opened at 5-15/16 pct and remained at that level.
Yesterday funds averaged 6.01 pct.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2228>
The Bank of England again fought against
money and bond market pressure for a pre-Budget interest rate
cut, leaving the pound to take the strain with a further rise
in its trade-weighted index to a six-month high.
    It closed at its best level since September 12, at 71.4 pct
of its 1975 value on the index, as foreign investors continued
to buy into a currency which offers high relative returns and
the possibility of short-term capital gains, dealers said.
    Meanwhile, opinion is divided over whether the Bank can
stop a cut before Budget Day, March 17, and why it should want
to.
    The Bank's latest strong signal to the market that it wants
rates to stay steady for the moment came in midafternoon, when
it lent to the discount houses at a penal rate of 11-3/4 pct to
relieve a money market shortage.
    "They're really making the discount houses suffer," said
Stephen Lewis, economist at brokerage house Phillips and Drew.
"Eleven and three-quarters pct is way above money market rates."
    This money market signal was apparently not accompanied by
any sterling sales on the foreign exchanges, talk of which had
inhibited strong rises yesterday and Tuesday, so buyers came
strongly into the pound.
    The pound surged to a high of 1.5798/808 dlrs at the London
close, up from the previous finish at 1.5650/60, and 2.8900/60
marks, up from 2.8720/50.
    "If this pressure keeps up...There is a possibility that
rates could drop before the Budget," said Jeremy Hale, economist
at finance house Goldman Sachs International Corp.
    Some gilt traders are forecasting a half-point cut in the
base rate from the current 11 pct as early as tomorrow.
    However, analysts said the Bank of England will need to be
convinced that the present rise is a fundamental re-rating
rather than a result of short-term speculative gains.
    There are valid reasons for the Bank to be cautious, said
Peter Fellner, U.K. Economist at brokers James Capel and Co.
    Markets have become highly optimistic about the chances of
a Conservative Party victory in any early general election, and
disappointment if Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher decides to
hold back could lead to a decline in the pound and a setback
for bonds, Fellner said.
    An election could be delayed until mid-1988, but most
forecasts say it will be this year.
    Others note that the pound could yet prove vulnerable to
oil price losses or a change of fortune for the dollar.
    However, analysts agree the Bank is largely trying to set
the timing of a cut than holding out against one altogether.
    The authorities traditionally prefer a single sustainable
rate move, one way or the other, to half points here and there.
    Some add the Bank will be influenced by signs that at least
a proportion of the latest bout of sterling buying is long-term
capital coming into the London market, notably from Japan.
    They argue that the pound is being perceived as a safer bet
than the dollar, given the latters recent sharp falls and
current political upheavals in Washington.
    The Bank may want to see another few points on the
trade-weighted index before the Budget, argued Lewis. "But by
then sterling should be firm enough to satisfy even the Bank of
England," he added.
    The Bank declined to comment on its reasons for resisting
pressure for a rate move before the budget, but banking sources
said the authorities see the recent rise in sterling as more
than just marking up by foreign exchange traders.
    Meanwhile, analysts noted the market ignored potentially
harmful news on the trade front, today's figures showing that
the current account deficit in 1986 was 1.1 billion stg.
    This was above previous estimates of the current account
deficit and compares with a surplus of 2.9 billion stg in 1985.
    Fellner said that under more normal conditions this would
have given the bond and currency markets a pause, but that they
were too bullish to worry about such fundamentals.
    The guessing game over the timing of a cut has the clearing
banks divided as well as the markets. Privately, some bank
officials forecast the Bank will hold out at least for this
week, but at least one bank says a rise is possible tomorrow.
If a move comes before March 17, forecasts are for a half-point
cut, with another half or full point about Budget day.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2576>
The Bank of England said it provided
assistance worth 350 mln stg during the afternoon session which
takes total help so far today to 446 mln stg against a shortage
estimated at around 550 mln stg.
    The central bank purchased outright bank bills comprising
120 mln stg in band one at 10-7/8 pct and 227 mln stg in band
two at 10-13/16 pct. It also bought treasury bills worth one
mln stg in band one and two mln stg in band two at the same
rates of interest as bank bills.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2601>
The Dutch central bank announced new
eleven-day special advances at an unchanged 5.3 pct to aid
money market liquidity, covering the period March 9 to 20.
    The amount will be set at tender on Monday March 9 between
0800 and 0830 GMT. The new facility will replace the current
4.8 billion guilders of seven-day advances expiring Monday.
    Money dealers estimated today's money market shortage at 11
to 11.25 billion guilders, barely changed from yesterday.
    They said call money was still relatively high at 6-1/8 to
6-1/4 pct as a result of the tight set of bids accepted by the
Bank for the previous seven-day facility.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2626>
The Federal Reserve is unlikely to
operate in the U.S. government securities market during its
usual intervention period this morning, economists said.
    Fed funds opened comfortably at 5-15/16 pct and remained at
that level. Yesterday Fed funds averaged 5.99 pct.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2683>
The Federal Reserve entered the
government securities market to arrange one billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a spokesman for the New York
Fed said.
    Fed funds were trading at 5-15/16 pct at the time of the
indirect injection of temporary reserves, dealers said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2697>
The French primary bond market is showing
signs of renewed effervescence after several weeks of lethargy
and the trend is expected to continue if hopes of imminent
interest rate cuts are fulfilled, market operators said.
    The Bank of France is generally expected to give a signal
to the market, possibly at the beginning of next week, by
announcing a quarter point cut in its intervention rate, which
has stood at eight pct since January 2, or in its seven-day
repurchase rate, set at 8-3/4 pct since January 5.
    The central bank's averaged-out day to day call money rate,
the reference rate for interbank money market operators, which
reached 8-3/4 pct on February 18 has fallen to 7-3/4 pct this
week, dealers noted.
    The Bank of France's "open market" policy to regulate the
money markets since December has been based on a floor and
ceiling of rates within the limits of its intervention and
seven day repurchase rates.
    For the moment the sentiment is of "wait and see" on rate
cuts, but there are now more optimists than pessimists among
market operators, a dealer for a major French bank said.
    Dealers said there is abundant liquidity on the bond
market, noting that this week's monthly Treasury tap issue of
11.87 billion francs had a good reception and was fairly easily
absorbed.
    The Treasury had set an upper limit on the issue of 12
billion francs and was likely to continue to try and sell as
much paper as it could over coming months to meet its borrowing
needs for this year of around 150 billion, one banker said.
    Dealers said there was no difficulty in placing liquidity
in the primary market at the moment despite competition from
the surge in investments on the Paris stock exchange.
    There has been a flood of large bond issues, but with
formulas well adapted to market conditions and investor demand
- with warrants or a mix of fixed and floating-rates - which
have been snapped up, and with generally broadly negative fees.
    Dealers pointed to the recent Caisse d'Aide a l'Equipement
des Collectivites Locales (CAECL) 8.90 pct two billion franc
bond with warrants exchangeable for floating-rate bonds issued
over 13 years and 80 days at 97.04 pct with payment date March
9, which was today quoted at -0.90 to -1.10 pct.
    Even classic fixed-rate issues, after being neglected since
the end of last year, are finding buyers, one banker said.
    Dealers said that now the question was to see how the terms
of imminent operations would be set, with great market interest
focussed on the likely three next issues.
    These will include an expected four to five billion franc
issue for Electricite de France, to be followed by a bond of
around one billion francs for Auxiliaire du Credit Foncier, a
subsidiary of the banking group Credit Foncier de France, and a
new issue by tender from the mortgage agency Caisse de
Refinancement Hypothecaire.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2709>
The Belgian government, which
introduced large-scale public spending reductions last year,
has been told by an International Monetary Fund team there is
scope for further cuts in 1988.
    The suggestion is contained in the preliminary conclusions
of the annual IMF consultations with Belgium on its economic
policy, a copy of which was distributed to journalists at the
weekly press conference following meetings of the cabinet.
    The IMF team also urges Belgium to adopt a firm interest
rate policy, with a particular emphasis on long-term rates.
    The team's report to the government praises last year's
spending cuts, which are due to reduce 1987 government spending
by 195 billion francs, and says 1986 saw the Belgian economy
perform "better, on a broader basis, than at any time so far in
the 1980s."
    However, it adds that with lower inflation, stabilisation
of the debt to gross national product ratio requires a much
lower budget deficit than the seven pct of GNP target the
government has set itself for 1989.
    The government's net financing requirement was 11.0 pct of
GNP in 1986.
    The report says "The most that can be afforded over the next
few years is a zero growth of real non-interest expenditure of
general Government."
    It says there is a need for a revision of the Belgian tax
system to iron out distortions and meet hopes of a reduced tax
burden but substantial progress is needed in stabilising the
debt to GNP ratio before this is possible.
    "Because of the difficulty of sustaining zero expenditure
growth and of likely growing impatience (for) tax reductions,
we feel that your position would be stronger if you could
decide on rather sharp expenditure reductions in 1988," the
report adds.
    The IMF urges a strong interest rate policy to signal the
government's determination to keep its currency strong and to
curb inflation.
    It says firmer long-term rates would slow private net
long-term capital outflows, which increased strongly in 1986.
    It also urges net repayments of foreign currency debt and
an overhaul of domestic capital markets to facilitate the
subscriptions by non-residents of government bond issues in
Belgian francs.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2725>
This week's Bank of England resistance to
strong market pressure for lower interest rates succeeded in
holding bank base rates at 11 pct.
    But at a cost of threatening the Chancellor of the
Exchequer Nigel Lawson's policy, stated at the end of the Paris
Group of Six meeting last month, that he wanted to see sterling
broadly stable about then prevailing levels, market sources
said.
    Since then, the pound has risen to 71.8 pct on its closing
trade-weighted index, up from 69.7 pct imediately after the
Paris meeting and up 0.4 on the day.
    Today's peak at 72.0 pct was its highest since August 19.
    A Treasury spokesman said Lawson had said he neither wanted
a substantial rise or fall in sterling. The question is
therefore how large a rise he is ready to see before acting.
    Paul Temperton, chief economist at Merrill Lynch Europe
Ltd, estimated that the government wanted to see the
trade-weighted index about 72-73 pct. "Even after this action
over the last few weeks, sterling's only just within striking
distance of that range," he said.
    Other analysts agree that the government probably has some
broad target range around this area.
    However, they said Lawson would be prepared to see the
pound go higher at least in the short term, despite the risk of
a loss of export competitiveness and cheaper prices on imports.
    "If the Bank of England keeps the interest rates as they
are, what's to stop it (going higher)," said John Cox, executive
director of EBC Amro Bank Ltd, a major operator on the London
foreign exchange market.
    Cox estimates that the Bank of England has been active
selling sterling over the past few days, despite the lack of
general market talk of such intervention, and this has helped
keep it below 1.60 dlrs.
    The pound rose to 1.5870 dlrs from 1.5764 yesterday and
1.5400 February 23, the day after the Paris meeting.
    But Cox says the government must be worried with sterling
heading toward 2.95 marks and would be very concerned if it
holds around these levels.
    He warned the Bank may run the risk of missing the interest
rate boat. "If rates don't come down, the market will say they
ought to have come down and will sell sterling," he said.
    Most dealers agree there is a good deal of "hot money" being
invested in sterling, money simply attracted by high overnight
or one-week rates, which could flow out at equally short
notice.
    However, the authorities will hope that at least a
proportion of the buying reflects long-term investment.
    "The last thing they want to do is reduce them (rates) and
have to jack them back up again," said Richard Jeffrey,
economist at brokerage house Hoare Govett Ltd.
    He said a half point cut would ensure continued support for
sterling, at least in the near term.
    However, most analysts are still looking for a full point
about March 17, Budget Day.
    The Bank must hold out until it sees the reaction to the
Budget, said Temperton.
    The Budget is widely forecast to be a vote winner in the
run-up to a general election, the major factor behind current
bullishness in the government bond and currency markets.
    "Lawson wants to delay a cut in base rates until the budget.
He wants it to be crowned with the glory of an interest rate
cut," said Ian Harwood, economist at Warburg Securities, the
equities arm of Mercury International Group.
    Speculation a clearing bank might break ranks and lead the
way lower were confounded today. There was excitement a fall in
the weekly Treasury Bill rate to 9.7 pct from 10.2 pct last
Friday might mean the Bank had changed its mind.
    This followed the imposition of penal lending rates of 11
3/4 pct on the discount houses yesterday, and was the lowest
since base rates were at 10 pct, early last October.
    However, with this Bill rate pertaining to three-months
money, banking sources said the market could not take the cut
as a guide to the Bank's intentions on short term rates.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2925>
Higher oil prices and stronger than
expected U.S. employment growth led to sharp losses in U.S.
interest rate futures and diminished what had been a positive
chart outlook, financial analysts said.
    The increase of 319,000 in non-farm payroll employment
during February was above market expectations for a rise of
170,000 to 200,000 jobs and sparked selling in Treasury bond
futures that drove the June contract through key technical
support at 101-2/32 at the opening Friday, they noted.
    "I don't like that fact that we had a close below 101,"
said Prudential Bache analyst Fred Leiner. The 101-2/32 level
in the June bond contract had been the top of a three-month
trading range, which when penetrated during the rally Wednesday
led to bullish forecasts by chartists.
    But analysts called it a false breakout on the weekly
charts when the June bond closed at 100-10/32 Friday.
    Some also forecast that the high of the week at 101-19/32
may signal a bearish double top formation portending steep
losses.
    "I tend to go along with the double top scenario," said
Northern Futures analyst Eileen Rico.
    Rico noted that the possible formation, along with the fact
that the rally of the last two weeks in bond futures has
occurred on relatively low volume, were negative signals.
    Despite what could be a negative chart outlook, Leiner
remains cautiously optimistic, and June bonds should find
support between 100 and 99-16/32 next week.
    The optimistic outlook, as well as Leiner's expectation
that the yield curve will flatten in the near term, is based on
an improving inflation outlook.
    With the dollar stable and economic data giving the Federal
Reserve little room to ease monetary policy, "the inflation
outlook is improving," Leiner said, and that should lead to
relatively stronger bond prices than bill and Eurodollar
prices.
    Still, Leiner noted that the recent rise in oil prices
remains a concern for the inflation outlook.
    Oil rose during the week on reports that OPEC nations were
maintaining production quotas and official prices, and got an
extra boost Friday due to the suspension of oil exports from
Ecuador after an earthquake Thursday.
    "The runup in crude oil will be a short-lived phenomenon,"
said Carroll McEntee and McGinley analyst Brian Singer.
    The rise in oil prices over the past week has been largely
"media induced," Singer said. He noted that even though OPEC
production may be within quotas, "oil stocks are at
tremendously high levels."
    Although the Ecuador situation could cause a delay, oil
prices will eventually decline to the lows of late February, he
said, and that will be a supportive influence for bond prices.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2952>
The Hong Kong Association of Banks
said it decided to leave interest rates unchanged at today's
regular weekly meeting.
    Current rates are 1-3/4 pct for savings accounts, 24-hours,
seven-day call, one-week and two-weeks. One-month is 2-1/4 pct,
two-months 2-1/2 pct, three- and six-months are both three pct,
nine-months 3-1/4 pct and 12-months 3-3/4 pct.
    Prime rate is six pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2966>
The yield on 30-day bankers security
deposit accounts issued this week by the Saudi Arabian Monetary
Agency (SAMA) fell to 5.84073 pct from 6.21950 last Saturday,
bankers said.
    SAMA increased the offer price on the 900 mln riyal issue
to 99.51563 from 99.48438. One-month interbank riyal deposits
were quoted today at 6-1/4, six pct.
    SAMA offers a total of 1.9 billion riyals each week in 30,
91 and 180-day paper to banks in the Kingdom.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2979>
Increased federal government borrowing
needs and a growing unwillingness by foreign investors to buy
mark assets could push yields in German public authority bonds
higher this year, bond market sources say.
    "At the moment we have a sideways movement in the short-term
rates. But how rates move in the long end will depend strongly
on foreigners," one portfolio manager for a large securities
investment house in Frankfurt said.
    The sources also said the government had already stepped up
its borrowing programme in anticipation on increased needs.
    Friday's loan stock was the third this year already, the
sources noted. It carried a 10-year maturity, a coupon of six
pct and price of 100-1/4 to yield 5.97 pct at issue.
    This compared with the last issue which had a 5-3/4 pct
coupon priced at 99-3/4 pct for a yield of 5.75 pct.
    But dealers said the terms were not enough to attract
foreign investors, and the federal government would have to
push yields higher in future if it wanted to borrow again soon.
    Sources noted federal government issues had also increased
in size, with the introduction of a four billion mark volume
only starting last May.
    One finance ministry economist said "It isn't more. It's
just the size (of each bond) which has increased." He added
conditions in the capital market currently remained fairly
favourable for raising new debt.
    Until recently, federal issues sold very strongly abroad,
with up to 90 pct of some being placed with foreign investors.
    With the recent stabilisation of the U.S. Dollar, however,
foreign investors have begun to back away from the market, as
hopes of further currency gains in marks diminish.
    Sources said the government has may have already stepped up
its borrowing, having raised more than 18 billion marks.
    The government made net borrowings of 23 billion marks in
1986. But Bundesbank statistics showed that net borrowing
through bonds was 26.6 billion.
    The sources said this indicated a move by the government
out of other types of debt to gain access to foreign funds
through the more acceptable loan stock form.
    Although new credit needs were partly inflated by a large
amount of issues maturing recently, other factors, including
the government's tax reduction program, would also reduce
income next year. "The problem here will be the tax reform," the
portfolio manager said.
    He added that the government's cut in its top income tax
rate to 53 pct from 56 pct in 1988 would make it difficult for
the government to reduce borrowings.
    The sources said the government would fall far short of
covering all of its 40 billion marks in lost revenue from the
tax reform by making expenditure cuts and would be forced to
fall back on debt markets in one form or the other.
    The portfolio manager noted that besides the three federal
government loan stocks so far this year, it has also fallen
back twice to raise a total 6.43 billion marks through the
issue of fixed-rate medium-term "Kassenobligation" notes.
    A finance ministry economist said the government did not
expect to have any trouble keeping to its plan to borrow only a
net 22.3 billion marks this year.
    Though many sources agreed, they added that the trend would
probably not continue next year as the further tax cuts come
into effect.
    "I would expect the efforts for a further tax reform would
mean government borrowing will increase," the manager said.
    Bond prices last week were slightly firmer on balance, with
the Bundesbank's public authority bond yield calculation
falling to 5.64 pct on Friday from 5.66 a week earlier.
    But sources said foreign demand for the new federal
government loan stock was slack, as sentiment grows that the
dollar may now rise against the mark.
    "The demand wasn't so good," a dealer for a German bank in
London said.
    The dollar's recent slight appreciation against the mark
even meant that foreign investors have sold mark bonds
recently, some dealers said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2996>
The Dutch central bank said it has
accepted bids totalling 6.5 billion guilders at tender for new
eleven-day special advances at 5.3 pct covering the period
March 9 to 20 aimed at relieving money market tightness.
    Subscriptions to 500 mln guilders were met in full, amounts
above 500 mln at 35 pct.
    The new facility replaces old seven-day advances worth 4.8
billion guilders at the same rate.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3002>
The Bank of France said it invited offers
of first category paper today for a money market intervention
tender.
    Money market dealers said conditions seemed right for the
Bank to cut its intervention rate at the tender by a quarter
percentage point to 7-3/4 pct from eight, reflecting an easing
in call money rate last week, and the French franc's steadiness
on foreign exchange markets since the February 22 currency
stabilisation accord here by the Group of Five and Canada.
    Intervention rate was last raised to eight pct from 7-1/4
on January 2. Call money today was quoted at 7-11/16 7-3/4 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3007>
National Westminster Bank Plc said it has
cut its base lending rate  0.5 percentage points to 10.5 pct
today.
    National Westminster said that it was responding to general
easing in money market rates.
    Its move followed a signal from the Bank of England earlier
this afternoon that it would endorse a half point cut in the
base rate, a surprise move following its strong signals last
week that such a move would be premature.
    However, since then the pound has continued to gain
strongly.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3020>
Bundesbank president Karl Otto Poehl
told a closed investment symposium that West Germany could cut
leading interest rates again if the United States makes a
similar move, banking sources said.
    The sources were reporting Poehl's remarks at a symposium
in Duesseldorf last week organised by Deutsche Bank Ag. Press
representatives were not invited.
    The sources, speaking separately, said Poehl told about 200
bankers in reply to questions that a cut in U.S. Interest rates
would give room for a matching measure in Germany.
    "It was a definite hint at lower German interest rates," said
one banker who attended the symposium.
    A Bundesbank spokesman said the central bank would have no
comment on the reported remarks, made at the private meeting.
    But, according to a second source, who also declined to be
identified, Poehl's comments were seen by bankers present as a
direct pointer to further moves by the central bank to defend
German industry from an additional revaluation of the mark.
    "He said if the Americans drop their interest rates then the
Bundesbank would also drop them. He said that quite clearly,"
the second source said.
    In reply to questions, Poehl also said the half-point cut
in the discount and Lombard rates on January 22 came after the
U.S. Had signalled it would be prepared to attend a meeting to
discuss the level of the dollar on condition Germany made such
a move in advance, the sources said.
    Asked if American authorities could have been persuaded, by
cuts in German rates, to come to the bargaining table as early
as last September, one of the sources quoted Poehl as saying,
"No, they wouldn't have been. We checked that."
    The Paris meeting of the Group of Six industrial nations
took place exactly one month after the German cut in rates.
    Poehl emphasised in his comments the very close talks
between central banks before and after the G-6 meeting, saying
that financial markets had not fully realised the significance
of the Paris session and the U.S. Agreement to stem further
falls in the value of the dollar, the sources said.
    For the first time all participants at the summit agreed
that a further fall in the dollar would be harmful for all
world economies, including the U.S., Poehl had said.
    The sources said the tone of Poehl's comments boosted
growing sentiment that the dollar would be stabilised around
current levels by international central bank cooperation.
    One source said Poehl's remarks also underlined the fact
that the Bundesbank was now more prepared to be accommodative
in monetary policy in order to prevent a further slowdown in
West Germany's economic growth.
    Poehl and other Bundesbank officials have in the past
stressed that the German central bank had no direct
responsibility for growth and was solely concerned with
combatting inflation.
    This led, for instance, to the introduction of a tighter
monetary stance from the beginning of December until the
half-point cut in rates in late January.
    The sources quoted Poehl as saying that the current
overshooting of the German monetary target would not directly
respark inflation. The Bundesbank was not obliged to react
immediately whenever such overshooting occurs.
    Latest data for central bank money stock, the Bundesbank's
main measure of money supply, showed the measure was growing at
7-1/2 pct in January, outside its three to six pct 1987 target.
    Share prices rose in very active trading today, with
dealers reporting that Poehl's remarks, coupled with a bullish
outlook on stock prices from Deutsche at the same symposium,
brought in strong bargain hunting at current low levels.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3043>
National Westminster Bank Plc said it has
cut its base lending rate  0.5 percentage points to 10.5 pct
today.
    National Westminster said it was responding to general
easing in money market rates.
    Its move followed a signal from the Bank of England earlier
this afternoon that it would endorse a half point cut in the
base rate, a surprise move following its strong signals last
week that such a move would be premature.
    However, since then the pound has continued to gain
strongly.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3044>
The Bank of England said it provided the
market with further assistance during the afternoon, buying
bills worth 166 mln stg at the lower rates introduced this
morning.
    It bought 45 mln stg of local authority bills plus 27 mln
stg of bank bills in band one at 10-3/8 pct together with 94
mln stg of band two bank bills at 10-5/16 pct.
    The bank also revised its estimate of the market shortage
up to 300 mln stg from 250 mln this morning. It has given total
assistance of 213 mln stg today.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3068>
The Bank of France said it cut its money
market intervention rate to 7-3/4 pct from eight pct when it
injected money against first category paper.
    The bank also cut its seven-day repossession rate to 8-1/2
pct from 8-3/4 pct.
    The intervention rate has stood at eight pct since it was
raised from 7-1/4 pct on January 2 as the French franc came
under pressure ahead of the EMS realignment on January 11.
    The bank said the purchase, effective tomorrow, is for five
pct of private paper and fixed rate Treasury bills maturing
between March 25 and June 25 and of other Treasury bills
maturing between March 25, 1987 and March 25, 1989.
    The rate cut had been expected since the bank announced a
money market intervention tender earlier today.
    Money market dealers said conditions seemed right for a
quarter percentage point cut, reflecting an easing in the call
money rate last week, and the French franc's steadiness on
foreign exchange markets since the February 22 currency
stabilisation accord here by the Group of Five and Canada.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3092>
Barclays Bank Plc &lt;BCS.L> and Midland
Bank Plc &lt;MDBL.L> said they are cutting their base lending
rates to 10.5 pct from 11 pct. The cuts follow a similar move
by National Westminster Bank Plc &lt;NWBL.L>
    The rate changes take effect tomorrow.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3103>
Barclays Bank Plc &lt;BCS.L> and Midland
Bank Plc &lt;MDBL.L> said they are cutting their base lending
rates to 10.5 pct from 11 pct. The cuts follow a similar move
by National Westminster Bank Plc &lt;NWBL.L>
    The rate changes take effect tomorrow.
    The base rate reductions came after the Bank of England cut
its dealing rates this morning in a signal to the money markets
that it would not resist a half percentage point drop in bank
base lending rates, market sources said.
    Until the end of last week, the central was holding out
staunchly against market pressures for lower rates in an
apparent effort to preserve the expected rate cuts for around
the time of the government's annual Budget on March 17.
    Sterling remained firm around 1.59 dlrs compared with its
close here on Friday at 1.5865 dlrs.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3111>
The Bank of England said it was taking
onto its books a further one billion stg tranche of 8-3/4 pct
Treasury Loan stock due 1997, payable 40 stg pct on
application. The stock was issued to the Bank at 96.50 stg pct
and will be available for dealings from March 11, with the
remainder of the amount payable on May 5. The Bank said the
bonds would yield 9.28 pct at the issue price and would be free
of tax to residents overseas. The issue would be designated
8-3/4 pct Treasury Loan 1997 "B."  A further 100 mln stg was
reserved for the National Debt Commissioners.
    The market dropped by up to 1/2 point following the Bank's
announcement, with the Treasury 13-1/2 pct stock due 2004/08
quoted one full point lower at 134-12/32 stg pct around 20
minutes after the news.
    Dealers said the announcement had to be viewed against the
backdrop of intense pressure for lower U.K. Interest rates
which had built up over the past two weeks as a result of
sterling's strength.
    The Bank this morning finally signalled it was prepared to
see lower rates and U.K. Clearing banks this afternoon
announced cuts in their base lending rates to 10.5 pct from 11
pct.
    The Bank had initially been reluctant to countenance a rate
cut because, dealers said, the authorities had wished to delay
a reduction until around the time of the U.K. Budget on March
17, thereby preserving the full impact of Chancellor of the
Exchequer Nigel Lawson's package of measures.
    However, in the face of sterling's apparently inexorable
climb, the authorities today decided to cede to pressure and
allow a half-point cut.
    Today's one billion stg tap issue was viewed by the market
as a move by the Bank to eradicate hopes for a further early
rate cut which might arise as a result of strong sterling.
    Most market participants believe that Lawson will now
foster a further half point interest rate reduction at the time
of the budget, although one or two said they would not be
surprised to see a full point decline at this stage.
    Dealers noted that as part of the authorities' attempts
last week to ease pressure for lower rates, the Bank had issued
a one billion stg tap stock with a view to subduing the
Government bond market.
    To the surprise of most participants, the issue was sold
out within hours of becoming available for trading and the
market pushed on to register further sharp gains.
    Dealers said that at this stage it seemed unlikely that the
issue announced today would be absorbed by the market as
rapidly as last week's.
    However, they noted that although sterling had edged down
from its highs following the base rate cut, it had still closed
on a trade-weighted basis at 72.4, well ahead of Friday's final
71.8 and only just beneath the peak of 72.5 touched at 1300
GMT.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3121>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
intervene in the government securities market to add temporary
reserves via customer repurchase agreements, economists said.
    Most economists said the Fed will add 1.5 to two billion
dlrs of temporary reserves via customer repurchase agreements,
but some said there is a slim chance the Fed will inject
permanent reserves via three-day system repurchase agreements.
    Federal funds opened at 6-1/16 pct and firmed to 6-1/8 pct
in early trading. Funds averaged six pct on Friday.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3122>
Barclays Bank Plc &lt;BCS.L> and Midland
Bank Plc &lt;MDBL.L> said they are cutting their base lending
rates to 10.5 pct from 11 pct. The cuts follow a similar move
by National Westminster Bank Plc &lt;NWBL.L>
    The rate changes take effect tomorrow.
    The base rate reductions came after the Bank of England cut
its dealing rates this morning in a signal to the money markets
that it would not resist a half percentage point drop in bank
base lending rates, market sources said.
    Until the end of last week, the central was holding out
staunchly against market pressures for lower rates in an
apparent effort to preserve the expected rate cuts for around
the time of the government's annual Budget on March 17.
    Sterling remained firm around 1.59 dlrs compared with its
close here on Friday at 1.5865 dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3128>
Lloyds Bank Plc &lt;LLOY.L> said it is
cutting its base lending rate to 10.5 pct from 11 pct,
effective tomorrow.
    The reduction follows similar moves from the three other
British clearing banks.
    National Westminster Bank Plc &lt;NWBL.L> led the way this
morning after the Bank of England lowered its dealing rates in
a signal that it would tolerate a half percentage point
reduction.
    The central bank's surprise signal followed its strenuous
efforts last week to prevent market forces from bringing down
base rates before the U.K. Budget on March 17.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3131>
Lloyds Bank Plc &lt;LLOY.L> said it is
cutting its base lending rate to 10.5 pct from 11 pct,
effective tomorrow.
    The reduction follows similar moves from the three other
British clearing banks.
    National Westminster Bank Plc &lt;NWBL.L> led the way this
morning after the Bank of England lowered its dealing rates in
a signal that it would tolerate a half percentage point
reduction.
    The central bank's surprise signal followed its strenuous
efforts last week to prevent market forces from bringing down
base rates before the U.K. Budget on March 17.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3133>
Lloyds Bank Plc said it is cutting its
base lending rate to 10.5 pct from 11 pct, effective tomorrow.
    The reduction follows similar moves from the three other
British clearing banks.
    National Westminster Bank Plc led the way this morning
after the Bank of England lowered its dealing rates in a signal
that it would tolerate a half percentage point reduction.
    The central bank's surprise signal followed its strenuous
efforts last week to prevent market forces from bringing down
base rates before the U.K. Budget on March 17.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3137>
A half point cut in base lending rates
was announced by the big four clearing banks today after the
Bank of England finally endorsed such a move following weeks of
downward pressure, dealers said.
    During its routine intervention in the market, the bank
trimmed the rates at which it deals with the discount houses by
half a point and National Westminster led the other clearing
banks in reducing its base rate to 10-1/2 pct from 11 pct.
    The timing of the Bank of England move took operators by
surprise after its recent action seemingly designed to dampen
hopes of a base rate cut ahead of the U.K. Budget on March 17.
       For some time, fundamentals have
led the market to push for a one point cut in base lending
rates to 10 pct but the central bank has declined to follow
wholesale money market rates down.
    Although political considerations -- the government's wish
to see a fall in base rates coincide with the Budget -- had
been suggested by operators last week as reasons for the Bank's
delaying action, worries about the real strength of sterling
and perhaps about the market's reaction to the content of the
Budget may have been behind the central bank's caution, dealers
said.
    In the event, sterling continued firm after the rate cut,
leaving the market still looking for another half point fall.
    Consequently, rates in the money market eased during the
day, one-month interbank sterling shedding 5/16 point to
10-9/16 7/16 and three-months trading 1/16 point down at
10-5/16 3/16 pct. Sterling cd's were similarly down between
5/16 point in one month and 1/8 point in one year.
    Overnight interbank money for tomorrow was indicated at
around 11 pct, almost a point below the levels ruling at the
end of last week. Today, overnight touched a high of some
11-3/4 pct after the Bank took out 228 mln stg of an estimated
300 mln stg shortage.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3164>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange 2.5 billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a Fed spokesman said.
    Dealers said Federal funds were trading at 6-3/16 pct when
the Fed began its temporary and indirect supply of reserves to
the banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3192>
The World Bank intends to bring
borrowing forward into the first half of 1987 because it
expects global interest rates to rise by year end, World Bank
vice president and treasurer Eugene Rotberg said.
    He told a news conference that rates in the U.S., Japan,
West Germany and Switzerland were near their lows. "The weight
of opinion is (that in a year from now) there is a higher
probability there will be one pct higher than one pct lower
interest rates," he said.
    The World Bank had not issued floating rate notes so far
this year because of the expectation of higher interest rates.
    The policy of the World Bank was to maintain liquidity at a
level that gave the bank flexibility to decide when, where and
how much to borrow, Rotberg said.
    Cash in hand was now about 50 pct of the next three years'
anticipated net requirement and comprised 25 pct of outstanding
debt and 66 pct of its debt maturing within five years.
    Although the World Bank had pioneered the swap market, it
did not intend to launch new financial instruments just for the
sake of innovation, Rotberg said.
    Of a total of 74.5 billion dlrs debt outstanding, only some
eight billion had been swapped into another currency.
    Many recent innovations were either unfair to investors or
unfair to borrowers. Until the World Bank was confident that
this was not the case, it would not adopt new instruments.
    The World Bank would raise 90 pct of the funds needed over
the next year with methods used before, Rotberg said. However,
for some 10 pct of new requirements the bank would try out new
instruments such as bonds with warrants.
    The World Bank had publicly offered 60 bonds in Germany
since the first issue was launched in 1959, he said.

</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3219>
&lt;Citibank NA> said it has cut its British
base lending rate to 10.5 pct from 11 pct, with effect from
tomorrow.
    This move follows similar cuts by four major British
clearing banks, led by National Westminster Bank Plc &lt;NWBL.L>.
    Lower rates were signalled by the Bank of England this
morning in an attempt to curb recent upward pressure on the
pound, market sources said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3253>
The U.S. Treasury's weekly auction is
expected to produce an average rate of 5.63-65 pct for
three-month bills and one of 5.59-61 pct for six-month bills,
dealers said.
    Shortly before auction time on the new bills, the rate on
the outstanding three-month bills was unchanged at 5.64 pct
bid, while the rate on the six-month bills was one basis point
higher at 5.68 pct bid.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3283>
Two new eurosterling bonds were launched
today, making a total of 10 new deals in the sector so far this
month, as borrowers rush to cash in on a bull sterling market
fueled by the strength of the pound and pre-budget euphoria.
    The Bank of England finally gave way to a 1/2 point cut in
banks' base lending rates earlier today, but dealers said this
had been largely discounted and was not likely to detract from
the current popularity of sterling-denominated investments.
    "Sterling, in any shape or form, is flavor of the month and
we're set to see many more eurosterling deals," one dealer said.
    Today's new eurosterling bonds were a 10-year, 100 mln stg
deal for Sweden at 9-1/2 pct and priced at 101-1/4 pct, lead by
Baring Brothers and Co Ltd and a 14 year 60 mln stg convertible
deal for Storehouse Plc launched by SBCI International Ltd. "We
thought we saw a proverbial flood of new deals with the 14 we
had last month but it seems March will beat February hands down
with 10 already," one eurosterling specialist said.
    "Optically, psychologically, these single figures are much
more attractive for the borrower. Eurosterling looks like a
cheap and attractive way to raise your money," he added.
    This accounts for the wide variety of borrowers who have
tapped the sector recently, ranging from sovereigns such as the
Kingdom of Sweden today, continental banks including
Commerzbank and Deutsche Bank and British corporations.
    Another U.K. Merchant bank analyst noted that the current
vogue for eurosterling enabled several corporate borrowers last
month to offer paper priced below comparative gilt yields.
    A Storehouse official confirmed that the issue was aimed at
Swiss and German investors who were showing good interest.
    This is the first entry into the long term international
capital markets by Storehouse, British designer Terence
Conran's retail conglomerate which incorporates U.K. Chain
stores Mothercare, British Home Stores and Habitat.
    "We have been considering the move for quite some time now
and the current strength of the eurosterling sector provided
the perfect opportunity and spur for us to finally tap the
market," Lance Moir, corporate treasurer at Storehouse Plc told
Reuters.

</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3292>
Central bankers said they
were generally satisfied with the response to the Paris accord
two weeks ago to stabilize currencies at around current levels.
    Speaking after a meeting at the Bank for International
Settlements (BIS), which reviewed the agreement, they also
welcomed interest rates cuts in France and today's drop in
British rates.  One top official said the rate cuts would help
to stimulate growth generally in Europe and welcomed that
countries other than West Germany were seen to be helping
sustain the economy. 
    The central bankers, who spoke on the condition they not be
named, said the meeting of governors from the Group of 10
countries also heard a report from Michel Camdessus, the new
managing director of the International Monetary Fund, on the
IMF's latest assessment of the debt crisis. In particular, they
discussed Brazil's debt moratorium.
    But there was no sense of urgency, they said, and Brazil
had made no appeal for bridging loans from the BIS or central
banks.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3360>
The Federal Home Loan Bank Board said
interest rates on both fixed rate and adjustable rate home
mortgage loans were down substantially in early February.
    The bank board said the average effective commitment rate
for fixed mortgages with a maturity of at least 15 years for
new home purchases dropped to 9.54 pct in early February, a 30
basis point decline from early January.
    The commitment rate on adjustable rate mortgages declined
by 16 basis points in the same period bringing the average rate
to 8.5 pct, the bank board said.
    The average effective interest rate on all loans closed by
major lenders declined 27 basis points from early January to
9.26 pct in early February, the lowest rate since March 1978,
the bank board said.
    The average effective rate for fixed mortgages was was 9.51
pct, down 30 basis points from the early January level. The
average effective rate for adjustable rate mortgages declined
22 basis points to 8.61 pct, the bank board said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3371>
The U.S. Treasury said its weekly
auction of three-month bills produced an average rate of 5.63
pct, with a 5.59 pct rate on six-month bills.
    These rates compared with averages of 5.47 pct for the
three- and 5.51 pct for the six-month bills sold last week.
    The bond-equivalent yield on three-month bills was 5.81
pct. Accepted bids ranges from 5.61 pct to 5.64 pct and 29 pct
of the bids at the high, or stopout rate, were taken. For six
months, the yield was 5.85 pct and the bids ranges from 5.56
pct to 5.60 pct with 30 pct of the bids accepted.
    The Treasury said it received 30.9 billion dlrs of bids for
the three-month bills, including 1.0 billion dlrs in
non-competitive bids from the public. It accepted 6.6 billion
dlrs of bids, including 2.2 billion dlrs from the Federal
Reserve and 9.1 mln dlrs from foreign and international
monetary authorities.
    Some 25.7 billion dlrs in bids for six-month bills were
received, including 785 mln dlrs in non-competitives. The
Treasury accepted 6.6 billion dlrs, including 1.9 billion dlrs
from the Fed and 942 mln dlrs from foreign and international
authorities.
    The average price for the three-month bills was 98.577 and
prices ranged from 98.574 to 98.582.  The average price for the
six-months bills was 97.174, and prices ranged from 97.169 to
97.189.
    The average yield on the three-month bills was the highest
since 5.66 pct on Feb 17. The average yield on the six-month
bills was the highest since 5.70 pct on Feb 17.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3449>
Bank of Japan governor Satoshi Sumita
said there is little room left for the central bank to further
ease its credit policy as interest rates levels are now
approaching their lower limit.
    "The government should instead seek ways of making the best
use of its fiscal policy," he told a press conference.
    His remarks were concerned with a comprehensive economic
stimulative package the government plans to adopt in the coming
days.
    At the recent talks among the six major industrialised
nations in Paris, Japan promised to work out a comprehensive
economic package to boost domestic demand, which in turn would
help increase its imports and reduce its trade surplus.
    Sumita also said the economy will show a gradual upturn in
the second half of the year if the yen remains stable.
    He said there is caution in the foreign exchange market
against a further rise of the yen and mark and this explains
the recent stability in the currency markets. Conflicting
economic indicators from the U.S. Have also been dampening
market activity, he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3493>
A tight money market has pushed
interest rates on three to six month time deposits to between
15 and 18 pct from 13 to 15 pct a month ago, bankers said.
    March is usually a tight month for the money market because
of tax payments and banks' need to attract funds for their
year-end accounts on March 31.
    This year the situation has been made worse by December's
rush to buy dollars by companies and businessmen who feared
imposition of exchange controls. Much of that outflow has yet
to be converted back into rupiah.
    "A lot of small money has come back in, but the big money is
holding out until after April," one U.S. Banker said.
    The tight money policy of Bank Indonesia, the central bank,
is helping to keep rates high.
    Short-term lending rates now average 25 pct a year, with no
prospect they will be lowered soon, the bankers said.
    Central Bank governor Arifin Siregar said earlier this week
that Indonesia could look forward to better economic prospects
in 1987/88, but added the "speculators" who led a run on the
rupiah late last year could again pose problems.
    Indonesia holds general elections on April 23, the first in
five years, and most businessmen expect no new government
economic packages or incentives before then.
    "Some people are nervous about what the government will do
after the election," one banker said. "They normally try to do
things before the IGGI (Inter-Governmental Group on Indonesia)
meeting (in June) to prove they are doing something about the
economy to show they deserve a couple of billion dollars."
    The IGGI, which groups 14 industrialised donor countries
and four agencies, gave Indonesia 2.5 billion dlrs in soft
loans and grants last year.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3524>
The Bank of Spain has extended the
reserve requirement for banks to their convertible peseta funds
in an attempt to curb speculation in short-term capital which
is currently fuelling money supply growth.
    In a statement issued late last night, the central bank
said convertible peseta accounts, funds which are not subject
to exchange controls, would also be subject to a 19 pct reserve
requirement with effect from Friday.
    Convertible peseta funds had been previously exempt from
reserve requirements.
    The measure comes one week after the central bank raised
reserve requirements on domestic deposits by one percentage
point to 19 pct, also with effect on Friday.
    Banking sources say the high real interest rates on offer
now -- around eight pct for overnight funds -- have attracted a
large influx of speculative foreign capital which is
threatening the government's monetary targets.
    They say this influx is largely responsible for Spain's
principal measure of money supply, the broad-based liquid
assets in public hands (ALP), to have grown by an estimated 17
pct annualised rate in February, compared with January's 8.3
pct rise and an 11.4 pct rise during the whole of 1986. The
target for 1987 is eight pct.
    The Bank of Spain today did not provide assistance funds to
banks in a move to drain excess liquidity from the money
market. Liquidity will be further tightened by the fortnightly
Treasury Bill auction tomorrow and Friday's hike in reserve
requirements, expected to absorb over 200 billion pesetas from
the system.
    The immediate reaction was a hike in interbank interest
rates today to 13.75/14.00 pct from yesterday's 13.46 pct
average for deposits.
    Bank of Spain officials said this was an understandable
response "given that the market is short of funds."
    But banking sources noted that a continued rise in interest
rates would neutralize the central bank's attempts to curtail
short-term speculation with foreign funds by making the Spanish
money markets more attractive.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3528>
Bank of Japan governor Satoshi Sumita
said there is little room left for the central bank to further
ease its credit policy as interest rates levels are now
approaching their lower limit.
    "The government should instead seek ways of making the best
use of its fiscal policy," he told a press conference.
    His remarks were concerned with a comprehensive economic
stimulative package the government plans to adopt in the coming
days.
    At the recent talks among the six major industrialised
nations in Paris, Japan promised to work out a comprehensive
economic package to boost domestic demand, which in turn would
help increase its imports and reduce its trade surplus.
    Sumita also said the economy will show a gradual upturn in
the second half of the year if the yen remains stable.
    He said there is caution in the foreign exchange market
against a further rise of the yen and mark and this explains
the recent stability in the currency markets. Conflicting
economic indicators from the U.S. Have also been dampening
market activity, he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3534>
The U.S. is urging reluctant
commercial banks to seriously consider accepting a novel
Philippine proposal for paying its interest bill and believes
the innovation is fully consistent with its Third World debt
strategy, a Reagan administration official said.
    The official's comments also suggest that debtors' pleas
for interest rate concessions should be treated much more
seriously by the commercial banks, in cases where developing
nations are carrying out genuine economic reforms.
    In addition, he signaled that the banks might want to
reconsider the idea of a "megabank," where Third World debt would
be pooled, and suggested the administration would support such
a plan, even though it was not formally proposing it. At the
same time, however, the official expressed reservations that
such a scheme would ever get off the ground.
    The Philippine proposal, together with Argentine
suggestions that "exit bonds" be issued to end the troublesome
role of small banks in the debt strategy, would help to
underpin the flagging role of private banks within the plan,
the official said in an interview with Reuters.
    "All of these things would fit within the definition of our
initiative as we have asked it and we think any novel and
unique approach such as those should be considered," said the
official, who asked not to be named.
    In October 1985, Washington outlined a debt crisis strategy
under which commercial banks and multilateral institutions such
as the World Bank and the International Monetary Fund (IMF)
were urged to step up lending to major debtors nations.
    In return, America called on the debtor countries to enact
economic reforms promoting inflation-free economic growth.
    "The multilaterals have been performing well, the debtors
have been performing well," said the official. But he admitted
that the largest Third World debtor, Brazil, was clearly an
exception.
    The official, who played a key role in developing the U.S.
Debt strategy and is an administration economic policymaker,
also said these new ideas would help commercial banks improve
their role in resolving the Third World debt crisis.
    "We called at the very beginning for the bank syndications
to find procedures or processes whereby they could operate more
effectively," the official said.
    Among those ideas, the official said, were suggestions that
commercial banks create a "megabank" which could swap Third World
debt paper for so-called "exit bonds" for banks like regional
American or European institutions.
    Such bonds in theory would rid these banks of the need to
lend money to their former debtors every time a new money
package was assembled, and has been suggested by Argentina in
its current negotiations for a new loan of 2.15 billion dlrs.
    He emphasised that the "megabank" was not an administration
plan but "something some people have suggested."
    Other U.S. Officials said Japanese commercial banks are
examining the creation of a consortium bank to assume Third
World debt. This plan, actively under consideration, would
differ slightly from the one the official described.
    But the official expressed deep misgivings that such a plan
would work in the United States.
    "If the banks thought that that was a suitable way to go,
fine. I don't think they ever will."
    He pointed out that banks would swap their Third World
loans for capital in the megabank and might then be reluctant
to provide new money to debtors through the new institution.
    Meanwhile, the official praised the Philippine plan under
which it would make interest payments on its debt in cash at no
more than 5/8 pct above Libor.
    "The Philippine proposal is very interesting, it's quite
unique and I don't think it's something that should be
categorically rejected out of hand," the official said.
    Banks which found this level unacceptably low would be
offered an alternative of Libor payments in cash and a margin
above that of one pct in the form of Philippine Investment
Notes.
    These tradeable, dollar-denominated notes would have a
six-year life and if banks swapped them for cash before
maturity, the country would guarantee a payment of 7/8 point
over Libor.
    Until now, bankers have criticised these spreads as far too
low. The talks, now in their second week, are aimed at
stretching out repayments of 3.6 billion dlrs of debt and
granting easier terms on 5.8 billion of already rescheduled
debt. The country, which has enjoyed strong political support
in Washington since Corazon Aquino came to power early last
year, owes an overall 27.8 billion dlrs of debt.
    But the official denied the plan amounts to interest rate
capitalisation, a development until now unacceptable to the
banks. "It's no more interest rate capitalisation than if you
have a write down in the spread over Libor from what existed
before," the official said in comments suggesting some ought to
be granted the rate concessions they seek. "Some people argue
that (cutting the spread) is debt forgiveness... What it really
is is narrowing the spread on new money," he added.
    He said the U.S. Debt strategy is sufficiently broad as an
initiative to include plans like the Philippines'.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3539>
Jamaica agreed in principle with its
bank advisory committee on a rescheduling of 181 mln dlrs of
foreign commercial bank debt falling due between 1987 and 1989,
the Jamaican Information Service said.
    Repayments on the debt will be stretched out over 12 years
with 8-1/2 years' grace at 1-1/4 percentage points over the
London Interbank Offered Rate, Libor. The margin on previously
restructured debt also will be cut to 1-1/4 point from 2-1/2.
    The package should save Jamaica about 3.3 mln dlrs a year.
    Prime Minister Edward Seaga, who led the Jamaican
delegation, called the terms very favourable to his country.
    The agreement in principle with the bank advisory committee
led by the Bank of Nova Scotia &lt;BNO.TO> comes five days after
Jamaica successfully concluded a 125.5 mln dlr rescheduling
accord with the Paris Club of creditor nations.
    That pact in turn followed the International Monetary Fund
(IMF)'s approval on March 5 of a 85 mln special drawing rights
standby arrangement and a 40.9 mln sdr drawing under the
compensatory financing facility.
    Of Jamaica's foreign debt of 3.3 billion dlrs only 12 pct
is owed to commercial banks, and Seaga yesterday reaffirmed the
government's policy of not seeking new bank loans.
REUTER...^M
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3542>
Brazil's central bank governor
Francisco Gros will meet senior commercial bankers here today
in a new attempt to defuse the anger generated by the country's
unilateral suspension of interest payments on 68 billion dlrs
of foreign commercial bank debt, bankers said.
    Gros will meet representatives of Citibank, the head of
Brazil's bank advisory committee, and of co-heads Morgan
Guaranty Trust Co and Lloyds Bank Plc.
    High on the agenda will be banks' complaints about Brazil's
accompanying freeze on some 15 billion dlrs of short-term trade
and interbank lines, the bankers said.
    Brazil's several hundred creditor banks worldwide agreed
last March to extend the credit lines until March 31, 1987, as
part of a 31 billion dlr financing package.
    Bankers said the looming expiry of this commitment, coupled
with Brazil's freeze, raised a spate of technical and legal
questions that the banks want to discuss with Gros.
    They said they face problems because of the freeze
requirement that any payment due to be made by a Brazilian bank
under the trade facility must be deposited instead with the
central bank. This means foreign bankers cannot easily switch
their credit lines from one borrower to another.
    The requirement to deposit with the central bank has also
meant Brazilian banks have been able to negotiate lower
interest-rate spreads, because foreign banks would rather
accept a reduced margin than see their money deposited with the
central bank.
    "It's caused a lot of ill-will with the banking community,"
one banker said.
    Gros is also expected to brief the banks on the results of
a 10-day tour of Europe and Japan that he and finance minister
Dilson Funaro have just completed to seek official support for
Brazil's debt stance.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3702>
Bankers Trust Co said it raised its
broker loan rate to 7-1/4 pct from seven pct, effective
immediately.
    U.S. Trust Co, which also quotes its broker loan rate
publicly, is posting a 7-1/2 pct rate.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3762>
U.K. Interest rates look set to move
lower even after Monday's half-point cut in bank base rates to
10-1/2 pct, analysts said, citing as evidence the suspension of
a British National Savings issue yesterday.
    The Department of National Savings, effectively a Treasury
Department unit, yesterday suspended its 32nd issue, launched
in October and paying a high tax-free 8-3/4 pct on five-year
private investments between 25 and 5,000 stg. A spokesman said
the suspension was just a reaction to yields on national
savings bonds being way out of line with the rest of the
market.
    The move was followed by a surprise sell-out within minutes
today of a Bank of England one-billion stg tap issue, the
second such issue in as many weeks, analysts noted.
    They said the near-instant sale of the entire new gilts
issue, for which the Bank of England had required a high 40 pct
downpayment, was clear evidence that the market thought rates
had to drop sooner rather than later.
    The sale of the tranche of 8-3/4 pct treasury bonds due
1997 occurred in an active, bullish gilts market as downward
pressure on money market rates remained intact, with the
bellwether three-month interbank rate down 1/8 point at
10-9-7/8 pct.
     It coincided with another strong sterling rally which
pushed the pound to four-year highs against the dollar.
    "That government stock disappeared very quickly indeed," said
Stephen Lewis, head of economic research at stockbrokers
Phillips and Drew; "It is an indication that the market believes
rates are going to fall further ... At least by a half-point
immediately after the budget (on March 17), and some people
hope for more."
    Stockbrokers James Capel said in a comment the move by the
National Savings Department was "of considerable significance."
    It said, "the real message ... Is that the decks are being
quickly cleared so as to facilitate a speedy decision by the
building societies to cut their rates when the inevitable cut
in bank base rates to 10 pct materialises."
    Building societies have said a drop in bank base rates
would normally have to exceed half a point to give rise to a
reduction in mortgage lending rates.
    Lewis of Phillips and Drew said he too believed the
National Savings issue suspension may reflect new U.K. Treasury
policy to point building societies towards a mortgage rate cut.
    "National Savings has been competing too effectively with
the building societies of late. Building society income has
been depressed in recent months," he said.
    He and other analysts said Chancellor of the Exchequer
Nigel Lawson was keen to see mortgage rates fall to keep a lid
on U.K. Inflation.
    Underlying upward pressure on prices is stronger in Britain
than in most other Western economies with inflation seen rising
well above four pct this year and above five pct in 1988 after
last year's 3.7 pct.
    Emphasising the impact of mortgage rates on consumer
prices, Lewis said a one-point cut in building society rates
would reduce inflation in Britain by about 0.4 pct.
    But Lewis and others noted that building societies had been
complaining to the government about intense competition from
National Savings, which they argued reduced the scope for early
mortgage rate cuts.
    "The Chancellor need not be worried about losing some PSBR
funding from National Savings, but he must be taking the
building societies' criticism to heart. It looks like the
National Savings move reflects this," one senior dealer said.
    A Savings Department spokesman refused to comment on this
interpretation, saying the suspension of the issue was merely a
reaction to the recent fall in U.K. Interest rates, which had
pushed yields on national savings bonds way out of line with
the rest of the market.
    "We are not politically motivated ... Funding was just
becoming too expensive and we don't need all that money," he
told Reuters, adding the department had suspended issues at
least twice in the past, when offered interest rates were above
or below market rates.
    He said demand for the issue had risen sharply of late as
U.K. Money market rates continued their steady decline and
income was threatening to overshoot an unofficial three billion
stg target set for fiscal 1986 ending March 31.
    In the first 10 months of fiscal 1986, National Saving's
contribution to government funding totalled 2.72 billion stg,
compared with 2.01 billion stg in the same period of the
previous year, official figures show.
    Figures for February, out on Monday, are expected to show a
further increase of between 300 and 400 mln stg, pushing the
total for 11 months above target, government officials said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3825>
Two major U.K. Clearing banks announced
they will offer a total of 800 mln stg in new mortgages at a
fixed interest rate of 10.2 pct for the first three years,
below current bank base lending rates of 10.5 pct.
    Midland Bank Plc &lt;MDBL.L> said it has initially allocated
500 mln stg for home loans at this rate, while Lloyds Bank Plc
&lt;LLOY.L> will offer 300 mln stg.
    Earlier this week, Midland said it would cut its standard
rate of mortgage payment to 11.5 pct from April 1, following a
half a percentage point reduction in leading banks' base
lending rates from 11 pct.
    Building society and other bank mortgage rates are largely
still well above the new base rate level, although last year
Lloyds offered a fixed rate of 9.9 pct on certain home loans.
    A Midland spokesman said his bank calculated that at the
current level of 2.7 billion stg, its existing mortgage book
accounts for about 5 pct of the total British home loan market.
    Lloyds said it has 3.6 billion stg in outstanding mortgage
loans, but had not estimated its total market share.
    Among other major clearing banks, Barclays Plc &lt;BCS.L> and
National Westminister Bank Plc &lt;NWBL.L> said they had no
immediate plans to announce similar fixed rate schemes.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3982>
Today's debt rescheduling talks
between the Philippines government and its bank advisory
committee were postponed until Thursday to give the banks more
time to consider Manila's novel proposal for paying part of its
interest bill in notes instead of cash, bankers said.
    The committee banks met briefly earlier today and decided
that they needed more time in particular to consider a news
report which quoted a Reagan Administration official as urging
that the proposal be given serious consideration.
    "The banks felt that this was new information and that
further consultation was called for," one banker said.    
    In a despatch yesterday from Washington, Reuters quoted the
official as saying Manila's plan to pay some interest with
notes that could be converted into equity investments in the
Philippines was fully consistent with the Reagan Administration
strategy for handling developing country debt.
    "The Philippine proposal is very interesting, it's quite
unique and I don't think it's something that should be
categorically rejected out of hand," the official said.
    Because of the key role the U.S. plays in the debt crisis,
foreign banks in particular wanted time to analyze the
significance of the policymaker's comments, bankers said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4005>
U.S. economic data this week could be
the key in determining whether U.S. interest rate futures break
out of a 3-1/2 month trading range, financial analysts said.
    Although market expectations are for February U.S. retail
sales Thursday and industrial production Friday to show healthy
gains, figures within or slightly below expectations would be
positive for the market, the analysts said.
    "You have to be impressed with the resiliency of bonds
right now," said Smith Barney Harris Upham analyst Craig
Sloane.
    Treasury bond futures came under pressure today which
traders linked to a persistently firm federal funds rate and a
rise in oil prices. However, when sufficient selling interest
to break below chart support in the June contract failed to
materialize, participants who had sold bond futures early
quickly covered short positions, they said.
    "Everyone is expecting strong numbers, and if they come in
as expected it won't be that bad for the market," Sloane said.
    Sloane said the consensus estimate for the non-auto sector
of retail sales is for a rise of 0.6 to 0.7 pct.
    Dean Witter analyst Karen Gibbs said a retail sales figure
below market forecasts would give a boost to debt futures, and
she put the range for the non-auto sector of retail sales at up
0.8 to 1.2 pct.
    Industrial production and the producer price index Friday
both are expected to show increases of about 0.5 pct, she
added.
    Retail sales "will tell us whether or not we will be able
to fill the gap," Gibbs said, referring to a chart gap in June
bonds between 100-26/32 and 101-3/32 created Friday. June bonds
closed at 100-4/32 today.
    Also key to debt futures direction, in addition to the
federal funds rate, is the direction of crude oil prices, said
Carroll McEntee and McGinley Futures analyst Brian Singer.
    "A higher fed funds rate and firm oil prices precluded the
market from breaking out of the trading range the last time the
market approached the top of the range," Singer said.
    In order for bonds to break above the top of the range,
which is just below 102 in the June contract, "the crude oil
rally needs to run its course and pull back a little bit,"
Singer said. "Fed funds are already easing back down toward the
six pct level."
    The recent surge in oil prices has also been a concern to
Manufacturers Hanover Futures analyst Jim Rozich, but the rally
may be nearing a top around 18.50 dlrs per barrel, he said.
    Rozich said he is looking for the June bond contract to
ease to 99-6/32 and find support.
    "I'm not quite ready to jump on the bullish bandwagon yet.
The jury is still out this week," Rozich said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4090>
The Bank of England said it had bought
bills worth 1.059 billion stg from the market for resale on
March 31 at rates of interest between 10-7/16 pct and 10-17/32
pct.
    Earlier, the Bank said it estimated the liquidity shortage
in the market today at around 1.55 billion stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4131>
The Bank of England said it provided the
market with a further 442 mln stg assistance during the morning
to offset a liquidity shortage it estimated at 1.60 billion
stg, revised up from 1.55 billion
    The bank bought outright eight mln stg of band one treasury
bills and five mln stg of band one bank bills at 10-3/8 pct.
    It bought a further 429 mln stg of bills for resale to the
discount houses on April 2 at an interest rate of 10-7/16 pct.
    So far today, the bank has given the market assistance
worth a total of 1.501 billion stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4188>
The Bank of England said it gave the
market further assistance of two mln stg during the afternoon,
buying that amount of band two bank bills at 10-5/16 pct.
    The bank has given the market assistance worth 1.503
billion stg today to offset a shortage it estimated at a
revised 1.60 billion.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4275>
The Federal Reserve is not expected to
intervene in the government securities market today, several
economists said.
    They said the Fed does not have a much of an adding need
this week and may wait until tomorrow or Monday before
supplying reserves.
    But a few economists said there was an outside chance that
the Fed may inject reserves indirectly via a small round of
customer repurchase agreements.
    Federal funds hovered at 6-1/8 pct this morning after
averaging 6.32 pct yesterday.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4298>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange two billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a spokeswoman said.
    Dealers said Federal funds were trading at 6-1/8 pct when
the Fed began its temporary and indirect supply of reserves to
the banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4458>
Minister of State for Finance Tom Hockin
said he has asked the Canadian Bankers Association, an industry
lobby group, for an explanation of the level of credit card
interest rates.
    Hockin said he hopes to here the association's response on
the "important" issue soon. Hockin was responding to questions
in the House of Commons about why credit card rates, which run
as high as 28 pct per year, remain high when other rates are
falling.
    Today, the Canadian bank rate fell to 7.28 pct from 7.54
pct last week and the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce cut
its prime rate, effective tomorrow, to 8.75 pct from 9.25 pct.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4602>
U.S. bank reserve, monetary and
discount window borrowings data released by the Federal Reserve
today clearly indicate that policy is "on hold" and may not be
changed for weeks or even months, economists said.
    "The Fed is keeping policy at dead center and it is not
about to change policy unless something fairly dramatic occurs
on the economy," said John Williams of Bankers Trust Co.
    "These numbers contain no hint that a policy shift is in
prospect, nor do economic or financial developments argue for
policy change," said William Griggs of Griggs and Santow Inc.
    Fed data released today were all in line with economists'
expectations and similar to the numbers of recent weeks.
    The Fed said net discount window borrowings in the two
weeks ended Wednesday averaged 191 mln dlrs, up from 381 mln
dlrs in the February 25 statement period, but little changed
from 160 mln dlrs in the period before that.
    It said that banks' net free reserves in the latest two
weeks averaged 660 mln dlrs versus 675 mln dlrs previously.
    Finally, the Fed said that the M-1 money supply fell 800
mln dlrs in February, with the broader M-2 measure down 1.6
billion dlrs and M-3 up an even three billion dlrs.
    Analysts said that M-1 last month grew at a negative 1.3
pct annual rate compared with minus 0.7 pct for M-2 and actual
positive growth of 1.0 pct annualized for M-3.
    February levels of M-2 and M-3 left the aggregates 18.2 and
20.8 billion dlrs under their respective upper growth limits
set by the Fed for 1987. The annual growth target for both is
5-1/2 to 8-1/2 pct. There is no M-1 target.
    "In the near term, there is absolutely no reason for the
Fed to ease policy, even apart from the slowdown in money
growth," said Stephen Slifer, economist at Lehman Government
Securities Inc.
    Economists generally expect a modest pickup in monetary
growth in March after February's anemic growth rates. However,
they stress that money growth will not be strong enough to
prevent the Fed from dropping interest rates further if the
economy shows evidence of weakness.
    Commenting on February's decline in the key M-2 aggregate,
Slifer said the main cause was a 3.2 billion dlr drop in money
market deposits at banks. This number has risen three to four
billion dlrs a month for a long while, he said, so February's
weakness is not likely to persist. Slifer expects modest M-2
and M-3 growth rates of 3-1/2 to four pct during March.
    Griggs said that M-2 and M-3 in coming months should return
to the five to seven pct annualized growth region and so
continue to present no problem for the Fed.
    Economists said the Fed appears to be very comfortable with
its current policy stance and it is likely to wait for perhaps
several more months of economic data before deciding whether or
not to ease its grip on reserves.
    Given the economy's fragility in many sectors, the analysts
agreed that there is almost no chance that the Fed will choose
to raise, rather than lower, interest rates when it next
changes policy.
    "Discount window borrowings in the past week were about as
low as the Fed can get them, although Fed funds held above six
pct," said Williams of Bankers Trust. Funds averaged 6.12 pct
in the week to Wednesday, up from 6.06 pct in the prior week.
    The Fed added reserves indirectly via one billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements last Friday, 2.5 billion dlrs on
Monday and two billion dlrs on Wednesday. On Tuesday, it added
reserves directly through two-day System repurchases.
    Williams and Griggs agreed the Fed will let the funds rate
be largely market-driven. They said it is focusing instead on a
borrowings target of around 300 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4682>
The Bank of England said it provided the
market with 478 mln stg of early assistance to help ease a
liquidity shortage it estimated at 1.10 billion stg.
    It made outright purchases of seven mln stg of band one
bank bills at 10-3/8 pct and 30 mln stg of band two bank bills
at 10-5/16 pct.
    In addition, it bought 294 mln stg of paper for resale to
the market on March 30 and 147 mln stg for resale on April 8,
in both cases at an interest rate of 10-7/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4720>
The Bank of England said it provided the
money market with a further 168 mln stg of assistance to help
offset a shortage it now estimated at 1.05 billion stg, revised
down from 1.10 billion.
    It bought 21 mln stg of bank bills outright, 20 mln in band
one at 10-3/8 pct and one mln in band two at 10-5/16 pct. In
addition, it bought 98 mln stg of bills for resale on March 30
and 49 mln stg for resale April 8 at an interest rate of
10-7/16 pct. All these rates are the same as for today's
earlier help.
    So far today, the bank has provided the market with
assistance worth 646 mln stg.
    The bank also announced the rates applicable to temporary
lending facilities rolled over today.
    The average mid-market rate for lending rolled over for one
week is 10-15/16 pct and for two weeks 10-5/8 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4783>
The Bank of England said it provided the
money market with a further 195 mln stg assistance during the
afternoon.
    This brings total help today to 841 mln stg compared with a
liquidity shortage it has estimated at a revised one billion
stg.
    The Bank bought 176 mln stg of band two bank bills outright
at 10-5/16 pct and 13 mln stg of band one bank bills at 10-3/8
pct. In addition, it bought four mln stg of bills for resale to
the market on March 30 and two mln stg for resale on April 8,
at a common interest rate of 10-7/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4822>
The Bank of England said it gave the
money market late, unspecified assistance of around 185 mln
stg.
    This takes the total liquidity injected into the system by
the bank today to 1.026 billion stg compared with a shortage it
estimated at around one billion stg.
    Overnight interbank sterling dipped to 10 nine pct after
the bank's announcement compared with levels around 10-1/2 pct
shortly before and 11-1/4 11 pct initially today, dealers said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4881>
Italy's average interbank rate
rose to a provisional 12.18 pct in February from 12.05 pct in
January, figures from the Bank of Italy show.
    Weighted average rate on bank lending was a provisional
13.78 pct in February compared with 13.83 in January, while
average weighted rate paid on deposits eased a provisional 7.49
pct from 7.66 pct.
    Italy today announced that its official discount rate would
be cut to 11.5 pct from 12 pct effective tomorrow.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4944>
U.S. February reports reflecting slim
gains in industrial output and moderating inflation pressures
reinforced expectations that the Federal Reserve will continue
to follow a stable course of monetary policy, economists said.
    "If you're the Fed, there's no reason to do anything," said
Steve Slifer of Lehman Government Securities Inc.
    "There are hints that GNP is picking up. On the inflation
front, all is well," he said. "Money supply is well under
control. It's an absolutely ideal situation."
    February U.S. industrial production rose 0.5 pct, slightly
less than the 0.7 pct gain the financial markets had expected.
This compared with a slim 0.1 pct rise in January's production
number, previously reported as a 0.4 pct increase.
    The February U.S. producer price index gained only 0.1 pct,
less than a 0.3-0.4 pct expected rise. This followed a 0.6 pct
rise in the PPI in January.
    "The Fed is going to look at this positively," said Allan
Leslie of Discount Corporation. "Certainly inflation is not as
bad as what Volcker (Fed Chairman) has said lately. Industrial
production growth is along the lines of what the Fed wants."
    The energy products component of PPI rose 4.0 pct in
February, after a 9.8 pct increase in January.
    "This shows that the impact of energy prices on inflation
is behind us in terms of the move from 15 dlrs to 18 dlrs per
barrel," said Maria Ramirez of Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. "The
trend is still 3.5 pct in the first half of the year."
    In 1986, declining energy prices contributed to a 2.5 pct
decline in the PPI.
    Economists said that a rise in energy prices was expected,
but a sharp drop in auto prices was not. Passenger car prices
fell 3.4 pct and light truck prices dropped 1.3 pct.
    Yesterday, Federal Reserve Chairman Paul Volcker said that
a possibility of renewed inflation remains a concern in both
the financial markets and the Federal Reserve.
    "The Fed may be lowering its own inflation expectations
today," said Robert Brusca of Nikko Securities International.
    While low inflation permits the Fed to maintain an easier
monetary policy, Brusca said if import prices do not rise this
could necessitate a weaker dollar.
    "The outlook for the dollar is still up in the air," he
said. "We need inflation for U.S. producers to compete with
foreign producers."
    Brusca said prices of electronic equipment dropped 0.8 pct
in February's PPI. With many electronic goods produced
overseas, this may show that foreign producers are not raising
prices which bodes ill for U.S. competitiveness, he said.
    If further dollar declines are needed, this could diminish
overseas investment in U.S. debt, Brusca added, which might
necessitate higher interest rates and lower bond prices.
    By contrast, Slifer said imported goods prices rose 11.8
pct from first quarter 1985 to first quarter 1986 reflecting to
a large degree a 22 pct drop in the trade-weighted real value
of the dollar from February 1985 to February 1987.
    Slifer said import prices may rise further as
manufacturers' contracts put in place before the dollar dropped
to current levels expire, and new contracts are made that
reflect a weaker dollar.
    David Wyss of Data Resources Inc noted that imported
manufactured goods prices rose 8.5 pct at an annual rate in the
second half of 1986, which has contributed to rising U.S.
industrial output.
    "It's the other side of the lower dollar," Wyss said.
"Producers are beginning to find themselves more competitive
and they are increasing output."
    Wyss said that the latest data point to an average
industrial production gain of 0.3-0.4 pct in the first quarter.
"It's an encouraging sign that the manufacturing sector is
beginning to revive."
    But Stephen Roach of Morgan Stanley and Co Inc was not 
convinced that the February reports portend economic gains. He
said much of the strength came from factors that do not point
to a sustained rise in industrial output.
    Roach pointed out that stikers returning to work in farm
equipment industries helped account for a one pct rise in
February business equipment production.
    Utilities output rose 0.7 pct in February after gaining 1.2
pct in January, but Roach said it shows mostly that more energy
was produced, not that manufacturing activity gained.
    Finally, he pointed out that auto production accounted for
half of the industrial production gain as production of auto
assemblies rose to 8.3 million units at an annual rate from 7.5
million units.
    "In the first quarter, it looks like automakers are
producing at an 8.5 mln unit annual rate, but selling at
roughly a seven mln unit rate," Roach said. "The disparity
between output and sales is showing up in inventories."
    Economists pointed to sharp rise in January U.S. business
inventories as a sign that production may be outstripping
demand in the first quarter of 1987.
    January business inventories rose 0.9 pct, the largest gain
since July 1979 when inventories rose 1.7 pct, the Commerce
Department said. Business sales dropped 4.5 pct in January, the
largest monthly sales drop on record.
    Nonetheless, economists do not expect the Fed to react to
month-to-month changes. "The Fed has been standing pat for the
last seven months," Ramirez said. "They will continue to stand
pat for at least the next couple of months."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5127>
U.S. economic data due out next week is
unlikely to hold any surprises that will shake U.S. interest
rate futures out of their relatively narrow trading range of
the last 3-1/2 months, financial analysts said.
    "People don't seem to have any firm conviction about the
current strength of the economy or about the Federal Reserve
doing anything," said Drexel Burnham Lambert analyst Norman
Mains.
    The narrow range trading is also taking its toll on trading
volume, he noted. "We've had a decline in activity as recent
economic statistics have not greatly changed people's
viewpoints on interest rates," Mains said.
    The data, which has provided not clear-cut view of the
economy, coupled with dampened activity in the foreign exchange
markets after the Paris initiative has made for "less than
ebullient market action," Mains said.
    He added, however, that Treasury bond futures could be in
for a retracement after the recent rise as they are near the
top of the trading range.
    "My view is that the economy remains relatively strong and
market participants will see that current prices are
unjustified," Mains said.
    Refco Inc senior vice president Michael Connery also noted
that the market is showing very little momentum and lacks
retail interest. "All of the movement occurs at the opening,"
afterwhich volume dwindles and momentum fades, Connery said.
    Although data during the week was mildly positive for bond
prices, the small rise in February producer prices and downward
revisions in January retail sales and industrial production
were "not real exciting," said Prudential Bache analyst Fred
Leiner.
    "There is no one factor that will push us through the highs
at this moment," Leiner said.
    Next week's revision to fourth quarter U.S. Gross national
Product is also likely to be of little interest to the market,
said Kleinwort Benson chief financial economist Sam Kahan.
Still, forecasts for first quarter GNP could play a role in the
direction of bond prices over the next month.
    Kahan said his early estimate for first quarter growth is
around three pct, due largely to a buildup in inventories
reflected in the January inventory data Friday, which showed
the largest increase since 1979.
    "The key question will be not whether there is a large
increase in first quarter GNP, but whether any increase is
sustainable or a one shot deal," Kahan said.
    He said that a sizable increase in first quarter GNP
stemming from an increase in inventories will be a drag on
second quarter growth.
    If that is the case, GNP in the second quarter could ease
back to a one to two pct growth rate, Kahan said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5232>
The Bank of England said it provided the
money market with assistance worth 90 mln stg in response to an
early round of bill offers from discount houses.
    Earlier, the bank estimated the shortage in the system
today at some 1.05 billion stg.
    The bank bought bills for resale to the market in equal
amounts on April 1, 2 and 3 at an interest rate of 10-7/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5235>
Philippine government revenue is
expected to rise 26 pct to 99.9 billion pesos this year from
79.1 billion in 1986, Finance Secretary Jaime Ongpin said.
    In a report to President Corazon Aquino on his department's
performance during the year ended February 28, Ongpin said at
least 15.9 billion pesos were expected to accrue from new tax
reform measures announced last year.
    He said the goal for official development assistance (ODA)
this year is two billion dlrs, adding that aid donors have
committed ODA inflows of 1.7 billion dlrs in 1987, up 30 pct
from 1.3 billion in 1986.
    Ongpin said steps planned to provide a sound revenue base
included a value added tax (VAT) system due to be introduced in
1988. He gave no other details.
    He said treasury bill maturities, interest rate levels and
the volume of government securities sold to the private sector
have improved significantly. "In particular, short-term prime
interest rates which had gone over 40 pct in 1985, are now down
to less than 10 pct," he said.
    Ongpin said the government's debt-equity scheme, introduced
in August last year, had attracted more than 276 mln dlrs worth
of applications, but selective evaluation had resulted in
approvals of only 61.8 mln dlrs at end-February.
    He said his department aims to accelerate its privatisation
program and the sale of non-performing assets owned by
associates of former President Ferdinand Marcos to achieve a
1987 sales target of four billion pesos which would help
finance land reform.
    Aquino said earlier this month that all the 24 billion
pesos the government hopes to raise from the sale of the failed
companies will be used to finance the land reform plan.
    Ongpin also said the government would pursue efforts to
obtain 500 mln dlrs in concessional funding for the program
from a World Bank-led consultative group of multilateral and
bilateral aid donors.
    The government has said the land reform plan aims to
distribute 9.7 mln hectares of land to poor peasants.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5237>
Yields on certificates of deposit
issued by the United Arab Emirates Central Bank were unchanged
at 6-1/8 pct, the bank said.
    The yield applies to maturities of one, two, three and six
months.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5241>
The Bundesbank came into the domestic
money market to add temporary liquidity through federal
government funds as call money rates rose above 4.0 pct,
dealers said.
    They estimated that the bulk of liquidity was added at
about 3.95 pct. Call money fell to 3.90/4.0 pct after the move.
It had been 3.80/90 on Friday.
    The move came as call money extended a rise begun Friday
after the Bundesbank took up some six billion marks owed to it
by other European central banks after currency interventions in
the framework of European Monetary System in January.
    Rates could ease further in trading today but dealers
expect them to rise later in the week as banks begin paying out
funds for tax payments on behalf of clients.
    Some 30 billion marks is likely to leave the market this
month, with the bulk being paid out next week.
    In anticipation of this liquidity drain, banks have stocked
up reserves at the Bundesbank.
    On Thursday, minimum reserve holdings declined to 57.0
billion marks from 60.0 billion on Wednesday but were well
above the 53.2 billion held on Tuesday. Daily average reserve
holdings rose slightly to 54.7 billion marks from 54.5 billion.
    The daily average reserve holdings were above the level of
around 51 billion marks dealers said is needed for the required
daily average for the month.
    With the heavy tax drain in March, banks are likely to
remain cautious about taking more liquidity out of reserves
than is absolutely necessary.
    However, a new securities repurchase pact likely to be
added next week to replace a facility expiring then could
somewhat offset the drain.
    The Bundesbank is expected to allocate more than the 3.4
billion marks which is due to be rolled over, dealers said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5277>
The Bank of England said it provided the
money market with a further 30 mln stg assistance.
    This brings the Bank's total help so far today to 120 mln
stg and compares with its upward revised estimate that the
system would face a shortage of some 1.15 billon stg.
    The central bank bought bills for resale to the market in
equal amounts on April 1, 2 and 3 at an interest rate of
10-7/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5290>
Leading industrial nations will meet
again next month to review their accord on currency stability,
but U.S. Officials said financial markets are convinced for now
the countries will live up to commitments to speed up economic
growth.
    The narrow currency movements of recent weeks strongly
suggests the six leading industrial countries have tamed the
normally unruly financial markets and next month's talks seem
likely to build on that stability.
    A Reagan administration official said the Paris agreement
last month was the main reason markets were calm.
    But he said in an interview that financial markets also
understood, "That all six countries concluded that the measures
to be taken over a period of time in the future should foster
stability of exchange rates around current levels. That is in
fact what has happened since Paris."
    Monetary analysts said stability has been helped in part by
the decision of industrial nations to bury the hatchet and
cease to quarrel over short-term policy objectives.
    Instead they have focused on medium-term policy goals, but
left room to adjust their agreements with periodic meetings.
    The official refused to comment, however, on whether the
agreement included a secret pact to consider further
coordinated interest rate cuts -- a measure industrial nations
have taken jointly several times in the past year.
    On February 22, the United States, Japan, West Germany,
France, Britain and Canada agreed that major currencies were
within ranges broadly reflecting underlying economic
conditions, given commitments by Washington to cut its budget
deficit and by Toyko and Bonn to boost economic growth.
    The shake-up would strengthen the U.S. Position in future
international talks.
    "I think these changes will strengthen the President's hand
politically and the stronger he is politically the better off
we are with the Congress and the better off we are in
international fora," said the official, an Administration
economic policymaker. "So it would be beneficial to the
continued conduct of our initiatives."
    But the official also said the Administration would resist
calls for a tax increase to cut the budget deficit -- a target
Europeans say is crucial to help curb economic instability.
    Currency analysts believe the Paris agreement set secret 
short-term target ranges for their currencies with a specific
agreement to defend those bands with intervention.
    According to market sources, the ranges agreed were 1.60 to
1.90 marks to the dollar, and 140 to 155 yen to the dollar.
    There is no official confirmation that specific bands  were
set, although the agreement used the term "ranges", for the first
time in an international economic agreement.
    The Paris accord stated the six would cooperate closely to
foster currency stability around current levels.
    Last week, dealers said the Federal Reserve intervened to
stop the dollar rising against the mark, which had breached
1.86 to the dollar. British authorities are also understood to
have intervened to curb sterling's strength.
    International monetary sources say finance ministers and
central bankers, who will review market performance and their
own economic prospects, will reassemble again in Washington
just before the April 9 policymaking meeting of the
International Monetary Fund.
    The sources said Italy, which refused to join the Paris
pact, was invited back by Treasury Secretary James Baker.
    Since Paris, there are signs West German growth is slowing,
while U.S. Officials said they were giving Japan until April to
show that an economic stimulus package was in the offing.
    Signs of concern about German prospects emerged recently
when Bundesbank (central bank) president Karl Otto Poehl told
bankers he would consider cutting West German interest rates if
the Fed was ready to follow suit.
    A Reagan Administration official said this would show there
had been some change in approach on the part of the central
bank in Germany.
    But he declined to comment on the prospects for action by
the Fed and the Bundesbank.
    "If there is such a provision it is private and if I talked
about it, it would no longer be private," said the official, who
asked not to be identified.
    Public comments by Fed officials suggest the central bank
is keeping credit conditions broadly unchanged, but if the
major economies continue to show sluggish growth and the U.S.
Trade deficit remains stubbornly high, further coordinated
action could be on the April agenda.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5404>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
intervene in the government securities market to add reserves
via two to 2.5 billion dlrs of customer repurchase agreements,
economists said.
    Economists said the Fed will inject temporary reserves
indirectly to offset pressure on the Federal funds rate
associated with quarterly corporate tax payments to the
Treasury department.
    Fed funds opened at 6-1/4 pct and remained at that level
late this morning. Friday funds averaged 6.05 pct.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5439>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange three-day System
repurchase agreements, a Fed spokesman said.
    Dealers said that Federal funds were trading at 6-1/4 pct
when the Fed began its temporary and direct supply of reserves
to the banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5779>
The Australian dollar rose more than 40
points and money market interest rates retreated on the better
than expected improvement in the February current account
deficit, but economists and dealers were cautious about
identifying it as the start of a downward trend.
    The current account deficit narrowed to 750 mln dlrs in
February from 1.23 billion in January. It hit 13.82 billion
dlrs in 1985/86 to end-June.
    The currency jumped to 0.6858/63 U.S. Dlrs and traded as
high as 0.6875 before retreating to around 0.6864/69.
    "It's got 69 cents written all over it," one dealer said.
    Foreign exchange dealers said some buyers had gone long on
the dollar expecting a lower figure and sold it down about 30
points to 0.6820 U.S. Dlrs before the release.
    The 750 mln dlr deficit was at the lower end of forecasts
and analysts said the market would welcome any figure below one
billion dlrs for March.
    Banque National de Paris &lt;BNPP.A> senior dealer Peter
Nicolls cautioned that in the long term the currency and
interest rates were too high for import substitution and export
industries.
    Nicolls said he expected the dollar to go as high as 0.6875
and perhaps to 69 cents tomorrow.
    &lt;Lloyds Bank NZA Ltd> chief economist Will Buttrose said
the 42 mln dlr trade surplus was encouraging as were imports at
2.77 billion dlrs, down from 2.99 billion in January.
    But he warned that the outlook for rural and iron and coal
exports remained poor. "We should remember we are paying
something like seven to eight billion dollars simply to service
our foreign debt and that is not going to go away in the near
term," Buttrose said.
    Buttrose said he expected a March deficit of around 900 mln
dlrs, and added "Any figure under a billion dollars will be
acceptable (to the markets)."
    ANZ Banking Group Ltd &lt;ANZA.S> senior economist Ian Little
said the big question was whether the improvement in exports
could be sustained. February FOB exports rose to 2.82 billion
dlrs from a revised 2.74 billion in January.
    Interest rates responded quickly to the deficit news, with
90-day bank bill yields falling to 16.42-16.45 pct from early
highs of 16.50 and yields yesterday as high as 16.65.
    Longer term yields fell with 10-year bonds at 13.66/68 pct
from 13.74 before the release and highs of 13.87 yesterday.
    The stock market was easier at midsession but brokers said
the current account data had little impact on trading.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5836>
Taiwan's central bank issued 12 billion
Taiwan dlrs worth of certificates of deposit after issuing six
billion yesterday, bringing CD issues so far this year to
115.47 billion dlrs, a bank official told Reuters.
    The new CDs have maturities of six months, one year and two
years and bear interest rates ranging from 4.07 pct to 5.12
pct, he said.
    The issues are aimed at helping curb the growth of M-1b
money supply, which is the result of large foreign exchange
reserves. The reserves now total more than 51 billion U.S.
Dlrs.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5861>
The Bank of England said it did not
operate in the money market in the morning session.
    Earlier, the central bank had estimated the deficit in the
system today at some 450 mln stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6046>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange two billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a Fed spokesman said.
    Dealers said Federal funds were trading at 6-1/16 pct when
the Fed began its temporary and indirect supply of reserves to
the banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6091>
British bank base lending rates are
likely to fall by as much as one full point to 9-1/2 pct this
week following the sharp three billion stg cut in the U.K.
Central government borrowing target to four billion stg set in
today's 1987 budget, bank analysts said.
    The analysts described Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel
Lawson's budget as cautious, a quality which currency and money
markets had already started to reward.
    Sterling surged on foreign exchange markets and money
market interest rates moved sharply lower as news of the budget
measures came through, the analysts said.
    Lloyds merchant bank chief economist Roger Bootle said he
expected base rates to be cut by one full point tomorrow.
    "This is very much a safety-first budget in order to get
interest rates down," he said.
    Bootle said the money markets had almost entirely
discounted such a one point cut, with the key three month
interbank rate down to 9-11/16 pct from 9-13/16 last night, and
it would be rather conservative for banks to go for a
half-point cut now.
    Midland Bank treasury economist David Simmonds said he,
too, expected base rates would be a full point lower by Friday,
but this would likely happen via two half-point cuts.
    "This budget is designed to please both the markets and the
electorate. The implications for interest rates are very
favourable, we could have a half-point cut tomrorow and another
such cut before the end of the week," Simmonds said.
    Pointing to buoyant U.K. Retail data released yesterday, he
said Lawson had done well to resist pressures for a sharp cut
in income tax rates at the expense of a lower borrowing target.
"There is no real need to boost private consumption," he said.
    National Westminster Bank chief economist David Kern said
the lower borrowing target set in the budget had increased the
likelihood of an early one-point base rate cut.
    Kern said the budget would have to be analysed carefully,
in particular to see how exactly Lawson planned to achieve the
sharper than expected borrowing target cut, before a one-point
base rate cut could be implemented.
 But providing the budget small-print was convincing, "and I
suspect it will be, it is entirely possible that we see one
point off base rates by the end of this week," Kern said.
    Bootle of Lloyds said the expected base rate cut would pave
the way for an early one-point cut in mortgage lending rates.
This would help achieve Lawson's lower than expected consumer
price inflation target of four pct at end-1987, he said.
    U.K. Base rates were cut last week to 10-1/2 pct from 11
pct after sustained pressure from the foreign exchange, money
and government bonds (gilts) markets.
    But building societies said they would not cut lending
rates until base rates had fallen by one full point.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6156>
Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel
Lawson's Budget speech was described as sound and well balanced
by analysts, if slightly lacking in excitement.
    A cut in bank base lending rates is now widely expected
tomorrow, with most forecasts predicting a half-point fall. A
follow-up half-point cut is anticipated next week.
    "Worthy but boring would probably sum it up," Peter Fellner,
U.K. Economist at stockbrokers James Capel and Co, said. "It was
a very, very prudent fiscal budget."
    Richard Jeffrey of brokers Hoare Govett said it was a
well-balanced budget within the confines of the government's
philosophy of keeping expenditure levels flat.
    Most analysts said the Budget was very sound on the fiscal
side, but offered nothing new on monetary policy.
    As was widely expected, Lawson split his "fiscal adjustment"
between trimming the 1987/88 PSBR target to 4.0 billion stg
from 7.1 billion and cutting basic rate income tax from 29 to
27 pct.
    The target for the narrow measure of money supply, M0, was
kept unchangd at two to six pct, while the target for the broad
Sterling M3 aggregate was dropped.
    Both Jeffrey and Fellner said the budget clears the way for
a half-point fall in U.K. Base rates tomorrow, but the
authorities are unlikely to sanction a larger cut immediately.
Many analysts and currency dealers have forecast a full
one-point cut tomorrow.
    "The Bank of England will be loathe to take any action which
it will have to reverse later," Jeffrey said, though he added a
further half-point cut was quite possible in the near future.
    The main worry from today's speech is the outlook for
inflation, given the signs of relaxed monetary policy contained
in it, Scrimgeour Vickers economist Richard Holt said.
    Holt noted the "rather loose" inflation forecast of 4.0 pct
at end-1987, and said the lower interest rates likely to result
from the tough fiscal stance could cause longer term concern.
    "A higher PSBR target could be preferable in the long term,"
he said, although lower mortgage interest rates on the back of
falling base rates would have an offsetting impact on
inflation.
    The Budget will inspire a lot of short-term confidence but
it was "not a good budget for inflation," he said
    Jeffrey said he would have liked Lawson to say more about
the dangers of excessive liquidity build-up but overall was not
too concerned about a revival of inflation.
    Fellner noted that the exchange rate was to remain the
"leading edge" of monetary policy, but said the authorities were
likely to be extremely cautious on this front.
    He said they were unlikely to hesitate in holding interest
rates steady or even raising them again if sterling showed any
signs of excessive weakness.
    Most analysts agreed Lawson had bolstered the credibility
of the Budget by adopting realistic forecasts.
    Raising the forecast for the current account deficit from
1.5 to 2.5 billion stg for 1987 would not unsettle the markets,
which are already discounting that amount, Jeffrey said.
that the 4.0 billion stg PSBR target was given credibility by
the favourable outturn for 1986/87, which is now also forecast
to be 4.0 billion stg.
    But analysts said the Budget speech did not give any
clear-cut indication about the timing of the general election,
which has to be held before June, 1988.
    Some believe it signals a poll this June, noting that the
benefits, such as income tax cuts and the decision not to raise
duties on alcohol and tobacco, become available immediately.
    But others said it kept several options open and it was not
possible to deduce too much from it.
    James Capel's Fellner noted that by being fiscally prudent,
Lawson had kept open the possibility of an autumn election in
that there would be no "chickens coming home to roost."
    Richard Jeffrey, who favours the likelihood of a June
election, said it was important the Chancellor had not gone for
a Budget aimed overtly at buying an election victory.
    Nevertheless, he said, it was likely to result in a boost
to the Conservative Party's pre-election popularity.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6178>
The Office of Finance, Federal Home
Loan Banks, said it set rates on today's debt offering of 6.70
pct on its 1.11 billion dlr issue, 7.10 pct on a 1.065 billion
dlr issue and 7.65 pct on a 375 mln dlr issue.
    It said the issues, which are for settlement March 25, 
mature March 26, 1990, March 25, 1992 and March 25, 1997,
respectively.
    The office said telephone confirmation of allotments must
be received by 1500 hrs EST today and that secondary trading
will begin at 0930 hrs EST tomorrow.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6197>
Surprisingly strong U.S. housing
statistics for February cannot be taken as an indication that
the economy is generating any momentum and are not sufficient
cause to start lifting forecasts for first quarter growth,
economists said.
    Building was boosted by two factors last month, unusually
mild weather and low mortgage rates. But economists said that
seasonal factors make it hard to assess what spur to the
economy, if any, will come from housing in coming months. And
after a steady retreat, mortgage rates seem to be near bottom.
    U.S. housing starts rose 2.6 pct in February to a
seasonally adjusted annual rate of 1.851 mln units from 1.804
mln in January. It was the highest pace for starts since April
1986.
    The rate at which permits were issued for future building
climbed 4.4 pct to a seasonally adjusted annual rate of 1.764
mln units after dropping 11.52 pct to 1.690 mln in January.
    "February's weather is usually more adverse for home
building. Because of seasonal factors it's difficult to
determine what this means for the economy down the road," said
Allan Leslie of Discount Corp.
    The housing report is seasonally-weighted to compensate for
weather-related setbacks. As a result, milder temperatures
inflate the statistics.
    Economists said that low mortgage rates also were a spur to
building last month. But several believe that rates will now
consolidate before edging up in late spring/early summer.
    "Builders are looking at current mortgage rates and saying
'Let's do it now'," said Mark Obrinsky of the U.S. League of
Savings Institutions in Washington, whose members supply much
of the financing for home building.
    But Obrinsky doubts that there is much more downward
potential for rates because he foresees higher inflation and 
some overall improvement in the U.S. economy.
    He expects rates to gain 50 to 100 basis points in early
summer from the 9.50 pct fixed rate effective in February. Last
November, fixed rate mortgages were about 10.30 pct.
    As expected, the strength in housing was concentrated in
the single-family sector. The multi-family area -- which
typically represents rental units -- remained weak due to high
vacancy rates and increased capital costs of such units
following tax law changes effective January 1.
    Single-family starts rose at a 5.6 pct annual pace to 1.317
mln units. Multi-family fell 4.1 pct to a 534,000 rate.
    "Strength in the single-family sector indicates that low
mortgage rates are doing their job. But we're probably not
looking at a great deal of growth potential," said Ward
McCarthy of Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.
    McCarthy noted that the housing report, together with
larger than expected gains in U.S. employment, industrial
output and retail sales in February, may cause some observers
to start waving "four pct GNP banners" for the first quarter.
Gross national product grew 1.3 pct in the fourth quarter.
    But McCarthy, who still expects first quarter real GNP to
come in at an annual rate of 2.5 pct or slightly above, is not
convinced that growth will pick up in future.
    "The big story is the inventory re-building that's going on
now, not all of which is intentional," he said. For example,
U.S. automakers, who are already saddled with high stocks,
produced at an annual rate of 8.3 mln units in February
compared with domestic car sales of 7.3 mln.
    Thus while inventories could contribute to GNP in the first
quarter, they may result in scaled-back production and weaker
growth in the second, he said.
    "If most of the first quarter growth is inventory building
and we cannot identify any improvement in export demand, then
there is the potential for softness in the second quarter,"
agreed Allan Leslie of Discount Corp. He is still evaluating
first quarter GNP prospects.
    Federal Reserve chairman Paul Volcker said last week that
current data do not show the worsening in trade has reversed.
    "At the same time that we are pumping up inventories in the
first quarter, we could foresee production slowing in the
second," cautioned Joe Plocek of McCarthy, Crisanti and Maffei
Inc, who expects first quarter growth of about three pct.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6350>
U.K. Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel
Lawson said he expected British interest rates to fall soon in
response to his fiscal 1987/88 budget, but he did not say by
how much.
    "I would be very surprised if there is not a very early
further fall in interest rates," Lawson said in a radio
interview.
    Analysts said they foresaw U.K. Base rates falling as early
as today by as much as one full percentage point after Lawson's
announcement yesterday that the public sector borrowing
requirement in fiscal 1987/88 and 1988/89 was to fall to 1.0
pct of GDP, or some four billion stg.
    British banks' base lending rates fell a half percentage
point on March 9 to the current 10.5 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6352>
Officials of five Thai commercial banks
are expected to meet tomorrow to seek agreement on cutting
interest rates, banking sources said.
    They said they expect Thai banks to opt for a cut to spur
domestic loan demand to help reduce persistent high liquidity
on the money market.
    Many bankers have been urging an average half percentage
point cut in deposit rates and a one point cut in lending
rates, they said.
    Six major Thai major banks reduced minimum loan and
overdraft rates by 0.50 to 0.75 percentage point on February 16
but the move has not substantially increased loan demand, the
sources said.
    Excess liquidity has been hitting bank profits since early
last year despite five interest rate cuts in 1986. The current
gross 7.25 pct interest rate for one-year fixed bank deposit
and the 11.5 pct minimum loan rate are the lowest in a decade.
    Bankers said the Thai banking system is saddled with about
40 to 50 billion baht of surplus funds which have created
problems for many banks in managing their money effectively.
    Profits of many Thai banks fell sharply last year partly
because of a mismatch of loan demand and bank deposit growth.
The Bank of Thailand estimated overall lending by the Thai
banking system grew 3.8 pct in 1986 against a 12 pct expansion
in bank deposits.
    Reports of a possible new round of interest rate cuts have
further buoyed the Thai stock market this week.
    The Securities Exchange of Thailand (SET) Index on Monday
recorded its biggest daily advance in recent years, shooting up
4.57 points to a new seven-year high of 223.02.
    Brokers and market analysts said Thai stocks will register
more gains as long as liquidity remains in the money market.
    Thai and foreign bankers said the liquidity problem will
grow if the Bank of Thailand does not extend permission for
local banks to hold foreign exchange positions up to 40 pct of
bank capital.
    If the regulation is not extended beyond its April 3 expiry
date, many commercial banks will have to reduce foreign
exchange holdings to a maximum 20 pct.
    Bankers said such that could add another five billion baht
of surplus funds to the local money market.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6359>
The Bank of England said it had invited
an early round of bill offers from the discount houses after
forecasting a shortage in the system of around 1.1 billion stg.
    Money market dealers speculated that the central bank could
be taking the opportunity to signal a reduction in U.K. Base
lending rates by cutting the rates at which it intervenes in
the discount market.
    Most operators are expecting a base rate cut today,
possibly of one point, following yesterday's budget in which
the U.K. Public sector borrowing target for 1987/88 was slashed
by three billion stg.
    Among the main factors affecting liquidity, bills maturing
in official hands and the take-up of treasury bills will drain
some 1.11 billion stg while a rise in note circulation and
bankers' balances below target will take out around 120 mln stg
and 20 mln stg respectively.
    Partly offsetting these outflows, exchequer transactions
will add some 140 mln stg to the system today.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6369>
The Bank of England said it had invited
those discount houses wishing to use borrowing facilities to do
so at 1430 GMT today at a rate of 10 pct for 14 days.
    This compares with the Bank's present band one dealing rate
of 10-3/8 pct.
    The Bank of England's announcement was quickly followed by
Barclays Bank and National Westminster Bank which announced a
half-point cut in their base rates to 10 pct from 10-1/2 pct.
    Dealers said the lowering in base rates had been widely
expected following yesterday's U.K. Budget in which Chancellor
of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson announced a three billion stg cut
in the Government's public sector borrowing target for 1987/88
to four billion stg.
    Many in the market had expected a full one point cut in
base rates today but some were not surprised by the
authorities' caution, dealers added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6399>
The Bank of England said it revised up
its estimate of the deficit in the system today to 1.3 billion
stg from 1.1 billion.
    The Bank has not provided any assistance to the market so
far today but earlier invited the discount houses to use their
borrowing facilities at 1430 GMT today and set the terms at 10
pct for 14 days.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6400>
Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson
said he was content with the current level of sterling and
welcomed today's announcement of a further half point cut in
British bank base lending rates to 10 pct.
    However, he said he wanted to see a gradual approach to
declines in domestic U.K. Interest rates, although optimism in
financial markets might push for big moves quickly.
    He told a briefing of economic journalists that "I don't
think we should rush anything." Lawson stressed the themes of
"gradualism and steadiness" as economic policy.
    Lawson acknowledged that today's fall in interest rates
were in response to his budget for fiscal 1987/88, unveiled
yesterday to Parliament and which set a lower target for the
key Public Sector Borrowing Requirement (PSBR) of 1.0 pct of
GDP.
    Lawson said the two recent cuts in base rates, both made
this month in the form of half percentage point declines, were
"perfectly consistent" with monetary conditions now in Britain.
    He supported that by saying the narrow M0 money supply
aggregate was "safely inside" its flucuation band of two to six
pct set for both 1986/87 and 1987/88. In his budget, Lawson set
no explicit target range for the broader sterling M3.
    Turning to the question of Britain eventually joining the
exchange rate mechanism of the European Monetary System (EMS),
Lawson repeated that "it is most unlikely we will enter before
the next election."
    He said Britain was keeping the subject of full EMS
membership under constant review. But he would not indicate
what the chief considerations for this were for the government.
    Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher late last year said a
decision on whether or not to join depended on the strength of
the U.K. Economy. But she later said such a move depended on
other EMS countries scrapping residual capital controls.
    Although Lawson denounced what he said was "the current wave
of election fever" in Britain, he added:  "It is more likely that
there will be an election this year" than not.
    He said he supported an early election only because it
would clear the air. "Ideally, we (the government) should have a
full term," but events could force a premature poll, Lawson
said.
    The government, which has been in power since 1979, must
call an election by June 1988. Speculation is rising for either
a June or an early autumn election, political sources said.
    The decision to cut basic tax by only two pence in 1987/88
"was the right balance, economically and politically," he said.
    Lawson's decision to restrict the fall in the standard rate
of tax to two-pence surprised many analysts, who had predicted
that with Treasurys coffers full of tax revenue would have
allowed the government to reach its goal of 25 pct in one move.
    But it was being praised today by political analysts as a
shrewd move which, while advancing towards that aim, could not
be seized upon by opposition parties as overtly trying to bribe
the electorate.
    Lawson told journalists he had been surprised by how much
the PSBR had undershot his original assumption of 7.1 billion
stg for 1986/87 -- by some three billion stg.
    Returning to changing levels of interest rates, Lawson
stressed that "they are not an objective (for the government) -
they are an instrument of policy." Consequently the Treasury had
no precise target for domestic borrowing levels, he said.
    But "there may be interest rate consequences" from changes in
the level of government borrowing, he added.
    Lawson said he did not think that the U.K.'s relatively
high level of real interest rates had hurt investment in
Britain.
    He said conditions created by London's role as a leading
financial centre had caused sterling interest rates to be
higher in real terms than in other countries.
    Three factors had caused the higher level in relative
interest rates in Britain, Lawson said.
    First, control of credit in Britain rested on interest
rates alone, due to the freedom of its financial markets.
    He said the second reason was political uncertainty caused
by proposed spending plans of the opposition Labour Party.
     Thirdly, he said "we do not have as long a track record of
low inflation" as did the U.S., Japan and West Germany.
    Lawson foresaw London becoming the world's pre-eminent
financial centre, because it was more international in
character and more favourably placed in time zones than New
York or Tokyo.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6406>
New Zealand's inflation and interest
rates should decline and the balance of payments improve
significantly in the fiscal year to the end of March 1988, the
Institute of Economic Research (NZIER) said.
    The independent institute said in its quarterly March issue
that it was also revising its fiscal 1987 real gross domestic
product (GDP) forecast to a fall of 0.5 pct against the one pct
drop forecast in December.
    Government figures show GDP grew at an annual 1.8 pct in
the quarter to September and 3.4 pct in the June quarter.
    The NZIER said the sharp improvement in the June and
September quarters was due mainly to a new tax structure and
the introduction of a 10 pct value-added goods and services tax
and is not expected to continue in the second half of 1986/87.
    The government's tight fiscal position is not expected to
change, it said.
    Annual inflation, measured by the consumer price index, is
forecast to fall to nine pct by next March from 18.2 pct in
calendar 1986, it said.
    "Falling inflation is likely to give significant scope for
reductions in nominal interest rates; real interest rates are
also expected to ease (albeit slightly) as the balance of
payments deficit and hence the call on overseas capital, falls
away," the NZIER said.
    Short-term interest rates are forecast to remain between 20
and 25 pct until the June quarter, but will decline over the
second half of 1987/88 to between 16 and 18 pct. Long-term
rates are expected to fall to between 14 and 16 pct.
    Five year government bond rates are currently 18.40 pct and
the key indicator 30-day bank bills 26.53 pct.
    The local dollar is expected to depreciate steadily in the
early part of the coming year and, by next March, reach 57.5 on
the Reserve Bank's trade weighted index, which is based on a
basket of currencies. The index now stands at around 66.4.
    "A marked improvement in the balance of payments is
forecast," the NZIER said. "The current account deficit is
expected to fall from 7.5 pct of GDP in 1985/86 to 4.5 pct in
1986/87 and 2.5 pct in 1987/88."
    The current account deficit is forecast to shrink to 1.32
billion N.Z. Dlrs in 1987/88 from 2.40 billion in 1986/87 and
3.33 billion in 1985/86.
    The 1987/88 budget deficit is forecast to be 2.8 billion
dlrs against an expected 2.9 billion dlrs in 1986/87 and 1.87
billion in 1985/86.
    This compares with the government's 1986/87 deficit figure
of 2.92 billion against an earlier forecast of 2.45 billion.
    "Conditions in the coming year are sufficiently subdued to
contribute to marked improvements in both the balance of
payments and the rate of inflation ...," the NZIER said.
    "Overall, these are significant gains for the New Zealand
economy and, if they continue to be improved upon, bode well
for future prospects."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6426>
The Bundesbank is likely to steer a
steady monetary course over the next few weeks and a change in
credit policies is not expected at tomorrow's regular central
bank council meeting, bank economists and dealers said.
    "There is no need for action," Hermann Remsperger, chief
economist of Berliner Handels- and Frankfurter Bank (BHF) said.
    Others noted that exchange rates are stable after last
month's Group of Six agreement in Paris and central bank money
stock growth is still well above the three to six pct target
zone, so a change in credit policies could be ruled out.
    One money market dealer said comments by Bundesbank
President Karl Otto Poehl at a private seminar in Duesseldorf
two weeks ago hinting at another interest rate cut only
indicated the Bundesbank might act if conditions changed.
    Bank economists said U.S. Pressure on West Germany to
further ease credit policies had receded since the Paris pact.
    But such demands could re-emerge if West Germany failed to
stimulate its economy enough to affect the massive U.S. Trade
deficit.
    Remsperger said continued strong money supply growth also
precluded a further cut in official interest rates.
    Central bank money stock was growing at an annualized 7.5
pct in February, unchanged from the 7.5 pct in January.
    Economists said some of the 18 members of the central bank
council were worried about the continued overshoot in the money
supply target and were bound to resist any moves to cut rates.
But Poehl played down the risk of inflation.
    Economists said the fact that money stock growth remained
stable last month was a success. Some said it was likely to
return to within the target range later this year.
    "The special factors which boosted money supply growth last
year are disappearing," one economist said.
    He said some 75 pct of the money supply increase in 1986
was caused by a sharp rise in the inflow of foreign funds.
    This trend had been reversed recently and with domestic
credit demand likely to remain at steady levels, money stock
growth was expected to narrow in the medium-term.
    These developments were increasing the Bundesbank's scope
for a rate cut in the medium-term, economists said.
    Money market dealers said period rates remained little
changed, indicating no change in credit policy was expected.
    Call money rates declined to 3.75/80 pct from 3.90/95
yesterday, with the market well stocked with liquidity.
    Dealers said call money was soft because tax payments on
behalf of customers had been less than expected so far. But
rates were likely to tighten again as soon as the full effect
of this month's major tax payment period is felt. Payments for
the federal railways bond are also likely to burden the market.
    The Bundesbank did not inject liquidity via a securities
repurchase agreement this week, but countered a tightening in
rates on Monday by injecting funds through government-owned
banks.
    Dealers said recent securities repurchase pacts had shown
the Bundesbank clearly wanted call money rates stable at 3.80.
    One dealer said, "If the central bank wanted lower interest
rates, it would first of all drive call money rates down."
    Banks remained relatively well stocked with minimum reserve
assets. They held 52.9 billion marks in minimum reserves on
Monday, averaging 53.7 billion marks over the first 16 days of
March. A requirement of around 51 billion is expected.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6452>
The Bank of England said it had provided
the money market with a further 15 mln stg assistance. This
brings the Bank's total help so far today to 344 mln stg and
compares with the estimated shortage of around 1.3 billion stg.
    The central bank purchased bank bills outright, at the
lower dealing rates established this morning, comprising one
mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct and 14 mln stg in band two at
9-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6453>
West German commercial banks are
cautiously cutting key savings and lending rates, banking
sources said. The cuts follow nearly two months after the
Bundesbank reduced leading interest rates, far longer than the
usual interim period.
    A Deutsche Bank AG &lt;DBKG.F> spokesman said it is cutting
leading savings rate for private customers on a regional basis
by 0.5 percentage points to two pct. Dresdner Bank AG &lt;DRSD.F>
and Commerzbank AG &lt;CBKG.F> have initiated similar moves. Bank
fuer Gemeinwirtschaft AG &lt;BKFG.F> cut rates 0.5 pct generally.
    The delay was partly due to commercial banks' desire to
gauge customer reaction to a similar move by regional savings
banks.
    A fall in customer savings because of lower rates could
reduce cheap refinancing available to banks, forcing them to
draw down relatively expensive funds from other sources, one
economist at the German Banking Association said.
    But the volume of savings funds may not be substantially
undercut by lower savings rates because many customers are
parking funds in savings accounts in the hope they can reinvest
them at higher yields in the future, he said.
    He said this may conflict with Bundesbank aims to move more
funds from relatively short-term deposits to longer-dated
securities to reduce strong growth in its central bank money
supply aggregate.
    The aggregate showed annualized growth of a provisional 7.5
pct in February against the fourth quarter of last year,
unchanged from January. The growth rate was outside the
expanded target range of three to six pct.
    Few banks have so far reduced lending rates to private
customers, though lending rates for corporate customers are
beginning to decline.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6483>
The Bank of England said it had lent one
billion stg to the discount market for fourteen days at 10 pct.
    This brings the Banks total help today to some 1.34 billion
stg and satisfies the estimated shortage in the system today
which it had earlier estimated at 1.3 billion stg.
    The Bank's announcement this morning that it was willing to
lend two-week money at 10 pct was interpreted by the market as
a sanction for lower U.K. Base lending rates.
    The U.K. Clearing banks swiftly took this up, cutting their
base rates by a half-point to 10 pct. At midday, the central
bank lowered its money market dealing rates by the same amount.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6531>
Today's modest half-point cut in U.K.
Bank base lending rates to 10 pct signals the Bank of England's
determination to maintain a cautious monetary stance, but
financial markets appear set to force its hand, analysts said.
    They said a further half-point cut in base rates to 9-1/2
pct was bound to occur within the next week and rates may shed
a further half point soon if markets remain buoyant.
    Earlier, markets were bracing for a one-point cut in rates
after yesterday's budget set a sharp three billion stg
reduction in 1987 government borrowing targets to four billion
stg.
    Sterling money market rates moved lower again, with the key
three-month interbank rate down to 9-5/8 1/2 pct at the start
of business from 9-11/16 9/16 yesterday, and sterling rallied
to four-year highs against the dollar in very active trading.
    Government bond prices also surged on the budget, with
gains in excess of one point pushing yields on long-term paper
below nine pct for the first time in nearly a year.
    But today's smaller than expected rate cut appeared to have
placated markets for now, analysts said. Money market rates
recovered up to 1/4 point from earlier lows while both sterling
and gilts came off highs as trading ground to a near halt.
    Analysts said the slowdown was likely to be temporary, and
the reappraisal of sterling assets by international investors
was set to resume as early as tomorrow, leading to higher gilt
prices, exchange rate advances and lower money market rates.
    "Today's cut was slightly disappointing," said Bill Martin,
chief U.K. Economist at stockbrokers Phillips and Drew. "The
Bank of England is taking a very cautious line ... To temper
the markets' first rush of blood to the head after the budget."
    Analysts said the bank's move today to lend two-week cash
to U.K. Discount houses at a lower 10 pct suggested it hoped to
maintain the new rates for about that period of time.
    The analysts agreed success would depend largely on how
sterling performs in the near term.
    Sharp rises in the pound's value could be checked initially
through Bank of England intervention but eventually the gains
would force the bank to cut interest rates rates again.
    "The market seems to have accepted the modest cut for the
time being," said Midland Bank treasury economist David
Simmonds. "But I am sceptical that the bank will be able to hold
up rates for long."
    Simmonds said he saw sterling rising another two U.S. Cents
this week from around 1.60 dlrs, forcing a rate cut by Friday.
    Robin Marshall, chief economist at Chase Manhattan
Securities, said "There is another half point to come in the
near term, this week or next week at the latest...We see a
whole point off base rates in the next two or three weeks."
    Analysts stressed that apart from prestige, Britain had
very little to gain from a sharp rise in sterling's exchange
rate.
    Martin, of Phillips and Drew, said the dampening effect of
a sterling rise on consumer price inflation would not
materialise for at least nine months while its hampering impact
on manufactured exports would show almost immediately.
    Analysts said the budget, featuring income tax cuts as well
as cautious plans for public finances, had improved the chances
of re-election for the Conservative government and probably
advanced the election date. One must be held before June, 1988.
Combined with overall good prospects for the U.K. Economy, this
was likely to fuel a foreign rush on sterling-denominated
assets, pushing the pound's value well above unofficial
targets.
    With mark-denominated investments largely out of favour
because of low yields and a dull economic outlook, Chase's
Marshall said "Sterling is simply the best game in town,
especially after the budget, and demand will remain strong."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6543>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
enter the U.S. Government securities market to add temporary
reserves indirectly via 1.5 billion dlrs or more of customer
repurchase agreements, economists said.
    They said the below-six pct Federal funds rate suggests the
Fed does not have a large reserve adding need. However, some
dealers reportedly backed out of the three-day System
repurchase agreements set on Monday, leaving the Fed with a
somewhat increased need to supply reserves.
    Federal funds, which averaged 6.05 pct yesterday, opened at
5-15/16 pct and remained there in early trading.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6764>
A House Banking subcommittee has
approved legislation to limit the interest rates charged by
banks and other credit card issuers.
    The Consumer Affairs and Coinage subcommittee bill would
limit credit card interest rates at eight percentage points
above the yield on one-year Treasury securities.
    If in effect now, the bill would limit credit card rates to
13.8 pct compared to a nation-wide average of 18 pct, the
subcommittee said.
    The bill now goes to the full House Banking committee for
further action.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6922>
Financial analysts see little chance
that U.S. interest rate futures will break out of their narrow
ranges and low volatility during the remainder of the week.
    "We got a little volatility Wednesday," said Staley
Commodities International analyst Jerome Lacey. "But for the
moment we're still in a trading range."
    Even unexpected developments concerning the growth of the
U.S. economy may not be enough to spur the market out of its
sluggish state, the analysts said.
    "It (the bond market) has not yet demonstrated that it can
break out of its very low volatility," said Carroll McEntee and
McGinley analyst Denis Karnosky. "It needs something, but it's
not going to be news about the economy," he said.
    Karnosky said that the bond market will possibly break out
of the doldrums if participants perceive that the dollar has
stabilized and the Federal Reserve has more room to conduct
monetary policy.
    But even Wednesday, when fed funds were below six pct, the
dollar strong and oil on the soft side, bond futures attracted
eager sellers when contracts approached recent highs, he said.
    In addition to a changing perception about the dollar and
monetary policy, Golden Gate Futures president Norman Quinn
said the beginning of April could bring foreign investors back
into the marketplace.
    "The market is beginning to feel there may be demand at the
beginning of the fiscal year in Japan on April 1," Quinn said.
    Quinn echoed the sentiment of many analysts that there are
large amounts of cash waiting to be invested. If Japanese
investment in U.S. securities does materialize at the start of
Japan's fiscal year, domestic funds may also flow into the bond
market, he said.
    "We could get a stiff rally, possibly enough to bring
yields on long bonds down to seven to 7-1/8 pct," compared to
the current yield of about 7.5 pct, Quinn said.
    In the meantime, even the prospect of new supply is not
likely to move futures.
    The Treasury's announcement of a 15 billion dlr refunding
operation did little to move cash government securities prices
late Wednesday after the close of futures.
    "I'd be surprised if supply pushed us out of it (the
trading range)," Lacey said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7031>
The Bundesbank left credit policies
unchanged after today's regular meeting of its council, a
spokesman said in answer to enquiries.
    The West German discount rate remains at 3.0 pct, and the
Lombard emergency financing rate at 5.0 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7159>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
refrain from reserve-management intervention in the U.S.
Government securities market, economists said.
    If the Fed does act, however, they said it would be likely
to add temporary reserves indirectly by arranging around 1.5
billion dlrs of customer repurchase agreements.
    Federal funds, which averaged 5.97 pct yesterday, opened at
six pct and remained there in early trading.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7207>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange 1.5 billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a Fed spokesman said.
    Dealers said Federal funds were trading at six pct when the
Fed began its temporary and indirect supply of reserves to the
banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7310>
The Association of German Cooperative
Banks said in a financial survey that domestic interest rates
would continue to remain low for the time being.
    It said the Bundesbank could hold them down despite strong
foreign influence and it saw no interest-straining factors in
the economy that could affect the long-term capital market.
    The inflation rate of one pct also gave no occasion for
higher nominal interest rates. But a probable rise in inflation
late this year could give very slight grounds for a rise in
nominal rates at year's end and next year, it said.
    The association said generally low interest rates,
prospects of lower taxes, a stable dollar rate and expected
strong domestic demand led it to believe that the investment
climate would remain friendly and the economy would continue
its slow but very sure growth.
    The Bundesbank had managed successfully to keep interest
rates down on the short-term money market although its policies
had exerted little effect on the long-term capital market,
which was so important for investment financing and thus for
the course of the economy, it said.
    In view of the limits to the possibilities monetary policy
had in influencing the longer-term capital market, the
association saw little sense in wanting to boost the economy
through a short-term and expansionist monetary policy.
    On the other hand it also saw no reason for sticking
dogmatically to the money supply target for the whole of 1987.
    The association said time would show to what extent
speculative foreign money and short-term invested domestic
money would distort money supply developments. The Bundesbank
could hold down money market rates with the highly effective
instrument of sale and repurchase transactions, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7313>
Slower than expected growth in Britain's
narrow M0 money supply measure in February will help spur a
further cut in U.K. Interest rates if a surge in sterling's
value requires such a move, economic analysts said.
    M0, the only targeted money supply measure left after
Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson scrapped the official
target for the broad sterling M3 measure in his 1987 budget
speech on Tuesday, fell an adjusted 3/4 to one pct in February.
    On an annual basis, this put M0 growth at four to 4-1/2
pct, in the middle of the 1987 target of two to six pct.
    "The M0 data are much better than we expected," said Robert
Thomas, economist at Greenwell Montagu Securities.
    He and other analysts said while the better than expected
M0 figures alone would not be sufficient to trigger a new
interest rate cut, they removed an obstacle to such a move.
    Thomas noted the rise in M0 had been kept in check despite
buoyant retail sales in February, advancing an adjusted 2.2 pct
after a fall of the same size in January.
    Analysts said the M0 measure, reflecting variations in
consumer demand rather than real inflation prospects, was not
an adequate indicator to determine interest rates.
    "The authorities still seem to want to pretend that M0 is
important ... In practice, it is likely to be the exchange rate
and the election which call the tune," Lloyds Merchant bank
chief economist Roger Bootle wrote in a budget comment.
    Richard Jeffrey, economist at stockbrokers Hoare Govett,
said in a comment: "It is unlikely that (Lawson) will respond to
signals from M0 alone ... Reinforcement from exchange rate
trends is necessary before action is taken."
    "With the Chancellor making clear that policy manoeuvres are
made in response to signals from this narrow money variable,
the City has been forced to take it seriously," he added.
    Noting this point, Thomas said market fears at the end of
last year of an M0 overshoot had now disappeared.
    This removed a potential obstacle to a further cut in U.K.
Base lending rates if foreign demand for sterling pushed up the
pound above unofficial targets, analysts said.
    Such targets are believed to have been secretly agreed
between finance ministers of the Group of Five and Canada at
their Paris meeting last month, they added.
  U.K. Base rates have been cut twice by half a point since the
Paris agreement, once on March 11, and again yesterday when
foreign demand for sterling surged in reaction to a sharp cut
in 1987 government borrowing targets contained in the budget.
    They stand at 10 pct now, and foreign exchange dealers and
analysts expect them to shed another half-point in the coming
week.
    Analysts shrugged off as largely irrelevant a higher than
expected increase in February sterling M3, which pushed the
annual growth rate to almost 19 pct, well above the previous
target of 11 to 15 pct.
    Thomas said the February figures seemed to indicate the
improvement in sterling M3 growth witnessed over the past few
months had been reversed, but firm conclusions could only be
drawn after revised data are released on March 31.
    Some analysts said foreign investors had long ceased to
watch the sterling M3 target, and Lawson's move to scrap it
altogether earlier this week removed whatever was left of its
credibility as a key factor in monetary policy.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7460>
The Singapore International
Monetary Exchange Ltd, SIMEX, said it would launch at least two
options on futures contracts this year.
    SIMEX said in a press release that the options contracts
would be based on the currency and interest rate futures
currently traded on the exchange and be started "toward the
third quarter."
    SIMEX, which is linked to the Chicago Mercantile Exchange,
currently trades three currency futures -- on Deutsche marks,
Japanese yen and British pounds -- and two interest rate
futures -- on U.S. Treasury-bonds and three-month Eurodollars.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7499>
Latest Federal Reserve data suggest
that the U.S. banking system is flush with reserves going into
a period of traditional tightness and that overall monetary
policy is on hold, economists said.
    "There is ample liquidity.... The Fed is not going to shift
gears at the present time or for at least another month," said
Maria Ramirez of Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.
    "Technical and seasonal considerations aside, there is
nothing for the (credit) market to get excited about," added
Robert di Clemente of Salomon Brothers Inc.
    Adjusted bank borrowings from the Fed's discount window
averaged only 228 mln dlrs a day in the first week of the bank
statement period ending next Wednesday, compared with 233 mln
and 451 mln in the first weeks of the previous two periods.
    Another sign of abundant liquidity was the upward revision
in banks' net free reserves in the two-week period to March 11
to a daily average of 759 mln dlrs from an estimated 660 mln.
    Finally, a Fed spokesman told a press briefing that the 14
money center banks were absent from the Fed's discount window
for the third week running, with the latest week's borrowing
split between the large regional and the smaller banks.
    While modest open market intervention was apparently enough
to defuse any funding pressures in the first week of the latest
statement period, economists predicted that the Fed would have
to be more aggressive in coming weeks.
    The Fed injected temporary reserves directly and indirectly
on four of the five trading days via system and customer
repurchase agreements.
    "Fed funds will be coming under relatively intense
pressure," said Salomon's di Clemente, noting the approaching
month- and quarter-end and the round of holidays and tax dates
in April.
    "The Fed is faced with a large seasonal adding
requirement," said Ward McCarthy of Merrill Lynch and Co Inc,
who expects a permanent bill purchase next week and a coupon
purchase in early April.
    Economists were also heartened by further signs of a
deceleration in money supply growth, not only in the largely
discredited M-1 gauge but also in the more closely watched M-2
and M-3 aggregates.
    M-1 grew a mere 500 mln dlrs in the week to March nine,
compared with private forecasts of a 2.3 mln dlr rise. Weekly
M-2 and M-3 components also hinted at slower overall growth.
    "The M-1 increase was surprisingly modest and I suspect we
are on our way to another moderate set of M-2 and M-3 figures
for March," said Salomon's di Clemente. Merrill's McCarthy said
they could even come in below the bottom of their respective
target ranges.
    In February, M-2 was 18.2 billion dlrs below its upper
limit and M-3 was 20.8 billion beneath.
    Noting Fed Vice Chairman Johnson's encouraging remarks on
inflation today and recent interest rate cuts overseas, some
economists suggested this slowing in monetary growth could lend
support to calls for further accommodation here.
    "Our belief is that we could still get a move downwards in
rates before anything else," said Salomon's di Clemente, adding
that the key swing factor will continue to be the strength of
the U.S. economy.
    Jeffrey Leeds of Chemical Bank agreed that the economy's
health would remain the main influence on policy but, contrary
to di Clemente, he said that recent signs of faster growth and
inflation could lead to higher rates first.
    Drexel's Ramirez did not commit herself either way, adding
that the next major move may have to wait until April 14 when
February's U.S. trade data are due for release.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7538>
Japanese short-term interest rates,
buoyed recently by seasonal factors, are likely to fall from
the beginning of April when the new financial year begins,
money traders said.
    The Bank of Japan is expected to encourage the trend
following its attempts to pressure rates to enhance its
discount rate cut on February 23, they said.
    The Bank cut the rate to 2.5 pct from three, and began
actively injecting funds into the money market to offset rate
rises resulting from the end-of-fiscal-year surge in demand for
funds from financial institutions.
    Despite its attempts to dampen rates with measures such as
aggressive commercial bill purchases, the central bank has
failed to remove all upward pressure, money traders said.
    Attractive interest rates offered by domestic banks to
compete for time deposits of more than 600 mln yen has
underpinned short-term rates, they said.
    Interest rates on time deposits of more than 600 mln yen
were decontrolled by the Finance Ministry last September.
    This resulted in such deposits with domestic banks rising
to 17,830 billion yen by the end-December, a three-fold
increase on end-December 1985 levels, bankers said.
    On March 31, the money market expects to see a 2,000
billion yen surplus resulting from government payment of fiscal
funds, money traders said.
    From April 1, they predict the unconditional call rate will
fall to 3.5000 pct from 3.7500 pct today and the one-month
commercial bill discount rate to drop to 3.7500 pct from 4.0635
pct.
    They predict the three-month bill discount rate to slip to
3.875 pct from 4.0000 today and the three-month certificate of
deposit rate to slide to 4.10/4.15 from 4.35/25.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7559>
The Dutch Central Bank said it has
accepted bids totalling 4.00 billion guilders at tender this
morning for new five-day special advances at 5.3 pct for the
period March 20 to 25.
    Subscriptions to 250 mln guilders were fully met, amounts
above 250 mln at 30 pct.
    The new facility replaces old 11-day advances totalling 6.5
billion guilders at the same rate.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7562>
The Bank of England said it had invited
an early round of bill offers from the discount houses after
forecasting a shortage of around 950 mln stg in the money
market today.
    Among the main factors affecting liquidity, bills maturing
in official hands and the take-up of treasury bills will drain
around 572 mln stg while a rise in note circulation wil take
out some 280 mlns stg.
    In addition, exchequer transactions and bankers' balances
below target will remove some 85 mln stg and 15 mln stg for the
system respectively.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7571>
The Bank of England said it had provided
the money market with 728 mln stg assistance in response to an
early round of bill offers from the discount houses.
    Earlier, the Bank had estimated the shortage in the system
today at 950 mln stg.
    The central bank purchased 625 mln stg of bills for resale
to the market on April 7 at rates of interest between 9-15/16
pct and 10 pct.
    It also bought 103 mln stg bank bills outright comprising
65 mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct and 38 mln stg in band two
at 9-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7587>
The Bank of Spain suspended its daily
money market assistance and offered to drain funds with three-
and seven-day repurchase agreements at 12-1/2 pct, money market
sources said.
    The sources said the measures were a further attempt to
rein in money supply and were likely to force some institutions
to scramble for funds before the 10-day accounting period for
reserve requirements closes on Monday.
    The bank, which raised its rate for ordinary overnight
assistance to 13-3/4 from 13-1/2 pct on Wednesday, opened its
special borrowing facility for overnight funds at 14-1/2 pct.
    Money market sources said institutions in need of funds
were likely to have to return to the bank tomorrow for further
assistance.
    The bank rarely invites applications for ordinary
assistance on a Saturday and the sources said it was more
likely to open its special borrowing facility again.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7599>
The Bank of England said it gave the
money market another 31 mln stg in assistance in the morning
session.
    This brings the Bank's total help today to 759 mln stg and
compares with its estimate of a 1.05 billion stg money market
shortage which it earlier revised up from 950 mln stg.
    The central bank bought 31 mln stg of bank bills outright
in band two at 9-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7614>
The Bank of Spain suspended its daily
money market assistance and offered to drain funds with three-
and seven-day repurchase agreements at 12-1/2 pct, money market
sources said.
    The sources said the measures were a further attempt to
rein in money supply and were likely to force some institutions
to scramble for funds before the 10-day accounting period for
reserve requirements closes on Monday.
    The bank, which raised its rate for ordinary overnight
assistance to 13-3/4 from 13-1/2 pct on Wednesday, opened its
special borrowing facility for overnight funds at 14-1/2 pct.
    Money market sources said institutions in need of funds
were likely to have to return to the bank tomorrow for further
assistance.
    The bank rarely invites applications for ordinary
assistance on a Saturday and the sources said it was more
likely to open its special borrowing facility again.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7652>
The Bank of England said it had given
the money market a further 186 mln stg assistance in the
afternoon session. This brings the Bank's total help so far
today to 945 mln stg and compares with its revised forecast of
a one billion stg deficit.
    The central bank bought bank bills outright comprising 51
mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct and 135 mln stg in band two at
9-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7716>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
intervene in the government securities market to add temporary
reserves indirectly via 1.5-2.0 billion dlrs of customer
repurchase agreements, economists said.
    Federal funds, which averaged 6.06 pct yesterday, opened at
6-1/16 pct and remained there in early trading.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7769>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange 1.5 billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a Fed spokesman said.
    Dealers said Federal funds were trading at 6-1/16 pct when
the Fed began its temporary and indirect supply of reserves to
the banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8103>
Japan's long-term banks will soon cut
their prime rate, now at a record low 5.5 pct, by 0.2 or 0.3
percentage point in response to falling secondary market yields
on their five-year debentures, long-term bankers said.
    The long-term prime rate is customarily set 0.9 percentage
point above the coupon on five-year bank debentures issued by
the long-term banks every month.
    The latest bank debentures, at 4.6 pct, have met strong
end-investor demand on the prospect of further declines in yen
interest rates, dealers said. The current 5.5 pct prime rate
has been in effect since February 28.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8135>
Debt among African countries
will continue to grow and their economies remain stifled unless
developed countries lower their interest rates, Nigerian Trade
Minister Samaila Mamman said.
    He told an informal General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade
(GATT) meeting the widening gap between developed and
developing countries and an inequitable international economic
system were major impediments to growth in developing
countries.
    Delegates from 23 countries are attending the GATT talks in
the New Zealand resort of Taupo.
    "I wish to emphasise that the growth in the volume of the
external indebtedness of African countries reflects the full
effect of the deflationary monetary and trade policies of the
developed market economy countries," Mamman said.
    "The developed market economy countries have slowed down
output growth thereby drying up markets for the commodity
exports of African countries."
    Mamman said the World Bank estimated 35.3 billion dlrs a
year would be needed over the next five years for the African
continent to be able to achieve a gross domestic product growth
(GDP) rate of three to four pct by 1990.
    Yet at the same time Africa's debt service was estimated at
24.5 billion dlrs a year between 1986 and 1990.
    "With the best of intentions Africa cannot attain a three to
four pct GDP growth rate if the current high level of debt
persists," Mamman said. Developed countries must seek
alternatives to policies that resulted in the transfer of
resources and more indebtedness, he said.
    "The international community cannot fail to respond
positively to the collapse of the international market for
commodities ... And act quickly to stabilize demand and prices
of our commodity exports," he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8137>
West German bond yields could decline
over the next few months if recent efforts to stabilize
exchange rates, as seen in last month's Paris pact, extend to
keeping down European interest rates, banking economists said.
    But in the longer term domestic yields could rise under
agreements to stimulate West Germany's economy, they said.
    The Paris agreement has so far successfully stabilized
currencies with the threat of central bank intervention,
economists said.
    Economists speculated that G-7 countries may try to bolster
the pact by uncoupling U.S. and West German interest rates
further when they meet for the IMF Interim Committee in April.
"The recent round of monetary accommodation by the Bundesbank
and the Bank of Japan and the firming of the Federal Funds rate
are significant. They mark an uncoupling of movements in U.S.
and foreign interest rates," Salomon Bros Inc said in a recent
study.
    It said narrowing of international interest rate spreads
was a major factor in the dollar's fall. These spreads will
have to be widened if the dollar is to be stabilized.
    West German Bundesbank President Karl Otto Poehl encouraged
the U.S. not to cut interest rates in January when the
Bundesbank cut its own rates by half a point, to avoid
weakening the dollar.
    West German economists see room for further cuts in leading
West German rates if the dollar resumes its decline.
    "It's not a taboo," Peter Pietsch, spokesman for Commerzbank
AG said.
    But most economists see room for a cut in West German rates
only in the first half of the year, as re-emerging inflation
will limit room for manoeuvre later in the year.
    The Bundesbank's average yield of public paper is already
nearing last year's low. Last week, yields fell to around 5.50
pct, not far from the 1986 low of 5.35 pct posted in mid-April.
 Economists said the trend may cause domestic investors to
shift some funds from short to longer-term paper. Such a move
would tend to flatten the yield curve between short and
long-term rates, which has become more pronounced since the
Bundesbank lowered its discount rate.
    It might also facilitate a further cut in leading rates, as
the shift out of savings accounts into securities would slow
growth of the Bundesbank's central bank money stock aggregate.
    But conflicting with this trend are plans to increase West
German tax cuts, part of the Paris currency pact designed to
meet U.S. demands for faster West German growth. This move may
force interest rates up by creating a revenue vacuum which must
be filled by higher government borrowing.
    This may not occur if private sector demand for credit
remains weak, but demand could emerge if rates begin rising.
    Economists said it appeared the government had already
stepped up borrowing this year to accomodate revenue loss from
other sources, including tax losses resulting from weaker than
expected economic growth, and higher than expected spending.
    Josef Koerner, chief economist of the West German
Ifo-Institut, said in a newspaper interview he expected 1987
tax revenue to be some 11 billion marks below estimates by the
West German government in November.
    Any tax shortfall in itself is unlikely to push yields up.
But coupled with other factors such as waning foreign
speculative buying of mark bonds on the dollar's decline, long
term yields may to have to rise, economists said.
    Public authority borrowing in 1988 may also rise owing to
increases in the second phase of Bonn's tax reform package.
    The West German government is raising its total tax cuts in
1988 by 5.2 billion marks to 14.4 billion.
    West German chancellor Helmut Kohl said last week increased
borrowing to finance the tax reform is acceptable.
    Finance minister Gerhard Stoltenberg said last Thursday he
was looking for other ways to finance the reform, such as
raising indirect taxes.
    But few economists believe the government will be able to
go through with its tax measures without increasing net
borrowing.
    The Bundesbank said in its February report that it was
wrong to believe that the first stage of the tax reform in 1986
could be managed without increasing deficits.
    The Bundesbank said West German public authorities borrowed
a large 21.9 billion marks in credit markets in the 1986 final
quarter compared with 14.8 billion in fourth quarter 1985.
    The federal government took up nearly 10 billion marks of
the fourth quarter 1986 figures, and also drew on two billion
marks of Bundesbank advances at the end of the year, when it
had not required such a credit in the 1985 quarter.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8145>
The Bundesbank set a new tender for a
28-day securities repurchase agreement, offering banks
liquidity aid at a fixed rate of 3.80 pct, a central bank
spokesman said.
    Banks must make their bids by 1000 GMT tomorrow, and funds
allocated will be credited to accounts on Wednesday. Banks must
repurchase securities pledged on April 22.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8147>
The Bank of England said it forecast a
shortage of around 800 mln stg in the money market today.
    Among the main factors affecting liquidity, bills maturing
in official hands and the take-up of treasury bills will drain
around 1.18 billion stg while bankers balances below target
will take out some 20 mln stg.
    Partly offseting these outflows, a fall in note circulation
and exchequer transactions will add some 355 and 55 mln stg to
the system respectively.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8153>
Japan is expected to post a 3.6 pct rise
in real gross national product in 1987/88, higher than the
official 3.5 pct target, a private economic institute said.
    The Research Institute on National Economy said in a report
the economy will start picking up in the April-June quarter,
partly because of an improvement in earnings performance and
capital spending in manufacturing industries.
    The institute assumed an average exchange rate in the year
starting April 1 of 150 yen to the dollar. It predicted the
Bank of Japan will not change the official discount rate in the
year.
    The institute forecast that Japan's exports will gradually
rise in the year in volume terms as the dollar's fall in the
past 18 months is likely to help prop up the U.S. Economy.
    Japan's trade surplus is expected to narrow slightly to
90.2 billion dlrs in 1987/88 ending March 31 from an estimated
98 billion in the current fiscal year, it said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8168>
The Bank of France will not hold a money
market intervention tender today, ruling out a further cut in
its 7-3/4 pct intervention rate, central bank sources said.
    At the tenders, depending on market conditions, the Bank
injects liquidity into the market by buying up first category
paper. But market sources said that while the recent franc
performance leaves room for a further quarter point cut in the
intervention rate there was plenty of market liquidity.
    The Bank cut its rate to 7-3/4 pct from eight pct on March
9, the first change since January 2. Interest rates also fell
the same week in Britain, Belgium and Italy.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8182>
The Bank of England said it revised down
its forecast of the deficit in the money market today to 750
mln stg from 800 mln.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8184>
Japan's long-term banks will soon cut
their prime rate, now at a record low 5.5 pct, by 0.2 or 0.3
percentage point in response to falling secondary market yields
on their five-year debentures, long-term bankers said.
    The long-term prime rate is customarily set 0.9 percentage
point above the coupon on five-year bank debentures issued by
the long-term banks every month.
    The latest bank debentures, at 4.6 pct, have met strong
end-investor demand on the prospect of further declines in yen
interest rates, dealers said. The current 5.5 pct prime rate
has been in effect since February 28.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8194>
The Bank of England said it provided the
money market with help of 97 mln stg in the morning session.
    This compares with the Bank's revised estimate of a 750 mln
stg shortage in the system today.
    The central bank bought bank bills outright comprising 12
mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct and 85 mln stg in band two at
9-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8247>
The Bank of England said it had given
the money market a further 485 mln stg assistance in the
afternoon session. This takes the Bank's total help so far
today to 582 mln stg and compares with its forecast of a 750
mln stg shortage in the system today.
    The central bank bought bank bills outright comprising 345
mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct and 75 mln stg in band two at
9-3/16 pct. It also purchased 65 mln stg of treasury bills in
band one at 9-7/8 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8299>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
intervene in the government securities market to add temporary
reserves indirectly via 1.5 to 2.5 billion dlrs of customer
repurchase agreements, economists said.
    They said that while the Fed has only a moderate add need
over the next few days, it will probably intervene in an
attempt to counteract an elevated federal funds rate.
    Fed funds, which averaged 6.09 pct on Friday, opened at
6-3/16 pct and remained at that level in early trading.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8344>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange 1.5 billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a Fed spokesman said.
    Dealers said Federal funds were trading at 6-3/16 pct when
the Fed began its temporary and indirect supply of reserves to
the banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8401>
Standard Federal Bank said it
introduced a zero-point fixed rate mortgage loan.
    The loan program offers borrowers home mortgage financing
with no discount fees charged.
    Standard said that fees charged will include an application
fee, commitment fee and out-of-pocket expenses such as title
work, survey, recording fees and private mortgage insurance.
    
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8677>
The Bundesbank accepted bids for 6.5
billion marks at today's tender for a 28-day securities
repurchase pact at a rate of 3.80 pct, a central bank spokesman
said.
    Banks, which bid for a total 8.6 billion marks liquidity,
will be credited with the funds allocated tomorrow and must buy
back securities pledged on April 22.
    The allocation was in line with market expectations the
Bundesbank would provide more than the 3.4 billion marks
draining from this week as an earlier facility expires.
    Call money fell to 3.60/70 pct ahead of the allocation from
3.75/85 pct yesterday, dealers said.
    The excess allocation compensates for public funds leaving
the system which the Bundesbank added last week via
government-owned banks.
    However major tax payments by banks on behalf of customers
drew to a close this week, lessening the need for liquidity.
    The call money declines surprised some dealers, who
speculated it was because the Bundesbank disbursed further
government funds today. However, most said this had not
occurred.
    Banks were well stocked with liquidity, having 47.1 billion
marks in minimum reserves at the Bundesbank on Friday, up from
49.9 billion on Thursday. Average daily reserves over the first
20 days of the month fell to 52.6 billion from 53.1 billion.
For all of March, banks would be required to hold net daily
average reserves of 50.7 billion marks, dealers said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8723>
The Bank of Spain raised overnight call
money rates by 1/4 to 14 pct on demand for 746 billion pesetas
in today's auction, which a bank spokesman termed "heavy."
    Rates stood at 12.1 pct at the start of the year and have
been increased to drain liquidity on rising demands for funds,
the spokesman said.
    He said in reply to Reuters inquiries that rates could rise
further if money supply growth rose above this year's eight pct
target for M-4, defined as liquid assets in public hands.
    Money supply rose at an annualised rate of 16.7 pct last
month against 8.1 pct in January. Growth was 11.4 pct in 1986.
    A leading Spanish broker said the central bank was applying
a more restrictive policy to keep the lid on inflation.
    The consumer price index rose 8.3 pct last year.
    "Money supply control is the government's chief weapon
against inflation," he said. "The problem is higher rates are
attracting liquidity from abroad."
    He said this was why the central bank enacted specific
measures to control the inflow of foreign capital. The Bank of
Spain earlier this month imposed a 19 pct reserve requirement
on new convertible peseta funds held by banks to curb
short-term speculative capital from abroad.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8802>
The Federal Reserve may intervene in
the government securities market to add reserves today, some
economists said, although others felt that the Fed was likely
to refrain from any action.
    Those who believed the Fed will intervene said it would
probably add temporary reserves indirectly via 1.5 to two
billion dlrs of customer repurchase agreements.
    But others noted the Fed's current add-need is not large.
They also expected the federal funds rate to edge lower.
    Fed funds, which averaged 6.21 pct on Monday, opened at
6-1/8 pct and remained at that level in early trading.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8884>
The move by foreign exchange markets to
test the strength of the Paris currency accord has thrown into
question the near-term outlook for sterling, until recently one
of the main beneficiaries of the agreement, analysts said.
    Since the six-nation accord last month, sterling has risen
sharply, adding almost five pct on its trade-weighted index.
    While the accord effectively stifled dollar/yen and
dollar/mark movements, the markets turned their attention to
sterling as foreign investors rushed to take advantage of
relatively high U.K. Interest rates.
    But analysts say the pound has been sidelined by the first
tentative test of the Paris accord seen yesterday.
    The market now looks set sooner or later to push the dollar
down further in a test of the willingness of central banks to
intervene. Analysts say if the banks do not intervene
effectively, the Paris accord could collapse.
    "On balance, sterling would be a net sufferer if G-6
collapses," Phillips and Drew analyst Stephen Lewis said.
    He said sterling would lose out as markets turned their
attention to capital movements whereas previously they had been
restricted to looking only at the interest yield on currencies.
    However, although most analysts and foreign exchange
dealers were forecasting a brief period of consolidation or
even retracement for sterling, none were expecting a very sharp
drop in the U.K. Currency.
    Sterling remained supported by optimism on the U.K.
Political and economic outlook, firmer oil prices and
relatively high interest rates, they said.
    Bullish sentiment on the U.K. Economic outlook has been
running especially high after last week's budget, seen as
popular both with the markets and with British voters.
    Sterling was also supported by signs of a weakening in the
West German and Japanese economies, where growth for 1987 is
trailing behind the three pct forecast for the U.K.
    Recent opinion polls showing Britain's ruling conservative
party ahead of opposition parties in popularity have also
supported the pound.
    In addition, sterling has so far shrugged off two
half-point cuts in U.K. Bank base lending rates in less than
two weeks. A further half-point cut, widely expected in the
next week or so, has already been largely discounted.
    U.K. Base rates, now running at 10 pct, are still
relatively high compared to other western countries, and
analysts said a further base rate cut to 9-1/2 pct was unlikely
to affect sterling.
    Sterling today appeared resilient to the dollar's decline,
dropping only slightly on a cross-rate basis.
    Worries about renewed turbulence in the foreign exchange
markets, however, were reflected in the U.K. Government bond
(gilt) market, where prices dropped by up to 5/16 point.
    Until now foreign investor interest in the gilt market has
been one of the major reasons behind the rise in sterling.
    Dealers said they expected the pound to hold quietly steady
for the next few days while the market awaits further
developments on the dollar and this Thursday's U.K. Current
account figures for February.
    Market forecasts are for a deficit of around 250 mln stg
after January's small surplus.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8951>
The Federal Reserve purchased about
500 mln dlrs of U.S. Treasury bills for a customer, a
spokeswoman said.
    She said that the Fed bought bills maturing in June and
July, and on August 27 and September 10 for regular delivery
tomorrow.
    Dealers said that Federal funds were trading at 6-1/8 pct
when the Fed announced the operation.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8991>
American Express Co's &lt;AXP> recent
launch of a new "OPTIMA" credit card, with relatively low
interest rates and fees, will increase competition with bank
credit-card issuers but will not lead to a pricing war, a
senior Citicorp offical said.
    "Over the next two to three years, a very interesting
marketing battle will be fought ... competition will not be on
price but on product features," Pei-yuan Chia, head of the U.S.
card products group, told a banking analysts meeting.
    Citicorp is the leading U.S. bank credit-card issuer, with
some 10 mln accounts and an 11 pct market share.
    Chia said that Citicorp would focus its credit card
marketing efforts on acceptance, noting that Visa and
Mastercard currently enjoy a two-to-one advantage over American
Express in terms of worldwide acceptance.
    He also doubted the popularity of American Express' plan to
link interest charges on the new OPTIMA card to the bank prime
lending rate. "The consumer likes to have a fixed rate
instrument," he said.
    Richard Braddock, head of the whole individual banking
division, added that when there is increased competition, "it
is not the big people who get crunched but the small ones."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9012>
Treasury balances at the Federal
Reserve rose on March 23 to 3.332 billion dlrs from 3.062
billion dlrs on the previous business day, the Treasury said in
its latest budget statement.
    Balances in tax and loan note accounts fell to 15.513
billion dlrs from 17.257 billion dlrs on the same respective
days.
    The Treasury's operating cash balance totaled 18.845
billion dlrs on March 23 compared with 20.318 billion dlrs on
March 20.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9138>
Bank of Japan governor Satoshi Sumita
said the central bank has no intention of cutting its discount
rate again as a way of preventing the yen's rise.
    He told a press conference that the growth of Japanese
money supply remains high.
    The bank will have to watch closely various developments
resulting from its already eased monetary stance, such as the
sharp rise in real estate and stock prices, he said.
    Although the yen's rise will have a greater deflationary
impact on the economy, the economy is not likely to slow down
much further, Sumita said.
    "I don't think we should change our economic outlook at the
moment," Sumita said.
    Sumita has said in the past that he expects the economy to
show a gradual upturn in the second half of the year.
    The governor said the six major industrial nations are
expected to review last month's pact on currency stability when
they meet next in April.
    Dealers said they expect the six - Britain, Canada, France,
Japan, the U.S. Amd West Germany - to meet just before the
IMF/World Bank interim committee meeting in Washington starting
on April 9.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9164>
The Dutch Central Bank said it
allocated 4.183 billion guilders at tender for the new 5.3 pct,
nine-day special advances.
    Bids were fully met for the first 200 mln guilders and for
40 pct above.
    The new advances for the period March 25 to April 4,
replace current 5.3 pct, five day advances totalling 4.003
billion guilders which expire today.
    Money brokers said yesterday they expected the Bank to
allocate about 3.5 billion guilders.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9216>
Bank of Japan governor Satoshi Sumita
said the central bank has no intention of cutting its discount
rate again as a way of preventing the yen's rise.
    He told a press conference that the growth of Japanese
money supply remains high.
    The bank will have to watch closely various developments
resulting from its already eased monetary stance, such as the
sharp rise in real estate and stock prices, he said.
    Although the yen's rise will have a greater deflationary
impact on the economy, the economy is not likely to slow down
much further, Sumita said.
    "I don't think we should change our economic outlook at the
moment," Sumita said.
    Sumita has said in the past that he expects the economy to
show a gradual upturn in the second half of the year.
    The governor said the six major industrial nations are
expected to review last month's pact on currency stability when
they meet next in April.
    Dealers said they expect the six - Britain, Canada, France,
Japan, the U.S. Amd West Germany - to meet just before the
IMF/World Bank interim committee meeting in Washington starting
on April 9.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9261>
The Bank of England said it revised up
its forecast of today's surplus in the money markets to 250 mln
stg from its earlier estimate of a 150 mln.
    The central bank has not operated in the market today.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9361>
The Federal Reserve will probably
intervene in the government securities market to add reserves
today, economists said.
    They expected the Fed will supply temporary reserves
indirectly via 1.5 to two billion dlrs of customer repurchase
agreements.
    Fed funds hovered at a relatively high 6-1/4 pct this
morning after averaging 6.14 pct on Tuesday.
    Early this afternoon the Fed also is expected to supply
reserves permanently, effective Thursday, by offering to buy
all maturities of Treasury bills.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9656>
The House Banking Committee adopted
legislation to direct the U.S. Treasury to begin negotiations
aimed at seeking regular adjustment of exchange rates by  
countries such as Taiwan and South Korea, whose currencies are
pegged to the value of the U.S. dollar.
    The measure was adopted as part of a wide-ranging trade
bill that will be considered by the full House in April before
it moves on to the Senate.
    The bill's many provisions also set as a priority for the
U.S. the negotiation of stable exchange rates and urge
government intervention as necessary to offset fluctuations.
    In addition, the Banking Committee bill would authorize
U.S. banks to use a variety of means to deal with the debt
problems of developing countries, such as lowering interest
rates on existing debt, renegotiating loans or debt
forgiveness. The bill would give a blanket waiver of any
federal banking regulations that bar such actions.
    The bill would direct Treasury Secretary James Baker to
discuss with debt-ridden developing countries the possibility
of the U.S. setting up a public debt management agency that
would purchase their debt at a discount and negotiate the
restructuring of the debt.
    The Banking bill authorizes U.S. participation in a
multilateral investment guarantee agency (MIGA) as requested by
the administration. Congress would approve an initial U.S.
subscription of 22 mln dlrs.
    And, it sets up a council on industrial competitiveness
composed of industry and administration members to explore ways
to make the U.S. more competitive in world markets.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9675>
The Reserve Bank of Australia this morning
cut the rediscount rate from 17.30 pct to 17.00 pct.
    The rediscount is the rate at which the bank buys back
treasury notes.
    Market sources said the cut reflected the recent easing in
market interest rates. They also pointed to yesterday's
treasury note tender where the 400 mln dlrs of 13-week notes
went at an average yield of 15.473 pct, down from 15.870 last
week. The 100 mln dlrs of 26-week notes went at an average
15.414 from 15.790 last week.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9701>
Bank of Japan Governor Satoshi Sumita
said a further yen rise would have adverse effects on the
Japanese economy.
    He told Japanese business leaders the Bank of Japan will
continue to take adequate measures, including market
intervention, to stabilize exchange rates if necessary, in
close cooperation with other major industrialized nations. He
said the current instability of exchange rates will not last.
    Six major nations - Britain, Canada, France, Japan, the
U.S. And West Germany - agreed in Paris last month to act
together to hold currencies stable.
    Sumita said the Bank of Japan will continue to pursue
adequate and flexible monetary policies while watching economic
and financial developments in and outside Japan.
    He said the decision to cut the discount rate on February
20 was a hard choice for the Bank because monetary conditions
had already been sufficiently eased.
    To prevent a resurgence of inflation, the Bank will take a
very cautious stance regarding developments stemming from easy
credit conditions, he said.
    He said the latest discount rate cut to 2.5 pct should
stabilize exchange rates and expand domestic demand.
    Commenting on the dollar's fall below 150 yen, Sumita
reiterated he cannot find any specific reason for the
currency's weakness.
    The market undertook speculative dollar selling by reacting
to overseas comments by monetary authorities and trade tension,
he said.
    Sumita repeated that the Japanese economy may gradually
recover in the latter half of the 1987/88 fiscal year ending
April 1, 1988, provided exchange rates stabilize.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9730>
The Bank of France said it set a money
market intervention tender today to inject funds to the market
against first category paper.
    Money market sources said the surprise announcement might
herald a quarter percentage point cut in the central bank
intervention rate from the 7-3/4 pct level set March 10, but
they added such a cut was relatively unlikely.
    The intervention rate was cut from eight pct on March 10
after being raised from 7-1/4 pct on January 2 to head off
speculative pressure against the franc.
    Dealers said market fundamentals could justify a further
easing, but a combination of technical factors and renewed
currency uncertainties surrounding the dollar had put
short-term upside pressure on interest rates in recent
sessions.
    Call money rose yesterday to 7-7/8 eight pct from 7-3/4 7/8
pct. Today it was first indicated at 8-1/8 1/4 before easing on
news of the tender to 7-13/16 7/8 pct.
    Technical factors making for a slight shortage of liquidity
in the market included the settlement yesterday of the latest
monthly treasury tap stock tender, on March 5, market sources
said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9784>
The release of U.K. February trade data
showing that the current account surplus was a provisional 376
mln stg, up from a 73 mln surplus in January, has boosted hopes
of an early cut in interest rates, analysts said.
    Market forecasts had been for a worse outcome, with
expectations of a deficit in visible trade averaging about 750
mln stg, against the official figure of 224 mln stg, sharply
narrower than January's 527 mln deficit.
    "The figures are unreservedly good," Chase Manhattan
Securities economist Andrew Wroblewski said.
    Sterling rebounded on the trade figures, reversing a weaker
morning trend, to stand at 72.1 pct of its trade weighted index
against a basket of currencies at midday, unchanged from
yesterday's close but 0.3 points above the 1100 GMT level.
    The market had feared that a deteriorating non-oil trade
pattern would undermine international support for sterling,
which has been the motor behind the recent fall in U.K.
Interest rates. Money market sources said the market had begun
to doubt that a widely expected drop in bank base lending rates
to 9.5 pct from the present 10.0 pct was really on the cards.
    But sentiment now looks to have turned about again.
    There now looks to be no danger that the Chancellor of the
Exchequer Nigel Lawson's forecast of a 1987 current account
deficit of 2.5 billion stg will be exceeded, Wroblewski said.
    Seasonally adjusted figures showed imports rose in February
to 7.16 billion stg from 6.73 billion in January.
    Exports rose to a record 6.93 billion from 6.20 billion.
    However, Chris Tinker, U.K. Analyst at brokers Phillips and
Drew said the faster rise in exports than imports would prove
partly aberrational in coming months. He forecast the
Chancellor's Budget tax cuts would increase consumer
expenditure on imported goods.
    However, Warburg Securities economist Ian Harwood said his
firm was sharply revising its 1987 current account deficit
forecast in the light of the latest data, cutting one billion
stg off the expected full year total to about 1.75 billion stg.
    He said news of strong growth in exports of non-oil goods
confirmed recent bullish surveys among members of the
Confederation of British Industry.
    The growth in imports appears to be flattening, even if
January's bad weather had curbed consumer spending on overseas
goods and import-intensive stock building among manufacturers,
Harwood said.
    U.K. Government bonds, or gilts, surged by more than 1/2
point on the better-than-expected news, as earlier worries
about the figures evaporated.
    Sterling peaked at a high of 1.6075 dlrs, before settling
to a steady 1.6050 about 1300 GMT, nearly a cent higher than
the European low of 1.5960.
    However, analysts noted that the turnabout in market
sentiment still looks highly vulnerable to political news.
    Morning weakness in sterling and the gilt market was
largely attributed to a newspaper opinion poll showing that the
Conservative government's support was slipping.
    LONDON, March 26 - The Bank of England said it provided 15
mln stg in assistance to the money market this morning, buying
bank bills in band two at 9-13/16 pct.
    Earlier the Bank revised its money market liquidity
forecast from a flat position to a deficit of around 350 mln
stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9841>
The Bank of Spain provided 1,145 billion
pesetas in assistance funds which bankers said reflected fears
of fresh increases in overnight rates.
    The daily auction was the biggest of the year and comes
after the previous record set last June 6 of 1,240 billion
pesetas.
    A spokesman for one of Spain top five banks said higher
overnight call money rates were expected in the short term in
view of disappointing money supply figures for February.
    The M-4 money supply, measured as liquid assets in public
hands, rose 16.7 pct last month against 8.1 pct in January and
compared with this year's eight pct target. Money supply growth
was 11.4 pct last year.
    The central bank on Tuesday raised overnight rates by a
quarter of a percentage point to 14 pct on demand for 746
billion pesetas. Rates stood at 12.1 pct at the start of the
year and have been increased to drain liquidity on rising
demand for funds. "The policy is proving counter-productive and
rates will have to come down in the long-term," the bank
spokesman said in reply to Reuters enquiries.
    He said higher rates were fuelling an influx of short-term
speculative capital from abroad.
    "At least 800 mln dlrs of current excess liquidity in the
system is convertible pesetas from West Germany and other
countries with much lower rates," he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9848>
The release of U.K. February trade data
showing that the current account surplus was a provisional 376
mln stg, up from a 73 mln surplus in January, has boosted hopes
of an early cut in interest rates, analysts said.
    Market forecasts had been for a worse outcome, with
expectations of a deficit in visible trade averaging about 750
mln stg, against the official figure of 224 mln stg, sharply
narrower than January's 527 mln deficit.
    "The figures are unreservedly good," Chase Manhattan
Securities economist Andrew Wroblewski said.
    Sterling rebounded on the trade figures, reversing a weaker
morning trend, to stand at 72.1 pct of its trade weighted index
against a basket of currencies at midday, unchanged from
yesterday's close but 0.3 points above the 1100 GMT level.
    The market had feared that a deteriorating non-oil trade
pattern would undermine international support for sterling,
which has been the motor behind the recent fall in U.K.
Interest rates. Money market sources said the market had begun
to doubt that a widely expected drop in bank base lending rates
to 9.5 pct from the present 10.0 pct was really on the cards.
    But sentiment now looks to have turned about again.
    There now looks to be no danger that the Chancellor of the
Exchequer Nigel Lawson's forecast of a 1987 current account
deficit of 2.5 billion stg will be exceeded, said Wroblewski.
    Seasonally adjusted figures showed that imports rose in
February to 7.16 billion stg from 6.73 billion in January.
    Exports rose to a record 6.93 billion from 6.20 billion.
    However, Chris Tinker, U.K. Analyst at brokers Phillips and
Drew said that the faster rise in exports than imports would
prove partly aberrational in coming months. He forecast the
Chancellor's Budget tax cuts would increase consumer expediture
on imported goods.
    However, Ian Harwood, economist at Warburg Securities, said
his firm was sharply revising its 1987 current account deficit
forecast in the light of the latest data, cutting one billion
stg off the expected full year total to about 1.75 billion stg.
    He said news of strong growth in exports of non-oil goods
confirmed recent bullish surveys among members of the
Confederation of British Industry.
    The growth in imports appears to be flattening, even if
January's bad weather had curbed consumer spending on overseas
goods and import-intensive stock building among manufactureres,
Harwood said.
    U.K. Government bonds, or gilts, surged by more than 1/2
point on the better-than-expected news, as earlier worries
about the figures evaporated.
    Sterling peaked at a high of 1.6075 dlrs, before settling
to a steady 1.6050 dlrs about 1300 GMT, nearly a cent higher
than the European low of 1.5960.
    However, analysts noted that the turnabout in market
sentiment still looks highly vulnerable to political news.
    Morning weakness in sterling and the gilt market was
largely attributed to a newspaper opinion poll showing that the
Conservative government's support was slipping.
    The Marplan poll, published in "Today," showed Conservative
support had fallen to 36 pct, from 38 pct last month, while the
Alliance of Liberals and Social Democrats had rallied to 31
pct, from 21 pct, to run neck and neck with the Labour Party,
whose own support fell from 38 pct.
    The poll was taken after the Budget, which was greeted
enthusiastically by financial markets but seems to have left
the voters indifferent, political observers said.
    Another regular poll is due tomorrow, and eonomists warn
that today's improved sentiment could be dented if support for
Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher slips again.
    This upsetting of the markets' political perceptions, which
are all but discounting a Conservative victory in the upcoming
general election, made them more sensitive to the trade data,
Harwood said. "The news did come as a very, very substantial
relief," he said.
    However, on the interest rate front, economists caution
that Lawson might be wary of leaving sterling vulnerable by
encouraging another base rate fall. They noted Lawson had
already got an inflation-reducing cut in mortgage rates in
response to lower base rates, so domestic political reasons for
lower rates have been curtailed.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9855>
The Bank of England said it operated in
the money market this afternoon, buying 226 mln stg in bills.
    In band one, the central bank bought 37 mln stg treasury
bills and 72 mln stg bank bills at 9-7/8 pct together with 117
mln stg band two bank bills at 9-13/16 pct.
    This brings total money market help so far today to 241 mln
stg and compares with the Bank's revised estimate of a 350 mln
stg shortfall.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9943>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
enter the U.S. government securities market to add reserves
during its usual intervention period today, economists said.
    With federal funds trading at a steady 6-3/16 pct, most
economists expect an indirect injection of temporary reserves
via a medium-sized round of customer repurchase agreements.
    However, some economists said the Fed may arrange more
aggressive system repurchase agreements.
    Economists would also not rule out an outright bill pass
early this afternoon. Such action had been widely anticipated
yesterday but failed to materialize.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9988>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
government securities market to arrange two billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a spokeswoman for the New York
Fed said.
    Federal funds were trading at 6-3/16 pct at the time of the
indirect injection of temporary reserves.
 Reuter
</BODY>
